Privacy Policies
Age of Learning:
Privacy Policy
ABCmouse:
ABCmouse Privacy Policy English (US) current
Terms & Conditions English (US)
Privacy Policy (Spanish)
Terms & Conditions (Spanish)
Privacy Policy (Australia – New Zealand – Singapore)
Privacy Policy GDPR (EU and UK)
Terms & Conditions GDPR (EU, UK,
Australia
)
Adventure Academy:
Privacy Policy English (US)
Terms & Conditions English (US)
Homeschool +:
Privacy Policy English (US)
Terms & Conditions English (US)
Privacy Policy (Australia)
Privacy Policy EU,UK, and GDPR
Terms & Conditions (EU, UK, and AU GDPR)
Library:
Library Terms and Conditions
Mastery:
My Math Academy & My Reading Academy Privacy Policy
Reading IQ:
Privacy Policy English
Terms & Conditions English
Privacy Policy AUS
Privacy Policy EU/UK
Privacy Policy (China)
Terms & Conditions (China)
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.ageoflearning.com/aofl-privacy-current/:
Skip to content
Age of Learning, Inc. Privacy Policy
Effective Date: November 29, 2023
Previous Privacy Policy
:
July 1, 2020
Age of Learning, Inc. (
AofL
) respects your privacy. To protect your privacy and provide transparency about what we do, we have adopted the following Privacy Policy (
Policy
) which describes the ways in which Age of Learning, Inc. and its affiliates (collectively,
we
,
our
,
us
, or the
Company
) collect, use, and disclose information about you collected on
www.ageoflearning.com
or and any other websites, applications, and online services that link to this Policy (
Website(s)
). Please note that AofL may, from time to time, update or change this Policy. Please check back periodically to determine if the Policy has been modified.
Please read this Privacy Policy closely
. By using the Website, you agree to the handling of your information in accordance with this Policy. If you provide us with your information (directly or indirectly through our service providers), we treat your information according to this Policy. We will use your Personal Information only in accordance with this Policy.
Summary of Key Points
Personal information
, or
PI
, is defined in this Policy to mirror the text of the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act (CCPA) and means information that identifies, relates to, describes, is capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household.
We take your privacy seriously, and
we never monetize your PI
.
Because the security of your personal information is important to us, we only ask for PI where it serves a business purpose and try to limit the collection of PI to only what is reasonably necessary to accomplish those purposes. We also use commercially reasonable physical, technical, and administrative security measures designed to safeguard all information collected by or through the Website.
Acknowledgement of Your Right to Privacy
. At AofL, we believe the confidentiality and protection of personal information is one of our fundamental responsibilities. While information is critical to providing quality products and services, we recognize that one of our most important assets is your trust. Thus, the safekeeping of personal information is a priority.
Collection and Use of Information
. The PI we and our third-party service providers collect from you is limited to the information you provide to us via this Website, which may include, but is not limited to, first and last name, email, school/district, and job title. We also collect limited information about you using a variety of technologies, such as cookies. We use cookies to automatically collect certain technical information from your computer or mobile device over time, without identifying you, including, your device type, the page served, your IP address, the approximate geolocation of your computer or mobile device, and the websites you visited prior to visiting the Website.
We limit the use of your personal information to that which is necessary to administer our business and provide information that is of interest to you. We will use this information only in accordance with the principles set out in this Policy. We do not knowingly collect any PI directly from users under the age of 13.Additional details about collection, retention, and use of PI are provided in Section 6 below.
Limiting Employee Access to Information
. Employee access to personally identifiable information is limited to those with a business reason to know such information. Employees with a business reason to access your data include, for example, those employees responding to “Contact Us” inquiries made by you, employees on our Human Resources team responding to an employment inquiry from you, members of our PlayCrew user testing team responding to your request to be a part of product testing, and our information technology staff.
Security Procedures to Protect Information
. We maintain security standards and procedures to help prevent unauthorized access to your PI. We update and test our technology to improve the protection of our information about you and to assure the integrity of our information. Please be aware, however, that no information system can be guaranteed to be 100% secure, so we cannot guarantee the absolute security of your information. Moreover, we are not responsible for the security of information you transmit over networks that we do not control, including the internet and wireless networks.
Restrictions on Disclosing Information to Other Parties
.
We do not sell, rent, or otherwise reveal specific information about your personally identifiable data.
Therefore, your personal information will not be used for the purpose of independent telemarketing or direct mail marketing of any products or services by third parties.
In certain instances, we may be ordered by a governmental entity or court (or similar tribunal) to share your information with that entity or in connection with a court or other legal proceeding. In such instances, we may share your personal information without your consent, as required to do so by a law enforcement or government agency, court order or similar document compelling us to do so to comply with applicable law, or to protect our legal rights, or the legal rights of others. When practicable and permitted by law we will notify you first before sharing any of your PI.
State-Specific Privacy Rights
. States with comprehensive consumer data privacy laws may provide residents with additional rights regarding our use of PI. The following applies to individuals who reside in specific jurisdictions that provide additional privacy rights, including
California, Colorado, Connecticut, Utah, and Virginia
(“
Relevant States
”).
Under the Relevant States’ laws, we are required to disclose the categories of sources from whom we collect PI (explained below) and the third parties with whom we share it. We are also required to communicate information about rights you have under Relevant States’ laws, such as:
Right to Access Specific Information and Data Portability Right
: You have the right to request that we disclose certain information to you about our collection and use of PI over the past 12 months. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request, we will disclose to you:
The categories of PI we collected about you
The categories of sources for the PI we collected about you
Our business or commercial purpose for collecting that PI
The categories of third parties with whom we share that PI
The specific pieces of PI we collected about you (also called a data portability request)
The business purpose for which PI was disclosed, and the PI categories that each category of recipient obtained if we disclosed PI for a business purpose
Right to Correct Information
: You have the right to request we update PI about you that is incorrect in our systems.
Right to Delete
: You have the right to request that we delete the PI that we have collected from you, subject to certain exceptions. We will use commercially reasonable efforts to honor your request, in compliance with applicable laws. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request, we will delete (and direct our service providers to delete) the PI from our records, unless an exception applies. Please note, however, that we may need or be required to keep such information for our legitimate business purposes or to comply with applicable law.
Right to Opt Out of the Sale or Sharing of Personal Information for Cross-Contextual Behavioral Advertising
: We will never monetize the PI of any user of the Website by providing it to a third party in exchange for money. Some Relevant States’ laws apply a broader definition of the term “sell” that includes disclosing PI to any third party for valuable consideration.
Right to Limit Sensitive Personal Information Use
: You have the right to limit the use of sensitive PI regarding you.
Non-Discrimination
: We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of your rights.
For details on exercising these rights, please see “Exercising Access, Disclosure, Data Portability, and Deletion Rights” below.
A. Information We Collect
We collect information that identifies, relates to, describes, references, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household. We have collected the following categories of PI from or about consumers within the last 12 months:
Category
Examples
Collected
A. Identifiers
A real name, alias, unique personal identifier, online identifier, Internet Protocol address, email address, telephone number, Account name, or other similar identifiers
Yes
B. PI categories
A name, signature, social security number, physical characteristics or description, address, telephone number, passport number, driver’s license or state identification card number, insurance policy number, education, employment, employment history, bank account number, credit card number, debit card number, or any other financial information, medical information, or health insurance information. Some PI included in this category may overlap with other categories.
Yes
C. Protected classification characteristics under applicable state or federal law
Sex (including gender)
No
D. Commercial information
Records of personal property; products or services purchased, obtained, or considered; or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies
No
E. Biometric information
Genetic, physiological, behavioral, and biological characteristics or activity patterns used to extract a template or other identifier or identifying information—such as fingerprints, face prints, voiceprints, iris or retina scans, keystroke, gait, or other physical patterns and sleep, health, or exercise data
No
F. Internet or other similar network activity
Browsing history; search history; or information on a consumer’s interaction with a website, application, or advertisement
Yes
G. Geolocation data
Physical location or movements
No
H. Sensory data
Audio, electronic, visual, thermal, olfactory, or similar information
No
I. Professional or employment-related information
Current or past job history or performance evaluations
No
J. Nonpublic education information (per the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Section 1232g, 34 C.F.R. Part 99))
Education records directly related to a student, such as grades, class lists, student schedules, and student identification codes, maintained by an educational institution or party acting on its behalf
No
K. Inferences drawn from other PI
Profile information reflecting a person’s preferences, characteristics, psychological trends, predispositions, behavior, attitudes, intelligence, abilities, and aptitudes.
No
L. Sensitive PI
Social security number, driver’s license, state identification card, or passport number; account login, financial account, debit card number, or credit card number in combination with any required security or access code, password, or credentials allowing access to an account; a precise geolocation; racial or ethnic origin; religious or philosophical beliefs; mail, email, and text message contents; and genetic data.
No
B. Information We Share
. Additionally, we are required to provide you certain information about the business and commercial purposes for which we collect and share PI.
Business and Commercial Purposes for Which We Use Personal Information
: We may use or disclose the PI we collect from each of the Categories of PI listed above for one or more of the following purposes:
To fulfill or meet the reason you provided the information;
To provide, support, personalize, and develop our Website, products, or services;
To process your requests;
To provide you with support and to respond to your inquiries, including to investigate and address your concerns and to monitor and improve our responses;
To provide customer service;
To understand how users interact with the Website;
To conduct research, testing, analysis, and development;
To detect security incidents and prevent fraud;
To debug and repair errors;
To respond to law enforcement requests and as required by applicable law, court order, or governmental regulations;
As described to you when collecting your PI or as otherwise set forth in Relevant States’ laws;
To advance our commercial and economic interests, such as delivering interest-based advertising of our products and services and analyzing the effectiveness of our advertising; and/or
To evaluate or conduct a merger, divestiture, restructuring, reorganization, dissolution, or other sale or transfer of some or all our assets, whether as a going concern or as part of bankruptcy, liquidation, or similar proceeding, in which PI held by us about our Users/consumers is among the assets transferred.
Categories of Personal Information We Share
: We may share your PI by disclosing it to a third party for a business purpose described below. We only make these business purpose disclosures under written contracts that describe the purposes, require the recipient to keep the PI confidential, and prohibit using the disclosed information for any purpose except performing the contract.
In the preceding 12 months, we have also disclosed the following categories of PI for one or more business purposes:
Personal Information Category
Category of Third-Party Recipients
Business Purpose Disclosures of Personal Information
Sales/Sharing
(cross-context behavioral advertising)
A. Identifiers
Affiliates, partners, parent/subsidiary organizations, service providers, advertising networks, and government entities
Sales: none
Sharing: None
B. Customer records PI categories
Affiliates, partners, parent/subsidiary organizations, service providers, and government entities
Sales: None
Sharing: None
C. Protected classification characteristics under applicable state or federal law
None
Sales: None
Sharing: None
D. Commercial information
None
Sales: None
Sharing: None
E. Biometric information
None
Sales: None
Sharing: None
F. Internet or other similar network activity
Affiliates, partners, parent/subsidiary organizations, service providers, advertising networks
Sales: None
Sharing: None
G. Geolocation data
None
Sales: None
Sharing: None
H. Sensory data
None
Sales: None
Sharing: None
I.  Professional or employment-related information
None
Sales: None
Sharing: None
J.  Nonpublic education information
None
Sales: None
Sharing: None
K. Inferences drawn from other PI
None
Sales: None
Sharing: None
L. Sensitive PI
None
Sales: None
Sharing: None
C. Retention of Personal Information
. We retain PI for as long as necessary to provide the services and fulfill the transactions you have requested, or for other business purposes, such as complying with our legal obligations, resolving disputes, and enforcing our agreements. We decide how long we need PI on a case-by-case basis. We may consider the following factors when making retention decisions:
Whether we are required by law to keep some types of PI for certain periods of time to comply with our legal obligations; and
Whether we need some of your PI for other business purposes, such as to prevent harm and ensure safety and security of our Website or protect ourselves.
If we determine your PI is no longer necessary using the factors above, we will generally destroy or anonymize that PI.
D. Exercising Access, Disclosure, Data Portability, and Deletion Rights
. To exercise the access, disclosure, data portability, and deletion rights described above, please submit a verifiable consumer request to us by either contacting us as set forth in Section 9 (Contact Us) below, or by visiting here:
ABCmouse Privacy Portal
Adventure Academy, Reading IQ, Homeschool+ Privacy Portal
My Math Academy, My Reading Academy, My Reading Academy Español Privacy Portal
Non US Resident ABCmouse Privacy Portal
Non US Resident Adventure Academy, Reading IQ, Homeschool+ Privacy Portal
Only you or a person registered with the applicable Secretary of State that you authorize to act on your behalf may make a verifiable consumer request related to your PI.
For all requests, please clearly state that the request is related to “Your Privacy Rights,” indicate which type of request you are making, and provide your name, street address, city, state, zip code, and an email address or phone number where we may contact you. We are not responsible for notices that are not labeled or sent properly or that do not include complete information.
You may only make a verifiable consumer request for access or data portability twice within a 12-month period. The verifiable consumer request must:
Provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected PI or an authorized representative. We will verify your request by asking you to provide information related to your interactions with us. We will not otherwise ask for PI from you that we would not otherwise maintain as part of providing the Website or operating related services.
Describe your request with sufficient detail that allows us to properly understand, evaluate, and respond to it.
We cannot respond to your request or provide you with PI if we cannot verify your identity or authority to make the request and confirm the PI relates to you. Making a verifiable consumer request does not require you to create an account with us. We will only use PI provided in a verifiable consumer request to verify the requester’s identity or authority to make the request.
We endeavor to respond to a verifiable consumer request within 45 days of its receipt. If we require more time (up to 90 days), we will inform you of the reason and extension period in writing. We will deliver our written response electronically. Any disclosures we provide will only cover the 12-month period preceding the receipt of the verifiable consumer request. The response we provide will also explain the reasons we cannot comply with a request, if applicable. For data portability requests, we will select a format to provide the PI that is readily usable and should allow you to transmit the information from one entity to another entity without hindrance.
We do not charge a fee to process or respond to your verifiable consumer request unless it is excessive, repetitive, or manifestly unfounded. If we determine that the request warrants a fee, we will tell you why we made that decision and provide you with a cost estimate before completing your request.
To appeal a decision regarding a consumer rights request, please submit your appeal using our portal, email, telephone, or postal mail. Your appeal should include an explanation of the reason you disagree with our decision. Within 60 days of receipt of an appeal, we will inform you in writing of any action taken or not taken in response to the appeal, including a written explanation of the reasons for the decisions.
7. Assignment of Information
. Subject to confidentiality agreements, the terms of this Privacy Policy, and applicable law, information may be disclosed to service providers, advisors, potential transactional partners, or other third parties in connection with the consideration, negotiation, or completion of a corporate transaction in which we are acquired by or merged with another company or we sell, liquidate, transfer, or license all or a portion of our assets in bankruptcy or otherwise. This means that if some or all our assets are acquired or otherwise transferred or licensed, including in bankruptcy, that such acquirer shall be subject to the same commitments stated under this Policy.
8. Changes to Our Privacy Policy
. Our Policy will change from time to time. If we update this Policy, we will notify you by posting the revised Policy on the Website; and for certain revisions that materially expand the ways in which we use or share the information previously collected from you through the Website, we will display an alert upon Website access and/or next to the Privacy Policy.
9. Contact Us
. Age of Learning, Inc. is located in the United States of America, and is the operator of the Website. You may contact us below if you have any questions, complaints, or other issues related to this Privacy Policy.
Mailing address:
Age of Learning, Inc.
Attention: Legal Department
P.O. Box 230
Glendale, CA 91209
USA
Telephone Number: +1.800.633.3331
Email address:
privacy@aofl.com
Data Privacy Officer
DPO@aofl.com
101 N. Brand Blvd., 8th Floor
Glendale, California 91203
Sub-policy 1
https://www.ageoflearning.com/abc-privacy-current:
Skip to content
Privacy Policies
Age of Learning:
Privacy Policy
ABCmouse:
ABCmouse Privacy Policy English (US) current
Terms & Conditions English (US)
Privacy Policy (Spanish)
Terms & Conditions (Spanish)
Privacy Policy (Australia – New Zealand – Singapore)
Privacy Policy GDPR (EU and UK)
Terms & Conditions GDPR (EU, UK,
Australia
)
Adventure Academy:
Privacy Policy English (US)
Terms & Conditions English (US)
Homeschool +:
Privacy Policy English (US)
Terms & Conditions English (US)
Privacy Policy (Australia)
Privacy Policy EU,UK, and GDPR
Terms & Conditions (EU, UK, and AU GDPR)
Library:
Library Terms and Conditions
Mastery:
My Math Academy & My Reading Academy Privacy Policy
Reading IQ:
Privacy Policy English
Terms & Conditions English
Privacy Policy AUS
Privacy Policy EU/UK
Privacy Policy (China)
Terms & Conditions (China)
Sub-policy 2
https://www.ageoflearning.com/privacy-policy-abc-current_es/:
Skip to content
ABCmouse Política de privacidad
Fecha de entrada en vigor: 15 de enero de 2024
Política de privacidad anterior:  12 de mayo de 2022
Bienvenido a ABCmouse.com
®
Early Learning Academy (Academia de aprendizaje temprano)
(
ABCmouse
), que es propiedad de Age of Learning, Inc. y está operada por ella. Hemos asumido el compromiso de brindar a los niños un entorno de aprendizaje en el que cada actividad sea tan entretenida como educativa, y donde usted se sienta confiado en que la privacidad de sus hijos está protegida.
Esta Política de privacidad describe las formas en las que Age of Learning, Inc. y sus subsidiarias (en su conjunto,
nosotros
,
nuestro/a(s)
,
nos
o la
Compañía
) recopilamos, usamos y divulgamos información sobre usted y los niños que usan su Cuenta a través de ABCmouse y cualquiera de los otros sitios web, aplicaciones y servicios en línea (las
Aplicaciones
) que tienen enlace con esta política (en su conjunto, los
Servicios
), incluido ABCmouse
®
para escuelas. Proporcionamos Cuentas escolares (según se definen más adelante) para las escuelas, distritos escolares, guarderías autorizadas y otros programas o instituciones educativos autorizados (cada uno, una
Institución educativa
). Los Servicios están orientados a niños desde preescolar hasta segundo grado de primaria.
Tenga a bien leer esta Política de privacidad con atención.
Al usar los Servicios, usted acepta el tratamiento de su información y la de sus hijos de conformidad con esta Política de privacidad. Si nos proporciona su información (directa o indirectamente a través de nuestros proveedores de servicios), tratamos su información de acuerdo con esta Política de privacidad. Usaremos su Información personal solamente de conformidad con esta Política de privacidad. Si necesitáramos usar su Información personal para cualquier otro propósito que no sea el que se divulga en la presente, actualizaremos esta Política de privacidad, tal como se explica en
sección 12 (Cambios en nuestra Política de privacidad)
.
Resumen de los puntos clave
Debe leer esta Política de privacidad en su totalidad y nuestros
Términos y condiciones
, pero a continuación, incluimos algunos puntos clave:
ABCmouse cuenta con la certificación del programa de Puerto Seguro (Safe Harbor) de COPPA aprobado por la FTC de kidSAFE. Esto significa que el producto ha sido revisado y certificado por kidSAFE de manera independiente para cumplir con determinadas normas de seguridad y privacidad en línea.
Información personal (IP)
se define en esta política de forma tal de reflejar el texto de la Ley de Privacidad del Consumidor de California (California Consumer Privacy Act,
CCPA
) y se refiere a la información que identifica, se relaciona, describe, puede estar asociada o puede vincularse de modo razonable, directa o indirectamente, con un consumidor o un grupo familiar en particular.
Nos tomamos su privacidad en serio y
jamás monetizamos su IP
, aunque podemos usarla para proporcionarle promociones y ofertas especiales.
Durante la inscripción en ABCmouse, la única información que quizás pudiéramos pedirle que proporcionase sobre un menor que va a usar los Servicios es el nombre del niño (o apodo), el mes y año de nacimiento y el sexo. También le pediremos que elija un Nivel de dificultad académica para cada niño.
Excepto en los lugares y para los fines revelados de manera expresa en esta Política de privacidad, no recopilamos de manera intencional ningún tipo de IP directamente de los Usuarios menores de menos de 13 años.
No pedimos cierta IP delicada, como números de seguro social, números de licencia de conducir ni datos biométricos. Sin embargo, se solicita a los suscriptores pagos que faciliten información de pago cuando se suscriben. Le solicitamos que consulte la
sección 13 (Comuníquese con nosotros)
si desea recibir más información sobre cómo protegemos la información de pago.
Dado que la seguridad de su IP es importante para nosotros, la solicitamos solo cuando fuese útil para fines comerciales, e intentamos limitar su recopilación únicamente a lo que sea necesario para cumplir con esos fines. También recurrimos a medidas de seguridad físicas, técnicas y administrativas razonables desde el punto de vista comercial, diseñadas para resguardar toda la información que recopilan los Servicios.
Nuestros Servicios no admiten el inicio de sesión federado o de redes sociales.
Los Usuarios adultos (según se define más adelante) pueden comunicarse con nosotros o con su Institución educativa, según corresponda, en cualquier momento, tal como se describe en la
sección 13 (Comuníquese con nosotros)
para solicitar que les brindemos para su revisión o que eliminemos de nuestros registros toda IP que hayan proporcionado sobre los Usuarios menores asociados a sus Cuentas, o que dejemos de recopilar IP sobre esos Usuarios menores. Si desea obtener información sobre cuándo eliminamos de manera automática la IP por cancelación o inactividad de la Cuenta, le solicitamos que consulte la
sección 7 (Cancelación y reactivación de una Cuenta; eliminación de datos)
.
Protecciones adicionales e información para las Cuentas de escuelas
Si tiene acceso a los Servicios a través de una Cuenta escolar, se aplican protecciones de privacidad adicionales ya que su Institución educativa puede brindarnos información que identifica en forma personal a los estudiantes (los
Datos de estudiantes
) tal como se define en la Ley de Derechos Educativos y Privacidad de la Familia (Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, FERPA) (título 20, artículo 1232g del Código de los Estados Unidos [United States Code, U.S.C.]) y sus reglamentaciones de implementación (título 34, parte 99 del Código de Reglamentaciones Federales [Code of Federal Regulations, CFR]) (en su conjunto,
FERPA
) además de las leyes estatales aplicables. La Institución educativa es responsable de obtener el consentimiento de los padres o asegurar que se aplique una excepción antes de transferir Datos de estudiantes a la Compañía, que actúa como un funcionario escolar externo en este contexto.
Solo accederemos, recopilaremos, registraremos, organizaremos, usaremos o divulgaremos (en su conjunto,
Procesaremos
) los Datos de estudiantes recopilados a través de los Servicios, tal como se describe en nuestros acuerdos con la Institución educativa correspondiente y en esta Política de privacidad. Procesaremos los datos de acuerdo con todas las leyes aplicables, lo que incluye, entre otras, la FERPA.
Eliminaremos o, si lo solicita la Institución educativa, transferiremos a la Institución educativa todos los Datos de estudiantes en un plazo de 90 días (o un período menor si así lo exige la ley aplicable) después de la rescisión de nuestro acuerdo con la Institución educativa correspondiente.
Podremos eliminar todo tipo de identificación de los Datos de estudiantes que se reciban en relación con la prestación de los Servicios, y podremos usar estos datos tal como se describe en esta Política de privacidad.
Índice
Puerto seguro de COPPA
Tipos de cuentas, servicios y usuarios
Recopilación de la información
Cómo usamos la información
En qué casos divulgamos información a terceros
Cómo acceder, cambiar o eliminar la información de la cuenta
Cancelación y reactivación de la Cuenta;
eliminación de datos
Derechos de privacidad específicos según el estado
Enlaces a otros servicios
Ubicación del procesamiento de la información
Seguridad
Cambios en nuestra Política de privacidad
Comuníquese con nosotros
1.
Puerto Seguro de COPPA
ABCmouse es miembro del Programa kidSAFE Seal. Esto significa que el producto ha sido revisado y certificado por kidSAFE de manera independiente para cumplir con determinadas normas de seguridad y privacidad en línea, y está autorizado para exhibir el sello kidSAFE Seal en virtud del programa de Puerto Seguro de COPPA aprobado por la FTC de kidSAFE. En virtud del programa kidSAFE, los usuarios también pueden informar inquietudes o quejas directamente a kidSAFE a través del siguiente enlace:
https://www.kidsafeseal.com/certifiedproducts/abcmouse.html
Además, los Usuarios menores tienen bloqueado todos los accesos a enlaces externos. Los enlaces externos solo estarán disponibles si un Usuario adulto introduce su contraseña.
2. Tipos de cuentas, servicios y usuarios
La forma en que recopilamos, usamos y revelamos información depende del tipo de Cuenta y del tipo de Usuario. Actualmente ofrecemos los siguientes tipos de Cuentas a través de los Servicios: Cuentas familiares, Cuentas de profesor, Cuentas vinculadas al aula, Cuentas de bibliotecario, Cuentas de biblioteca para invitados, Cuentas de biblioteca personales, Cuentas de préstamo bibliotecario desde casa y Cuentas de centro comunitario (en su conjunto, las
Cuentas de consumidor y otras
), que se describen en nuestros
Términos y condiciones
.
También ofrecemos Cuentas escolares, que solo están destinadas a las Instituciones educativas. A las Cuentas de consumidor y otras y a las Cuentas escolares se las denomina en su conjunto las
Cuentas
, y las disposiciones de esta política se aplican a todas las Cuentas. Cualquier diferencia en el modo en que se tratan las Cuentas de consumidor y otras y las Cuentas escolares se identifica más adelante.
Los Usuarios de los Servicios incluyen los
Usuarios menores
(cualquier persona de menos 18 años que utilice la parte de aprendizaje de los Servicios) y los
Usuarios adultos
(incluidos los padres y tutores legales de Usuarios menores, los compradores de Cuentas de regalo, profesores, bibliotecarios y administradores de centros comunitarios), denominados en su conjunto, los
Usuarios
.
3. Recopilación de información
Existen dos categorías generales de información que recopilamos.
A. Información que los Usuarios nos proporcionan
Tal como se indica en mayor detalle más adelante, nosotros y nuestros proveedores de servicios externos recopilamos la información que nos proporcionan los Usuarios cuando usan los Servicios, inclusive, cuando los Usuarios adultos se inscriben para recibir los Servicios, crean una Cuenta o se comunican por alguna inquietud, comentario o pedido y cuando los Usuarios menores participan en evaluaciones. Nosotros solamente utilizaremos o divulgaremos esta información de conformidad con esta política y con las leyes aplicables. Le solicitamos que consulte la
sección 5 (Cuándo divulgamos información a terceros)
más adelante, si desea obtener más información y saber cómo limitamos la divulgación de la información de Usuarios menores.
1.
Usuarios adultos
Se les solicita a los Usuarios adultos que proporcionen determinada IP sobre ellos al registrarse para una Cuenta, lo que incluye nombre y apellido, dirección de correo electrónico y número de teléfono (que es opcional). Cualquier otra información proporcionada en el momento del registro depende del tipo de Cuenta o Usuario adulto. Por ejemplo:
La
Información de pago
se recopila de los Usuarios adultos que compran una Cuenta familiar, incluso si compran una Cuenta de regalo para otra persona, a menos que los Usuarios adultos realicen la compra a través de iOS Apple ID, PayPal u otros mecanismos similares con los que nos integramos. Para su seguridad, no almacenamos el número completo de su tarjeta de crédito en nuestras bases de datos, pero sí retenemos solo los primeros seis dígitos y los últimos cuatro dígitos para poder identificar su Cuenta y responder a sus solicitudes y preguntas.
La dirección de correo electrónico de
un Usuario adulto
también se recopila cuando el Usuario adulto que adquiere una Cuenta familiar o da de alta una Cuenta de biblioteca personal o una Cuenta de préstamo bibliotecario desde casa, manifiesta que no es el tutor legal, o cuando un profesor o un administrador de un centro comunitario proporciona estas direcciones para que los padres o los tutores legales se conecten con la Cuenta de profesor, la Cuenta de centro comunitario o la Cuenta escolar.
Se recopilan
el nombre y domicilio de la escuela, la biblioteca o el centro comunitario (solamente el estado
y
el código postal)
de los Usuarios adultos que se registran para una Cuenta de profesor, Cuenta de bibliotecario o Cuenta de centro comunitario. A los Usuarios adultos que se registran para una Cuenta familiar, de profesor, vinculada al aula, de biblioteca personal, de préstamo bibliotecario desde casa, de centro comunitario o escolar se les podrá solicitar que proporcionen el nombre (o apodo), mes y año de nacimiento y sexo de los Usuarios menores que accederán a los Servicios a través de sus Cuentas.
Además, los Usuarios adultos pueden proporcionarnos información a través de secciones independientes protegidas con contraseña (es decir, la sección para padres o el Tablero del profesor) de los Servicios. Estas secciones, a las que se puede acceder a través del enlace de Menú o Configuración de los Servicios, permiten que los Usuarios adultos administren sus Cuentas, inclusive cuando se agregan Usuarios menores, se proporcionan testimonios, se busca asistencia al cliente o se envían comentarios o preguntas.
Si envía alguna información relacionada con otras personas en lo que concierne a los Servicios, declara que tiene la autoridad para hacerlo y nos permite usar la información de conformidad con lo que se establece en esta Política de privacidad.
2.
Usuarios menores
Antes, en la versión en Adobe Flash original de los Servicios, algunas actividades permitían que los Usuarios menores crearan o cargaran determinado contenido de forma libre –como fotografías, archivos de audio o video y material gráfico– y las guardaran en los Servicios. Posteriormente actualizamos los nuevos Usuarios a una versión sin Flash de los Servicios, que eliminó estas funciones y la posibilidad de cargar fotografías, archivos de audio o video. Los Usuarios menores aún pueden crear material gráfico de forma libre en los Servicios.
Lo animamos a utilizar los Servicios con sus Usuarios menores y a ver y supervisar cualquier contenido creado o cargado (si corresponde) por ellos. Si deseara revisar todo el contenido guardado por Usuarios menores, puede acceder a este contenido, haciendo clic en el elemento de menú Mi trabajo en la sección Sobre mí de los Servicios de cada Usuario menor.
Chat educativo
Para las Cuentas familiares que elijan habilitarla, ofrecemos como experiencia gratuita y opcional una función de chat educativo interactivo para Usuarios menores (
Chat educativo),
impulsada por tecnología de inteligencia artificial (
IA
) generativa, como ChatGPT de OpenAI. Los Usuarios adultos pueden incluirse para permitir que su Cuenta acceda al Chat educativo a través de voz o texto, o pueden rechazarlo. Si un Usuario adulto se incluye, tanto los Usuarios adultos como los Usuarios menores pueden hacer preguntas y tener una conversación con personajes animados dentro de los Servicios sobre temas educativos (por ejemplo, animales y hábitats) por voz o texto. Las respuestas de chat son generadas por un modelo generativo de IA que hemos capacitado para proporcionar a los Usuarios menores respuestas apropiadas para su edad, educativas y entretenidas.
El Chat educativo puede utilizarse de dos maneras:
Voz
El Chat educativo ofrece capacidades de voz a texto, lo que requiere habilitar el acceso al micrófono en el dispositivo que se utiliza para los Servicios. Si el micrófono está habilitado, los Usuarios menores podrán usar el Chat educativo a través de la opción de voz, además de la de escritura. Recopilamos archivos de audio con grabaciones de las voces de los Usuarios menores únicamente como reemplazo de las palabras escritas. Una vez que las grabaciones de voz se convierten en texto, se eliminan inmediatamente.
Texto
Si el Chat educativo está habilitado, pero el acceso al micrófono no lo está, los Usuarios menores podrán usar el Chat educativo solamente a través de la opción de escritura.
Ya sea que se escriba directamente o que se genere mediante la conversión de grabaciones de audio a texto, se hace lo siguiente con el texto ingresado por Usuarios menores: (i) Se filtra para intentar eliminar las blasfemias, las instancias claras de IP de Usuario menor (o cualquier IP) u otro lenguaje inapropiado. (ii) Lo retenemos mientras conservamos otros datos del Usuario según se describe en esta Política de privacidad, y sin que se asocie a la IP de ningún Usuario menor. (iii) Se utiliza con el fin de respaldar la experiencia permanente del Usuario menor, y para desarrollar y mejorar aún más los Servicios. (iv) Nuestros proveedores de modelos de IA generativa lo conservan durante aproximadamente 30 días para controlar el abuso y uso indebido. El texto ingresado por el Usuario al usar el Chat educativo no se considera “Contenido generado por el Usuario” a los fines de nuestros Términos y condiciones.
La tecnología de filtrado no puede bloquear la recopilación o retención de todas las blasfemias, IP u otro lenguaje inapropiado que los Usuarios decidan usar en el Chat educativo. Todos los Usuarios, incluidos los Usuarios menores, deben evitar compartir IP al usar el Chat educativo. Si determinamos que se ha recopilado y retenido IP a través del Chat educativo, eliminaremos esa IP al descubrirla.
Si bien esperamos que los Usuarios menores sean los usuarios principales de esta función, los Usuarios adultos también pueden usar el Chat educativo. La sección anterior se aplica igualmente a todos los Usuarios.
En el futuro, podemos introducir funciones adicionales que incluirán opciones de voz o de texto. Estas funciones se ajustarán a esta política, a menos que existan diferencias sustanciales en la manera en que se procesa la IP y, de ser así, actualizaremos esta política según se establece en la
sección 12
B. Información que recopilamos de los Usuarios
Nosotros y nuestros proveedores de servicios externos recopilamos IP directamente de los Usuarios de los Servicios a través de las acciones que realizan y de las actividades que llevan a cabo cuando utilizan los Servicios. Por ejemplo, de los Usuarios adultos podemos recopilar información sobre los patrones de uso y el historial de pedidos; de los Usuarios menores podemos recopilar información sobre los patrones de uso, las actividades que comienza y termina un niño, cuándo un niño comienza y detiene una actividad, qué áreas de los Servicios son las que el niño frecuenta, la cantidad de preguntas que responde de manera correcta o incorrecta, cuántos tiques gana el niño, qué elementos virtuales selecciona el niño para cambiar por tiques y la elección del niño de Avatar y personalización.
Nosotros y nuestros proveedores de servicios externos también usamos una amplia gama de tecnologías, entre ellas, cookies (pequeños archivos de texto que los Servicios guardan en su computadora o dispositivo móvil), para recopilar, de manera automática, determinada información técnica de su computadora o dispositivo móvil, con el tiempo y de diferentes sitios web, inclusive, cuando usted (tanto los Usuarios menores como los Usuarios adultos) usa los Servicios, como su tipo de navegador, sistema operativo, tipo de dispositivo, la página servida, su dirección de IP, la geoubicación aproximada de su computadora o dispositivo móvil y los sitios web a los que fue antes de visitar los Servicios. Cuando descargue y utilice una de nuestras Aplicaciones, nosotros y nuestros proveedores de servicios podremos rastrear y recopilar datos de uso de la Aplicación, como la fecha y hora en que la Aplicación de su dispositivo accede a nuestros servidores y qué información y archivos se han descargado a la Aplicación en función de su número de dispositivo.
Nosotros y nuestros proveedores de servicios externos podremos utilizar la información recopilada a través de estos métodos técnicos con fines diversos, incluso para la entrega de contenido, el seguimiento y la mejora de la experiencia de nuestros Usuarios en los Servicios y la presentación de publicidad a los visitantes de www.abcmouse.com cuando visitan otros sitios web y aplicaciones. Por ejemplo, cuando regresa a los Servicios después de iniciar sesión, las cookies ayudan a los Servicios a reconocer quién es usted sin tener que volver a iniciar sesión. La información recopilada a través de estos métodos técnicos en las partes de los Servicios dirigidas a los niños se utiliza solo para respaldar las operaciones internas de los Servicios.
No permitimos que las redes publicitarias de terceros recopilen información sobre los Usuarios que han iniciado sesión en sus Cuentas.
A continuación, se incluye más información sobre el uso de las cookies.
Cookies
Usamos cookies, que son pequeños archivos de texto que se colocan en su dispositivo, para recopilar determinada información sobre inicios de sesión en Internet e información sobre la conducta de los visitantes. Puede obtener más información sobre las cookies en
www.aboutcookies.org
. Utilizamos cookies para reconocer su dispositivo y para proporcionar y mejorar nuestros Servicios según se describe más adelante. Utilizamos las cookies que se indican a continuación:
Cookies esenciales
Estas cookies son esenciales para brindarle los servicios disponibles a través de los Servicios y permitirle usar algunas de sus funciones. Por ejemplo, le permiten iniciar sesión en áreas seguras de nuestros Servicios y ayudan a que se cargue de manera rápida el contenido de las páginas que solicita. Sin estas cookies, no pueden prestarse los servicios que solicita y usamos estas cookies solo para brindarle esos servicios.
Cookies de funcionalidad
Estas cookies nos permiten recordar las elecciones que realiza al utilizar nuestros Servicios, tales como recordar sus preferencias de idioma, su información de inicio de sesión y los cambios que introduce en otras partes de los Servicios que puede personalizar. El propósito de estas cookies es brindarle una experiencia más personalizada y evitar que tenga que reingresar sus preferencias cada vez que visita nuestros Servicios.
Cookies analíticas y de desempeño
Estas cookies se utilizan para recopilar información sobre el tráfico hacia nuestros Servicios y sobre cómo los Usuarios usan los Servicios. La información recopilada no identifica a visitante alguno en forma individual. Incluye el número de visitantes de nuestros Servicios, los sitios web que los derivaron a nuestros Servicios, las páginas que visitaron en nuestros Servicios, a qué hora visitaron nuestros Servicios, si habían o no visitado antes nuestros Servicios y otra información similar. Utilizamos esta información para poder operar nuestros Servicios de manera más eficiente, recopilar información demográfica amplia y monitorear el nivel de actividad en nuestros Servicios.
Si no desea que los Servicios recopilen información a través de cookies, puede configurar su navegador web para que rechace las cookies de los Servicios. Cada navegador es diferente, por lo que debe verificar el menú de Ayuda de su navegador para saber cómo cambiar sus preferencias de cookies. Sin embargo, tenga en cuenta que, si rechaza o bloquea las cookies de los Servicios, es posible que estos no funcionen según lo previsto. Por ejemplo, no podrá permanecer conectado a su Cuenta y, por lo tanto, tendrá que iniciar sesión durante cada transición de página.
Cookies de las redes sociales
Estas cookies se utilizan cuando comparte información mediante el botón de compartir en las redes sociales o el botón “me gusta” en nuestros Servicios, o cuando vincula su cuenta o consulta nuestro contenido en o a través de un sitio web de redes sociales, tales como Facebook, Twitter o Google+. La red social registrará que lo ha hecho.
Salvo que se estipulase lo contrario en esta política, como cuando un residente de un estado que ofrece protecciones de privacidad adicionales se ha excluido de compartir IP a cambio de una contraprestación económica, al seguir utilizando nuestros Servicios, usted acepta el uso que hagamos de estas cookies que hacen que la publicidad y las comunicaciones sean más pertinentes para usted y sus intereses, y nos ayudan a mejorar aún más nuestros Servicios.
Notificaciones push y de SMS:
Asimismo, si usted descargó la Aplicación en su dispositivo móvil para acceder a los Servicios, como parte del uso que usted hace de estos, podremos preguntarle si desea recibir notificaciones push, que pueden incluir alertas y notificaciones, distintivos, banners y sonidos en su dispositivo móvil. Puede optar por dejar de recibir notificaciones push en cualquier momento cambiando la configuración de su dispositivo móvil. Si nos proporciona su número de teléfono móvil, podremos enviarle mensajes de texto SMS sobre su cuenta. Tenga en cuenta que su operador puede cobrarle por los mensajes de texto que reciba. Para dejar de recibir de forma permanente mensajes de texto SMS de nosotros (si se encuentra en los EE. UU. o Canadá) escriba, STOP (DETENER), CANCEL (CANCELAR) o UNSUBSCRIBE (DARSE DE BAJA) en respuesta a cualquier mensaje de texto SMS enviado por nosotros.
4. Cómo usamos la información
Jamás monetizaremos la IP de ningún Usuario de los Servicios proporcionándola a un tercero a cambio de dinero, excepto según se describe en esta política en el contexto de la venta de la Compañía.
Nosotros y nuestros proveedores de servicios externos pueden utilizar la información recopilada de los Usuarios de la siguiente manera:
Información de Usuarios adultos:
La información recopilada de Usuarios adultos puede usarse para lo siguiente:
Para permitirle registrarse y utilizar los Servicios, inclusive, por ejemplo, para enviarle comunicaciones sobre el progreso del Usuario menor o su Cuenta, o para permitirle proporcionar comentarios a través de la sección para padres. Por motivos de seguridad, la sección para padres está protegida con contraseña. En el caso de las Cuentas de consumidor y otras, a los fines de poder completar y realizar su compra, por ejemplo, para procesar sus pagos, para comunicarnos con usted en relación con su compra y brindarle atención al cliente relacionada.
Para responder a sus consultas y satisfacer sus solicitudes, recuperar su contraseña o brindar asistencia técnica. En el caso de las Cuentas de consumidor y otras, con el fin de enviar comunicaciones de marketing que consideremos que pueden ser de su interés. Si bien nunca es nuestra intención enviar mensajes de marketing a niños, si usted considera que un Usuario menor ha recibido una comunicación de marketing, le solicitamos que se comunique con nosotros, tal como se describe en la
sección 13 (Comuníquese con nosotros)
más adelante. Siempre podrá optar por dejar de recibir estos mensajes de marketing, simplemente siguiendo las instrucciones que se incluyen en el mensaje o, si la comunicación es telefónica, informando a quien llama su deseo de no recibir más comunicaciones telefónicas. Para todas las Cuentas, no podrá optar por excluirse de recibir mensajes administrativos de nuestra parte en relación con su Cuenta, entre ellos, mensajes de correo electrónico para restablecer contraseñas, mensajes de asistencia al cliente y mensajes de progreso para las Cuentas escolares.
Para enviarle nuestra publicidad basada en sus visitas a las partes de los Servicios no dirigidas a menores (como www.abcmouse.com); por ejemplo, cuando visita sitios web y aplicaciones de terceros o a través del correo postal. Puede excluirse de recibir publicidad basada en intereses de nuestros proveedores de anuncios publicitarios basados en el interés, visitando www.aboutads.info/choices. Si desea recibir más información sobre las señales “no rastrear” del navegador de web, le solicitamos que visite
allaboutdnt.org
. Algunos residentes estatales tienen derechos adicionales en virtud de las leyes de privacidad de datos de su estado. Para obtener más información sobre estos derechos, le solicitamos que consulte la sección 8 más adelante.
para medir la eficacia de nuestros anuncios publicitarios dirigidos a adultos.
Información de Usuarios menores:
La información recopilada de Usuarios menores puede usarse para lo siguiente:
Medir el desempeño de un Usuario menor en las actividades y adaptar la experiencia de aprendizaje del Usuario menor a sus necesidades de aprendizaje.
Analizar, proporcionar informes de progreso o brindar una evaluación del desempeño de un Usuario menor al Usuario adulto de la cuenta.
Información tanto de Usuarios adultos como de Usuarios menores:
La información recopilada tanto de los Usuarios adultos como de los Usuarios menores puede usarse para lo siguiente:
Permitirnos evaluar y mejorar los Servicios, su contenido educativo y otros servicios que ofrecemos (por ejemplo, para mejorar nuestro contenido y la experiencia del Usuario); para investigar, evaluar y mejorar la eficacia educativa de los Servicios y para informar nuestra comprensión de la base del Usuario de los Servicios.
Ajustar a la medida, adaptar y personalizar la experiencia de visualización y consumo de contenido de los Usuarios; por ejemplo, al medir el desempeño de un Usuario menor en las actividades y adaptar su experiencia a sus necesidades de aprendizaje.
Mantener y analizar el funcionamiento de los Servicios.
Si lo consideramos necesario o apropiado: (a) de acuerdo con las leyes aplicables, incluidas las leyes fuera de su país de residencia; (b) para cumplir con procesos legales; (c) para responder a solicitudes de autoridades públicas y gubernamentales, incluidas autoridades públicas y gubernamentales fuera de su país de residencia; (d) para detectar infracciones y hacer cumplir nuestros términos y condiciones; (e) para proteger nuestras operaciones o las de nuestras filiales, incluida la seguridad de los Servicios; (f) para proteger nuestros derechos, privacidad, seguridad o bienes, o los de nuestras filiales, los suyos o los de otros; y (g) para permitirnos aprovechar los recursos disponibles o limitar los daños y perjuicios que podamos sufrir (en su conjunto, [a-g] son
Otros usos y divulgaciones
).
5. En qué casos divulgamos información a terceros
La IP recopilada tanto de los Usuarios adultos como de los Usuarios menores no se divulgará, salvo para los propósitos que se indican a continuación, que incluyen fines relativos a nuestras operaciones:
A terceros que prestan determinados servicios para nosotros, por ejemplo, procesar tarjetas de crédito, realizar la investigación sobre el impacto educativo de los Servicios o filtrar el texto ingresado por los Usuarios al usar el Chat educativo, siempre que los proveedores de servicios se comprometan a mantener la confidencialidad de la información y usarla solamente para los fines permitidos por esta Política de privacidad. Al continuar utilizando los Servicios, usted nos indica intencionadamente que transmitamos la información que nos envían los Usuarios adultos a nuestras filiales y socios comerciales con fines comerciales, como la ejecución de transacciones y la prevención del fraude.
Cuando los padres o tutores legales hubiesen vinculado una Cuenta familiar a una Cuenta de profesor, tal como se describe en los
Términos y condiciones
, los Usuarios adultos de ambas Cuentas podrán revisar el progreso y los detalles de sus Usuarios menores en ambas Cuentas.
Según lo consideremos necesario o apropiado, conforme lo establecido antes en Otros usos y divulgaciones, y en otros casos sustancialmente similares a los enumerados en esta sección.
Cuando consideramos que la divulgación se realiza de conformidad con cualquier ley o proceso legal aplicable o cuando es exigida por estos, incluidas las solicitudes legales de las autoridades públicas para cumplir con los requisitos de seguridad nacional o del orden público. Si así lo exige o permite la ley, y si se considera necesario o justificado, podemos notificar a los Usuarios antes de la divulgación.
Sujeto a los acuerdos de confidencialidad, a los términos de esta Política de privacidad y a las leyes aplicables, la información podrá revelarse a proveedores de servicios, asesores, posibles socios transaccionales u otros terceros en relación con consideraciones, negociaciones o la finalización de una transacción corporativa en la que fuésemos adquiridos por otra compañía o si se realizara una fusión con otra empresa, o si vendiéramos, liquidáramos, transfiriéramos o concediéramos una licencia sobre la totalidad o una parte de nuestros activos en una quiebra o de otro modo. Esto significa que, si alguno o todos nuestros activos se adquiriesen o, de otro modo, transfiriesen o concediesen en licencia, inclusive en situación de quiebra, dicho adquirente estará sujeto a los mismos compromisos establecidos en esta Política de privacidad.
Además, con respecto a las Cuentas de consumidor y otras, podremos utilizar redes publicitarias de terceros y otras filiales, junto con las cookies, los pixeles de seguimiento o los IFrames, para las visitas de los Usuarios adultos a las partes de los Servicios no dirigidas a menores y (1) para ofrecer publicidad basada en los intereses a esos Usuarios adultos, incluida nuestra publicidad, cuando estos Usuarios adultos visiten sitios web de terceros; y (2) para proporcionarnos estadísticas sobre la efectividad de nuestra publicidad en los sitios web de terceros. Estas redes de publicidad de terceros pueden utilizar esta información de cookies de acuerdo con sus propias políticas de privacidad.
No divulgamos la IP de ningún Usuario menor a terceros para fines promocionales o de marketing. Esto también significa que no compartimos la IP de menores de 16 años a cambio de una contraprestación económica.
También podemos divulgar Información de Usuarios anonimizada o agrupada para cualquier otro fin permitido por las leyes aplicables, por ejemplo, la distribución de registros de Usuarios anonimizados a investigadores externos o la distribución de informes que contienen patrones de tráfico y demográficos de Usuarios agrupados, siempre que no pueda identificarse de manera fácil a ningún Usuario adulto o Usuario menor en forma individual ni a ningún dispositivo de usuario final específico.
6.
Cómo acceder, cambiar o eliminar la información de la cuenta
Cuentas de consumidor y otras:
Un Usuario adulto puede revisar o cambiar la información que proporcionó cuando se registró para los Servicios, lo que incluye agregar o eliminar Usuarios menores en la Cuenta, actualizar la información a través de la sección para padres de los Servicios o (para Cuentas de profesor o Cuentas de centro comunitario) usar la función de Generador de clase o Configuración en el Tablero del profesor. Asimismo, los Usuarios adultos pueden comunicarse con nosotros en cualquier momento, tal como se describe en la
sección 13 (Comuníquese con nosotros)
más adelante, para solicitar que les brindemos para su revisión o que eliminemos de nuestros registros toda IP que hayan proporcionado sobre los Usuarios menores asociados a sus Cuentas, o que dejemos de recopilar IP sobre esos Usuarios menores, según corresponda. Tenga en cuenta que una solicitud de eliminación de IP puede conllevar la cancelación de su Cuenta o la incapacidad de utilizar ciertos Servicios y, si una Cuenta de profesor o Cuenta de centro comunitario estuviese vinculada a una Cuenta familiar, una solicitud para eliminar IP en una de las Cuentas puede reflejarse en su otra Cuenta.
Cuando cambiemos o eliminemos IP a solicitud suya, procuraremos de buena fe efectuar los cambios en nuestras bases de datos activas en ese momento tan pronto como fuese razonablemente posible, por lo general, en un plazo de 24 a 48 horas. Cambiar las opciones de configuración puede no dar lugar a cambios inmediatos en la configuración, que están sujetos a nuestras operaciones y programas de mantenimiento. Tenga en cuenta que la información puede permanecer en registros de copias de seguridad o archivo, y podemos conservar ciertos datos pertinentes para prevenir el fraude o abusos futuros, o para fines comerciales legítimos, como el análisis de datos agrupados no identificables o anónimos, la recuperación de una Cuenta o si así lo exigiesen las leyes. Todos los datos conservados seguirán estando sujetos a la Política de privacidad vigente en ese momento.
Cuentas escolares:
Si utiliza los Servicios a través de una Cuenta escolar que está integrada con un sistema de información de alumnos (Student Information System,
SIS
), salvo que las leyes exijan lo contrario, cualquier solicitud de acceso, modificación o eliminación de IP que incluya Datos de estudiantes, debe ser realizada por la Institución educativa dentro del SIS. Una vez que los cambios se hayan realizado dentro del SIS, tales cambios aparecerán de manera automática dentro de la Cuenta escolar.
Si utiliza los Servicios a través de una Cuenta escolar, y la Institución educativa no está integrando sus SIS con los Servicios, salvo que las leyes requiriesen lo contrario, cualquier solicitud de acceso, modificación o eliminación de IP que incluya Datos de estudiantes deberá realizarla el administrador designado de la Institución educativa para la Cuenta escolar. Los administradores tendrán acceso a las páginas de Perfil de usuario de la Cuenta escolar para actualizar, corregir o eliminar la información que este contiene.
7.
Cancelación y reactivación de la Cuenta; eliminación de datos
A excepción de las Cuentas relacionadas con una biblioteca, las Cuentas de centro comunitario o las Cuentas escolares, los Usuarios adultos pueden cancelar en cualquier momento sus Cuentas a través de la sección para padres o la sección del Tablero del profesor de los Servicios. Los bibliotecarios y aquellos que tengan Cuentas de biblioteca personales o Cuentas de préstamo bibliotecario desde casa pueden comunicarse con nosotros tal como se describe en la
sección 13 (Comuníquese con nosotros)
más adelante para cancelar dichas Cuentas.
Para las Cuentas familiares que se hayan cancelado y para las Cuentas de biblioteca personales y las Cuentas de préstamo bibliotecario desde casa, si la Cuenta permanece inactiva durante 24 meses, eliminaremos toda la IP de Usuarios menores que haya en nuestras bases de datos activas asociadas con la Cuenta (la
Información de la cuenta
), a menos que se establezca lo contrario en esta Política de privacidad. El plazo de 24 meses se da para que, tras la cancelación de una Cuenta familiar o de un período de inactividad, pueda reactivar su Cuenta, y posiblemente recuperar la información anterior para reanudar el uso de la Cuenta en el punto en el que el Usuario menor la dejó. No utilizaremos la IP del Usuario menor para ningún otro fin que no sea la reactivación de la Cuenta. Sin embargo, no ofrecemos garantía, y no tendremos responsabilidad ni obligación de asegurar que toda la Información de la cuenta y el progreso relacionado con los Servicios estén disponibles o accesibles, o que todas las funciones de aprendizaje o personalización puedan recuperarse o reanudarse. Si un Usuario solicita que se elimine la IP antes de finalizado el período de inactividad de 24 meses, tomaremos las medidas que sean razonables desde el punto de vista comercial para cumplir con esa solicitud. Sin embargo, si el Usuario reside en un estado donde la ley exige protecciones de privacidad adicionales (consulte la sección 8 para obtener una lista de estos estados), regirán las disposiciones de la sección 8 a continuación. En el caso de las Cuentas familiares, otra información que los Usuarios adultos hayan proporcionado, como la dirección de correo electrónico del Usuario adulto, la edad (solamente el año, pero no el día ni el mes de nacimiento), la cantidad de niños asociados con la Cuenta y el precio y la duración de la suscripción, se conservarán durante un total de 5 años después de la cancelación.
En el caso de las Cuentas de profesor y las Cuentas de centro comunitario, si usted cancela su Cuenta, eliminaremos toda la Información de la Cuenta 48 horas después de la cancelación, a menos que un padre o tutor legal de un Usuario menor se haya vinculado a la Cuenta, en cuyo caso, eliminaremos la Información de la Cuenta de dicho Usuario menor, tal como se describe en el párrafo anterior.
Tenga en cuenta que cancelar toda una Cuenta de profesor o una Cuenta de centro comunitario dará lugar a la pérdida de todos los datos de actividades y progreso para todos los Usuarios menores, a excepción de aquellos Usuarios menores cuyos padres o tutores legales se hayan vinculado a la Cuenta.
Si una Cuenta de profesor o una Cuenta de centro comunitario no se cancela, eliminaremos toda la Información de esa cuenta 24 meses después de la última actividad en la Cuenta.
Para las Cuentas escolares, si un Usuario adulto se comunica inicialmente con nosotros, primero informaremos a la Institución educativa correspondiente antes de tomar cualquier medida solicitada por el Usuario adulto y, con sujeción a la ley aplicable, esperaremos las instrucciones de la Institución educativa. Si una Institución educativa rescinde su acuerdo con nosotros, eliminaremos o, si lo solicita la Institución educativa, le transferiremos todos los Datos de estudiantes en un plazo de 90 días (o un período menor si así lo exige la ley aplicable o los términos de nuestro acuerdo con la Institución educativa), después de la rescisión del acuerdo con la Institución educativa correspondiente.
Tras la cancelación de la Cuenta, de todos modos podrá conservarse de manera interna, en nuestros registros de archivos o bases de datos similares, la Información de Usuarios adultos y menores anonimizada y podrán seguir siendo utilizada, de manera anónima, para fines de soporte interno, administrativo y de mantenimiento de registros, lo que incluye, por ejemplo, para permitirnos mejorar los Servicios y otros servicios que brindamos a través de la investigación, la evaluación y el análisis, según lo permitan las leyes aplicables.
Tenga en cuenta que, después de que se solicite la eliminación de información o la cancelación de su Cuenta en virtud de las secciones 6 o 7 de esta Política de privacidad, la información que incluya IP puede permanecer en registros de copias de seguridad o archivo, y podremos conservar determinados datos si así lo exigiesen las leyes, según fuesen pertinentes para prevenir el fraude o abusos futuros, o para fines comerciales legítimos, como la recuperación de una cuenta y la asistencia al cliente, y todo esto estará sujeto a nuestros períodos de conservación de registros internos. Todos los datos retenidos seguirán estando sujetos a la Política de privacidad vigente en ese momento.
8.
Derechos de privacidad específicos según el estado
Los estados con leyes integrales de privacidad de datos del consumidor pueden proporcionar a los residentes derechos adicionales con respecto al uso que hacemos de la IP. La siguiente sección se aplica a las personas que residen en jurisdicciones específicas que proporcionan derechos de privacidad adicionales, incluidos
California, Colorado, Connecticut, Utah y Virginia
(“
Estados pertinentes
”).
En virtud de las leyes de los Estados pertinentes, estamos obligados a divulgar las categorías de las fuentes de las que recopilamos la IP (según se explica más adelante) y los terceros con quienes la compartimos (según se explicó anteriormente). También tenemos la obligación de comunicar la información sobre los derechos que tiene en virtud de lo establecido por las leyes de los Estados pertinentes, tales como:
Derecho a acceder a información específica y derecho de portabilidad de datos:
tiene derecho a solicitar que le divulguemos determinada información sobre nuestra recopilación y uso de IP durante los últimos doce (12) meses. Una vez que recibamos y confirmemos su solicitud de consumidor verificable, le informaremos lo siguiente:
Las categorías de IP que recopilamos sobre usted.
Las categorías de fuentes para la IP que recopilamos sobre usted.
Nuestro propósito empresarial o comercial para recopilar o vender esa IP.
Las categorías de terceros con los que compartimos esa IP.
Los datos específicos de IP que recopilamos sobre usted (también denominado solicitud de portabilidad de datos).
El fin comercial para el cual se divulgó la IP, y las categorías de IP que cada categoría de destinatario obtuvo si divulgamos la IP para un fin comercial.
Derecho a corregir información:
Tiene derecho a solicitar que actualicemos la IP sobre usted que sea incorrecta en nuestros sistemas.
Derecho a la
eliminación:
Tiene derecho a solicitar que eliminemos la IP que hemos recopilado de usted, con ciertas excepciones. Emplearemos medios razonables desde el punto de vista comercial para cumplir con su solicitud, de conformidad con las leyes aplicables, lo que incluye comunicarnos con su Institución educativa que podrá brindarnos orientación sobre su solicitud. Una vez que recibamos y confirmemos su solicitud de consumidor verificable, eliminaremos (y ordenaremos a nuestros proveedores de servicios que eliminen) la IP de nuestros registros, a menos que se aplique una excepción. No obstante, tenga en cuenta que podríamos necesitar o estar obligados a conservar dicha información para nuestros fines comerciales legítimos o para cumplir con las leyes aplicables.
Derecho a
excluirse
de
la venta o
intercambio
de información personal para publicidad conductual intercontextual:
Tal como se mencionó antes en el Resumen de los puntos clave, jamás monetizaremos la IP de ningún Usuario de los Servicios proporcionándola a un tercero a cambio de dinero. Algunas leyes de los Estados pertinentes aplican una definición más amplia del término “vender”, que incluye divulgar la IP a un tercero a cambio de una contraprestación económica. Cuando trabajamos con nuestros socios publicitarios, divulgamos cierta información (por ejemplo, cookies por sus servicios), que son de valor para nosotros. Puede tener derecho a pedirnos que dejemos de divulgar su IP a terceros a cambio de dinero o de otro tipo de contraprestación económica. Puede ejercer ese derecho a excluirse aquí:
No vendan mi información personal
.
Derecho a limitar el uso de información personal confidencial:
Tiene derecho a limitar el uso de la IP confidencial relacionada con usted.
Sin discriminación:
No lo discriminaremos por ejercer alguno de sus derechos.
Para obtener detalles sobre el ejercicio de estos derechos, le solicitamos que consulte
“Ejercicio de los derechos de acceso, divulgación, portabilidad de datos y eliminación”
más adelante.
Información que recopilamos y compartimos
Recopilamos información que identifica, se relaciona, describe, hace referencia, puede asociarse o vincularse de modo razonable, directa o indirectamente, con un consumidor u grupo familiar en particular.
Hemos recopilado las siguientes categorías de IP de consumidores o sobre consumidores en los últimos 12 meses:
Categoría
Ejemplos
Recopilada de
adultos
menores
A. Identificadores
Un nombre real, alias, identificador personal exclusivo, identificador en línea, dirección de protocolo de Internet, dirección de correo electrónico, número de teléfono, nombre de la Cuenta u otros identificadores similares.
Sí
Sí
B. Categorías de IP
Nombre, firma, número de seguro social, características o descripción físicas, domicilio, número de teléfono, número de pasaporte, número de licencia de conducir o de tarjeta de identificación estatal, número de póliza de seguro, educación, empleo, historial laboral, número de cuenta bancaria, número de tarjeta de crédito, número de tarjeta de débito o cualquier otra información financiera, información médica o información de seguros médicos. Cierta IP incluida en esta categoría podría superponerse con la de otras categorías.
Sí
Sí (nombre solamente)
C. Características de clasificación protegidas en virtud de las leyes estatales o federales aplicables
Sexo (incluido el género).
Sí
Sí
D. Información comercial
Registros de bienes personales; productos o servicios comprados, obtenidos o considerados; u otros historiales o tendencias de compra o consumo.
Sí
No
E. Información biométrica
Características genéticas, fisiológicas, conductuales y biológicas o patrones de actividad utilizados para extraer un modelo u otro identificador o información de identificación, como huellas dactilares, huellas faciales, huellas de voz, escaneos de iris o retina, pulsación de teclas, modo de caminar u otros patrones físicos y datos de sueño, salud o ejercicio.
No
No
F. Actividad en Internet u otras redes similares
Historial de navegación; historial de búsqueda; o información sobre la interacción de un consumidor con un sitio web, aplicación o publicidad.
Sí
Sí (solamente el progreso de un niño dentro de la aplicación).
G. Datos de geolocalización
Ubicación o movimientos físicos.
No
No
H. Datos sensoriales
Información de audio, electrónica, visual, térmica, olfativa o similar.
No
Sí
I. Información profesional o relacionada con el empleo
Historial laboral actual o pasado, o evaluaciones de desempeño.
No
No
J. Información educativa no pública (según la Ley de Derechos Educativos y Privacidad de la Familia [título 20, sección 1232g del U.S.C, título 34, parte 99 del CFR])
Registros educativos directamente relacionados con un estudiante, como calificaciones, listas de clases, horarios del estudiante y códigos de identificación del estudiante, mantenidos por una institución educativa o parte que actúe en su nombre.
No
No
K. Inferencias extraídas de otra IP
Información del perfil que refleja las preferencias, características, tendencias psicológicas, predisposiciones, conducta, actitudes, inteligencia, capacidades y aptitudes de una persona.
Sí
Sí
L. IP confidencial
Número de seguro social, licencia de conducir, tarjeta de identificación estatal o número de pasaporte; inicio de sesión de la cuenta, cuenta financiera, número de tarjeta de débito o número de tarjeta de crédito en combinación con un código de seguridad o acceso, contraseña, o credenciales que permitan el acceso a una cuenta; ubicación geográfica precisa; origen racial o étnico; creencias religiosas o filosóficas; contenido de correo postal, correo electrónico y mensajes de texto; y datos genéticos.
No
No
Asimismo, estamos obligados a brindarle determinada información sobre los fines empresariales y comerciales para los que recopilamos y compartimos IP.
Fines empresariales y comerciales para los que utilizamos la Información personal
Podemos usar o divulgar la IP que recopilamos de cada una de las categorías de IP enumeradas anteriormente para uno o más de los siguientes fines:
Satisfacer o cumplir con el motivo por el que proporcionó la información.
Brindar, apoyar, personalizar y desarrollar nuestros Servicios.
Procesar sus solicitudes.
Brindarle apoyo y responder a sus consultas, lo que incluye investigar y abordar sus inquietudes, y controlar y mejorar nuestras respuestas.
Brindar atención al cliente.
Comprender cómo interactúan los Usuarios con nuestros Servicios.
Llevar a cabo investigaciones, pruebas, análisis y desarrollo.
Detectar incidentes de seguridad y prevenir fraudes.
Depurar y reparar errores.
Crear, mantener, personalizar y proteger la Cuenta que tiene con nosotros.
Responder a solicitudes efectuadas por las fuerzas del orden público y según lo exijan las leyes aplicables, una orden judicial o reglamentaciones gubernamentales.
Según se le describa cuando recopilemos su IP o según se establezca en las leyes de los Estados pertinentes.
Promover nuestros intereses comerciales y económicos, como la presentación de publicidad basada en los intereses de nuestros productos y servicios a Usuarios adultos y el análisis de la efectividad de nuestra publicidad.
Evaluar o llevar a cabo una fusión, desinversión, reestructuración, reorganización, disolución u otra venta o transferencia de algunos o todos nuestros activos, ya sea como una asunto en curso o como parte de una quiebra, liquidación o procedimiento similar, en el que la IP que tenemos sobre nuestros Usuarios/consumidores se encuentra entre los activos transferidos.
Categorías de Información personal que compartimos
Podemos compartir su IP al divulgarla a un tercero con un fin comercial, según se describe a continuación. Solo realizamos estas divulgaciones con fines comerciales en virtud de contratos escritos que describen los propósitos, requieren que el destinatario mantenga la confidencialidad de la IP y prohíben el uso de la información divulgada para cualquier otro fin que no sea para cumplir con el contrato.
En los 12 meses anteriores, también hemos divulgado las siguientes categorías de IP para uno o más fines comerciales:
Categoría de información personal
Categoría de destinatarios externos
Divulgación de información personal de adultos y niños con fines comerciales
Ventas
A. Identificadores
Filiales, socios, organizaciones matrices/subsidiarias, proveedores de servicios, redes publicitarias (solo se aplica a la IP de adultos) y entidades gubernamentales.
Redes publicitarias
B. El cliente registra las categorías de IP
Filiales, socios, organizaciones matrices/subsidiarias, proveedores de servicios, redes publicitarias (solo se aplica a la IP de adultos) y entidades gubernamentales.
Redes publicitarias
C. Características de clasificación protegidas en virtud de las leyes estatales o federales aplicables
No
No
D. Información comercial
No
No
E. Información biométrica
No
No
F. Actividad en Internet u otras redes similares
No
Redes publicitarias y socios
G. Datos de geolocalización
No
No
H. Datos sensoriales
Proveedores de servicios.
No
I. Información profesional o relacionada con el empleo
No
No
J. Información educativa no pública
No
No
K. Inferencias extraídas de otra IP
Filiales, socios, organizaciones matrices/subsidiarias, proveedores de servicios, redes publicitarias (solo se aplica a la IP de adultos) y entidades gubernamentales.
No
L. IP confidencial
No
No
Nuestra retención de información personal
Conservamos la IP durante el tiempo que sea necesario para prestar los servicios y cumplir con las transacciones que ha solicitado, o para otros fines comerciales, como cumplir con nuestras obligaciones legales, resolver conflictos y hacer cumplir nuestros acuerdos. Decidimos cuánto tiempo necesitamos la IP caso por caso. Podemos considerar los siguientes factores al tomar decisiones de retención:
si necesitamos conservar parte de su IP para mantener su Cuenta;
si estamos obligados por ley a conservar algunos tipos de IP durante determinados períodos de tiempo para cumplir con nuestras obligaciones legales; y
si necesitamos parte de su IP para otros fines comerciales, como prevenir daños y garantizar la seguridad de nuestros Servicios, investigar posibles violaciones de nuestros términos y condiciones de uso, o para protegernos.
Si determinamos que su IP ya no es necesaria utilizando los factores anteriores, generalmente destruiremos o anonimizaremos esa IP.
Ejercicio de los derechos de acceso, divulgación, portabilidad de datos y eliminación
Para ejercer los derechos de acceso, divulgación, portabilidad de datos y eliminación descritos con anterioridad, sírvase enviarnos una solicitud de consumidor verificable, comunicándose con nosotros tal como se detalla en la
sección 13 (Comuníquese con nosotros)
más adelante o ingresando aquí:
Portal de privacidad
.
Solo usted o una persona inscrita ante el Secretario de estado correspondiente autorizada por usted para actuar en su nombre y representación podrá presentar una solicitud de consumidor verificable en relación con su IP. También puede hacer una solicitud de consumidor verificable en representación de sus hijos.
En todas las solicitudes, por favor indique claramente que está relacionada con “Sus derechos de privacidad”, aclare qué tipo de solicitud está realizando y proporcione su nombre y una dirección de correo electrónico o número de teléfono donde podamos contactarlo. No somos responsables de los avisos que no estén etiquetados o enviados correctamente, o que no incluyan la información completa.
Puede presentar una solicitud de consumidor verificable en lo que se refiere a acceso o portabilidad de los datos solo dos veces dentro de un período de 12 meses. La solicitud de consumidor verificable debe:
Brindar información suficiente que nos permita verificar de manera razonable que usted es la persona sobre la cual recopilamos la IP o es un representante autorizado. Verificaremos su solicitud pidiéndole que proporcione información relativa a sus interacciones con nosotros. No le solicitaremos IP que de otro modo no mantendríamos como parte de la prestación de nuestros Servicios.
Describir su solicitud con el grado de detalle suficiente que nos permita comprenderla, evaluarla y responderla correctamente.
No podremos responder a su solicitud ni brindarle la IP si no pudiéramos verificar su identidad o autoridad para presentar tal solicitud ni confirmar que la IP se relaciona con usted. No es necesario que cree una cuenta con nosotros para presentar una solicitud de consumidor verificable. Solo utilizaremos la IP proporcionada en una solicitud de consumidor verificable a los efectos de confirmar la identidad o autoridad del interesado para efectuar la solicitud.
Nos esforzamos por responder a una solicitud de consumidor verificable dentro de los 45 días de su recepción. Si necesitamos más tiempo (hasta 90 días), le informaremos el motivo y el período de extensión por escrito. Entregaremos nuestra respuesta por escrito electrónicamente. Cualquier divulgación que proporcionemos solo cubrirá el período de 12 meses anterior a la recepción de la solicitud de consumidor verificable. La respuesta que proporcionemos también explicará los motivos por los que no podemos cumplir con una solicitud, si corresponde. Para las solicitudes de portabilidad de datos, seleccionaremos un formato para proporcionar la IP que sea fácilmente utilizable y que le permita transmitir la información de una entidad a otra sin problemas.
No cobramos un cargo por procesar o responder a su solicitud de consumidor verificable, a menos que sea excesiva, repetitiva o manifiestamente infundada. Si determinamos que la solicitud justifica un cargo, le informaremos por qué tomamos esa decisión y le proporcionaremos una estimación de costos antes de completar su solicitud.
Para apelar una decisión con respecto a una solicitud de derechos del consumidor, le pedimos que envíe su apelación a través de nuestro portal, correo electrónico, teléfono o correo postal. Su apelación debe incluir una explicación del motivo por el cual no está de acuerdo con nuestra decisión. Dentro de los 60 días de la recepción de una apelación, le informaremos por escrito sobre cualquier medida tomada o no tomada en respuesta a la apelación, lo que incluye una explicación por escrito de los motivos de las decisiones.
Sin discriminación
Apoyamos plenamente sus derechos de privacidad y no lo discriminaremos por ejercerlos.
Aviso de incentivos financieros
Podemos ofrecer incentivos especiales a los usuarios que se inscriban en determinadas promociones. La disponibilidad de estas promociones para usted en un momento dado variará. Si ofrecemos esos programas, podremos solicitar su IP (como su dirección de correo electrónico) como requisito previo para participar en la promoción.
Las promociones que pueden estar disponibles para usted son ofertas por correo electrónico. Cuando se suscribe para recibir correos electrónicos de la Compañía, podemos ofrecerle ahorros especiales en forma de cupones digitales para productos gratuitos o con descuento y anuncios de sorteos, concursos y obsequios. Para participar en estas ofertas por correo electrónico, debe proporcionar una dirección de correo electrónico válida. Puede incluirse para recibir las ofertas por correo electrónico, visitando nuestro sitio web o navegando por su Cuenta. Puede excluirse de las ofertas por correo electrónico y otros programas en cualquier momento a través de los mismos medios que se ofrecen, o comunicándose con nosotros según lo dispuesto en la sección 13 más adelante.
El valor que damos a la IP que recopilamos en relación con estas promociones se calcula determinando el gasto adicional aproximado por participante en la promoción, en comparación con las personas de las que no tenemos direcciones de correo electrónico u otra información recopilada.
9. Enlaces a otros servicios
En algunas secciones de los Servicios, podremos incluir enlaces a sitios web o aplicaciones externas (por ejemplo, Facebook y Twitter). Sin embargo, para impedir que los niños accediesen a estos sitios web externos, un Usuario adulto debe introducir una contraseña válida. Estos sitios web y aplicaciones están regidos por sus propias políticas de privacidad o prácticas de recopilación de información, que pueden ser sustancialmente diferentes de las nuestras. Lo alentamos a revisar las políticas de privacidad y las prácticas de recopilación de información de cualquier sitio web y aplicación externos, ya que las prácticas de dichas partes no estarían sujetas a lo dispuesto en esta política.
10. Ubicación del procesamiento de la Información
Controlamos y operamos los Servicios desde los Estados Unidos de América. Podrá almacenarse y procesarse su información en cualquier país en el que tengamos instalaciones o en el que contratemos a proveedores de servicios, inclusive Estados Unidos, que pueden tener normas de protección de datos diferentes de las que se aplican en su país. Además, su información puede estar sujeta a solicitudes de acceso de gobiernos, tribunales o funcionarios del orden público en países donde se pueda procesarse, según las leyes de esos países.
11.
Seguridad
La seguridad de su IP es importante para nosotros, y empleamos medidas de seguridad físicas, técnicas y administrativas concebidas para resguardar la información que recopilan los Servicios. Utilizamos el cifrado LSS (tecnología de capa de sockets seguros) estándar en la industria para transferir IP. Otras medidas de seguridad incluyen, entre otras, cifrado de datos, cortafuegos y controles de acceso físico a edificios y archivos. También llevamos a cabo auditorías periódicas de nuestra seguridad (no menos de una vez al año) para aplicar las mejores prácticas y estándares razonables de la industria. Los titulares de Cuentas crean una contraseña en el proceso de registro. Puede ayudar a proteger su Cuenta e IP contra el acceso no autorizado al seleccionar y proteger su contraseña de forma adecuada y al limitar el acceso a su computadora y navegador cerrando la sesión cada vez que terminase de acceder a su Cuenta. En el registro, asignamos un ID de socio a cada Cuenta y utilizamos esos ID de socio para validar inicios de sesión, permitir acceso al contenido de suscripción, y supervisar el cumplimiento. El ID de socio también se utiliza para validar a los usuarios cuando solicitan asistencia técnica. El acceso a la información es limitado (a través de credenciales de Usuario/contraseña y validación de dos factores) a aquellos empleados que la necesiten para realizar sus funciones laborales.
Sin embargo, no se puede garantizar que la transmisión de datos por Internet sea completamente segura. Si se produce una infracción de nuestra seguridad, se lo notificaremos cuando así lo exija la ley o cuando se considere necesario y apropiado según las circunstancias.
Cuentas escolares
Nos comprometemos a mantener la seguridad y confidencialidad de su información y la de sus niños, incluidos, entre otros, los Datos de estudiantes que recibimos a través de las Cuentas escolares. Algunas de las precauciones que tomamos incluyen (a) limitar el acceso de los empleados a su IP y a la de sus niños solamente a aquellos empleados que necesiten acceder a ella para cumplir con sus responsabilidades laborales; (b) verificar los antecedentes de nuestros empleados y, en concreto, de todos los empleados que pudieran tener acceso a Datos de estudiantes; (c) exigir que los empleados firmen acuerdos de confidencialidad en el momento de su contratación; (d) educar y capacitar con regularidad a los empleados en materia de privacidad y seguridad de datos; y (e) proteger la IP con medidas de seguridad técnicas, contractuales, administrativas y físicas que sean razonables desde el punto de vista comercial.
Sin embargo, tenga en cuenta que ningún sistema de información puede garantizar que sea 100 % seguro, así que no podemos garantizar la seguridad absoluta de su información. Además, no somos responsables de la seguridad de la información que usted transmite a los Servicios a través de redes que no controlamos, lo que incluye Internet y redes inalámbricas. Si tiene motivos para creer que su interacción con nosotros no es segura, le solicitamos que se comunique con nosotros tal como se describe en la
sección 13 (Comuníquese con nosotros)
más adelante.
12.
Cambios en nuestra política de privacidad
Intentamos ofrecer constantemente los mejores servicios y, en consecuencia, nuestra Política de privacidad sufrirá cambios periódicamente. Si actualizamos esta Política de privacidad, se lo notificaremos mediante la publicación de la Política de privacidad revisada en los Servicios, y para algunas revisiones que amplían sustancialmente la manera en la que utilizamos o compartimos la información recopilada con anterioridad sobre usted a través de los Servicios, exhibiremos una alerta junto a la Política de privacidad o una alerta al iniciar sesión en los Servicios, o directamente nos comunicaremos con usted (por ejemplo, a través de la dirección de correo electrónico asociada a su Cuenta).
Si tiene una Cuenta escolar, cualquier modificación a esta Política de privacidad solamente se aplicará a usted y a sus Usuarios menores, de conformidad con nuestro acuerdo con su Institución educativa.
13.
Comuníquese con nosotros
Age of Learning, Inc. se encuentra ubicada en los Estados Unidos de América. Age of Learning, Inc. es el operador de todos los Servicios. Puede comunicarse con nosotros a continuación si tiene preguntas, quejas u otros problemas relacionados con esta Política de privacidad y cuestiones relacionadas con su información o la de un Usuario menor del que es responsable:
Dirección postal:
Age of Learning, Inc. Attention: Legal Department P.O. Box 230 Glendale, CA 91209 USA
Número de teléfono: +1.800.633.3331
Dirección de correo electrónico:
privacy@aofl.com
Funcionario de privacidad de datos (Data Privacy Officer)
DPO@aofl.com
101 N. Brand Blvd., 8th Floor
Glendale, California 91203
Sub-policy 3
https://www.ageoflearning.com/abc-privacy-current-aus/:
Skip to content
ABCmouse Privacy Policy: Australia – New Zealand - Singapore
Effective Date: October 29, 2024
Previous Privacy Policy: July 11, 2019
1.
Introduction
Welcome to ABCmouse.com®
Early Learning Academy
(
ABCmouse
), which is owned and operated by Age of Learning, Inc. We are committed to providing children with a learning environment where every activity is just as fun as it is educational and where you can feel confident that your children’s privacy is protected.
This Privacy Policy describes the ways in which Age of Learning, Inc., and its subsidiaries (collectively,
we
,
our
,
us
, or the
Company
) collect, process, and disclose information about our Users (as defined below) within Australia, New Zealand and Singapore, and the children who use the accounts of our Australian, New Zealand and Singaporean Users through ABCmouse, and any other websites, applications, and online services (
Apps
) that link to this Privacy Policy (collectively, the
Services
). Our Services are directed toward nursery school through second-grade aged children.
This Privacy Policy applies across the following jurisdictions: Australia (where the Australian Privacy Act 1988 (Cth) (
AU Privacy Act
) applies), New Zealand (where the New Zealand Privacy Act 2020 (
NZ Privacy Act
) applies), and Singapore (where the Singapore Personal Data Protection Act 2012 (
SG Protection Act
) applies) (collectively the
Privacy Acts
).
2.
Personal Information
For the purposes of this Privacy Policy, the term “Personal Information” encompasses both the definition of “personal data” under the SG Protection Act and the respective definitions of “personal information” under the AU Privacy Act and NZ Privacy Act.
Please read this Privacy Policy carefully to understand our views and practices regarding your Personal Information and how we will treat it. By using the Services, you acknowledge reading this Privacy Policy and that we will use your Personal Information in accordance with the terms of this Privacy Policy. We may provide additional privacy notices to individuals at the time we collect their Personal Information. This type of an “in-time” notice will govern how we may process the Personal Information you provide at that time. If you do not agree to our use of your Personal Information in line with this Privacy Policy, please do not use the Services.
3.
Types of Accounts, Services, and Users
How we collect, process, and disclose Personal Information depends on the type of account held and the type of User (as defined below). We currently offer consumers
Family Accounts
, which are detailed in our
Terms & Conditions
.
Users of the Services include
Child Users
(any child under 16 who uses the learning portion of the Services) and
Adult Users
(including parents, legal guardians and anyone with parental responsibility for Child Users, purchasers of an Account as a gift (
Gift Account
)), whom are collectively referred to as
Users
.
4.
Personal Information
We Collect and How We Collect it
a.
Personal Information Users Provide
In addition to collections permitted or required by relevant law, we collect Personal Information directly from Users that such Users provide when using the Services, including when Adult Users create an Account, sign up for Services, or contact us with a question, comment, request, or complaint. However, we will only use or disclose this information in accordance with this Privacy Policy and applicable data protection and privacy law. Please see section 7 (When We Disclose Information to Third Parties) for more information about how we limit disclosure of Child User information.
If you created a profile/registered with us, you will have been asked to tick to agree to provide this information to access our Services, purchase our products, and/or view our content.
i. Adult Users
Adult Users are asked to provide certain Personal Information about themselves when registering for any Account, including:
1. first name; 2. last name; 3. email address; and 4. telephone number (optional).
Any other information provided at registration depends on the type of Account or Adult User. For example:
Payment information
is collected from Adult Users who purchase a Family Account, including those who purchase a Gift Account for others. For your security, we do not store your complete credit card number in our databases but retain only the first six digits and last four digits so that we can identify your Account and respond to your requests, questions, or complaints.
In addition, Adult Users can provide us with information through separate password-protected sections (i.e., the Parent section) of the Services. These sections, accessible via the Menu or Settings link on the Services, allow Adult Users to administer their accounts, including when they add Child Users, provide testimonials, seek customer support, or submit comments or questions.
ii. Child Users
Adult Users who register for a Family Account are asked to provide certain Personal Information about the relevant Child Users of such Accounts during ABCmouse® registration, including:
1. the first name (or nickname); 2. birth month and year; and 3. gender of Child Users who will be accessing the Services through their Accounts.
When an Adult User submits any Personal Information relating to a Child User in connection with the Services, the Adult User represents that they have the authority to do so and agree to us using Personal Information in accordance with this Privacy Policy. To the extent legally required, we request Adult Users to consent to the processing of the Personal Information of their Child User. We may also ask Adult Users submitting Personal Information relating to a Child User that they have the capacity and authorization to do so (i.e., holder of the parental responsibility over the child).
Children can create free-form artwork. We encourage you to use the Services with your Child Users and to view and monitor any content created or uploaded (if applicable) by them. If you would like to review all content saved by your Child Users, you can access this content by clicking on the My Files menu item in each Child User’s About Me section of the Services.
Other than in the places and for the purposes explicitly disclosed in this Privacy Policy, we do not knowingly collect any Personal Information directly from Child Users under the age of 16.
b.
Information Automatically Collected from Users
Our third-party service providers also use a variety of technologies, such as pixel tags and cookies (small text files that the Services save on your computer or mobile device), to automatically collect certain technical information from your computer or mobile device—see the Cookie Policy at the end of this Privacy Policy for further details about how pixel tags and cookies are used. The information we collect using pixel tags is not actively linked to our Users’ Personal Information (i.e., account data).
5.
Advertising and Marketing
a.
Advertising
We use third parties such as network advertisers and others to assist us in advertising, including displaying our advertisements on other websites and through social media platforms; we also may use third parties that display advertisements based on your visits to our Services, as well as other websites, and other third parties to assist us in identifying relevant advertising on our Services. These third parties may collect and use click stream information, browser type, device make, model, and operating system, device properties related to screen size, orientation, audio, battery status, device memory usage, settings, and boot time; device settings related to accessibility features (font size, theme and name of mobile carrier), language preferences, time and date, and subject of advertisements clicked or scrolled over during your visits to the Services and other websites to provide advertisements about goods and services likely to be of interest to you. Third-party ad network providers, advertisers, sponsors, and/or traffic measurement services may use cookies, JavaScript, web beacons (including clear GIFs), Flash LSOs, and other technologies to measure the effectiveness of their ads and to personalise advertising content to you. These third-party cookies and other technologies are governed by each third party’s specific privacy policy, not this one.
Advertising to you is based on your visits to the non-child-directed portions of the Services (such as
abcmouse.com.au
,
abcmouse.co.nz
or
abcmouse.com.sg
) when you visit third-party websites and applications. We will never use information collected in the child-directed portions of the Services for targeted advertising purposes.
b.
Marketing
We would like to send you information about our products and Services and those of our associated companies which may be of interest to you. If you have opted in to receive marketing information, you may opt out at any time. If you no longer wish to be contacted for marketing purposes please contact us via the contact details in section 15 (Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us) or click on the Unsubscribe button at the bottom of any email received from us.
You may not opt out of receiving administrative messages from us regarding your Account, such as password reset emails, customer support messages, and emails about changes to our Privacy Policy in accordance with section 14 (Changes to Our Privacy Policy).
While we never intend to send marketing messages to children, if you believe a Child User has received a marketing communication, please contact us as described in section 15 (Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us).
Push Notifications and SMS.
Additionally, if you downloaded the App on your mobile device to access the Services, as part of your use of the Services we may ask if you would like to receive push notifications, which may include alerts and notifications, badges, banners, and sounds on your mobile device. You may choose to stop receiving push notifications at any time by changing the settings on your mobile device. We may also ask if you would like to receive SMS text messages. Please note that your network provider may charge you for the text messages you receive. To permanently stop receiving SMS text messages from us text STOP, CANCEL, or UNSUBSCRIBE in reply to any SMS text message sent by us.
6.
How We Use Your Personal Information
We and our third-party service providers may use the information collected from Users for the following purposes in addition to uses permitted or required by relevant law:
a.
Adult User Personal Information.
Personal Information about Adult Users may be used:
i. to generate a transaction identification number and member identification number, which is used by us to identify certain transactions and Users;
ii. to permit you to register for and use the Services, including, for example, to send you communications about Child User progress or your Account, or to allow you to provide Feedback through the Parent section. For security purposes, the Parent section is password protected;
iii. for paid Accounts, to complete and fulfill your purchase, such as to process your payments, communicate with you regarding your purchase, and provide you with related customer service;
iv. to respond to your enquiries or complaints and fulfill your requests, retrieve your password, or provide technical support;
v. to deliver our advertising to you based on your visits to the non-child-directed portions of the Services (such as www.abcmouse.com), for example, when you visit third-party websites and applications or via postal mail;
vi. to measure the effectiveness of our advertising to adults (see section 5 (Advertising and Marketing) for more information); and
vii. to send you marketing communications that we believe may be of interest to you (see section 5 (Advertising and Marketing) for more information).
b.
Child User Personal Information.
Personal Information about Child Users may be used:
i. to measure a Child User’s performance in activities and to adapt a Child User’s learning experience to the Child User’s learning needs; and
ii. to analyse, provide progress reports on, or provide an assessment of a Child User’s performance to the Adult User on the Account.
c.
Both Adult and Child User Personal Information.
Personal Information about both Adult and Child Users may be used:
i. to allow us to assess and improve the Services, its educational content, and other services we provide, for example, to improve our content and user experience; to research, evaluate, and improve the Services’ educational efficacy; and to inform our understanding of the Services’ user base;
ii. to customise, adapt, and personalise Users’ viewing and content-consumption experience, for example, by measuring a Child User’s performance in activities and adapting the Child User’s learning path to their learning needs;
iii. to maintain and analyse the functioning of the Services; and
iv. as we believe to be necessary or appropriate: (a) under applicable data protection and privacy law, including laws outside your country of residence; (b) to comply with legal process; (c) to respond to requests from public and government authorities, including public and government authorities outside your country of residence; (d) to detect violations of and enforce our
Terms and Conditions
; (e) to protect our operations or those of any of our associates, including the security of the Services; (f) to protect our rights, privacy, safety, or property, or that of our associates, you, or others; and (g) to allow us to pursue available remedies or limit the damages that we may sustain (collectively, (a)-(g) are
Other Uses and Disclosures
).
We will never sell or rent the Personal Information of any User of the Services to a third party, except as described in this Privacy Policy in the context of a sale of the Company.
Where we intend to process your Personal Information for a purpose other than that for which it was originally collected, we will provide you with information on that other purpose and any relevant further information prior to such processing.
7.
When We Disclose Information to Third Parties
Personal Information about both Adult and Child Users will not be disclosed except as follows or as permitted or required by relevant law:
a.
to third parties who perform certain services for us, such as to process debit and credit cards; to conduct or evaluate research (such as on the educational impact of the Services); to provide us with our technical infrastructure (i.e., our host provider), and to provide us with statistics about the effectiveness of our advertising on third-party websites, provided that the service providers agree to keep the information confidential and to use it only for purposes that are set out in this Privacy Policy.
b.
as we believe to be necessary or appropriate as set forth in Other Uses and Disclosures and in other instances substantially similar to those listed in this section;
c.
where legally required and in certain other cases, we may make such disclosures without first providing notice to Users; and
d.
subject to confidentiality agreements, the terms of this Privacy Policy, and applicable data protection and privacy law, information may be disclosed to service providers, advisors, potential transactional partners, or other third parties in connection with the consideration, negotiation, or completion of a corporate transaction in which we are acquired by or merged with another company or we sell, liquidate, transfer, or license all or a portion of our assets in bankruptcy or otherwise. This means that if some or all our assets are acquired or otherwise transferred or licensed, including in bankruptcy, that such acquirer shall be subject to the same commitments stated in this Privacy Policy.
Any third parties to whom we disclose Personal Information are governed by terms of their own privacy policy and this Privacy Policy does not apply to them.
We do not disclose the Personal Information of any Child User to third parties for any marketing or promotional purposes.
As used in this Privacy Policy,
Anonymous Data
means data that does not relate to an identified or identifiable natural person or Personal Information rendered anonymous in such a manner that the Data Subject is not, or is no longer, identifiable.
We may disclose Anonymous Data and/or aggregated User information for any other purpose as permissible by applicable data protection and privacy law—for example, the distribution of de-identified User records to outside researchers or the distribution of reports containing aggregate user demographic and traffic patterns—provided that no individual Adult User or Child User or any specific end-user device can be readily identified.
Our third-party service providers automatically collect certain information (including your Personal Information) directly from users of the Services in the form of the actions they take and activities they complete when using the Services. For example, from Adult Users, they may collect information about patterns of usage and order history; from Child Users, they may collect information about patterns of usage, which activities a child commences and completes, when a child starts and stops an activity, which areas of the Services the child frequents, the number of questions answered correctly or incorrectly, how many Tickets the child earns, what virtual items the child selects to exchange for Tickets, and the child’s choice of Avatar and customisation.
Please refer to their privacy policies for what personal information they collect, how they use it and to who they disclose it.
8.
Overseas Disclosure
/
Location of Personal Information Processing
The Services are controlled and operated by us from the United States of America. Your information may be transferred to, stored, and processed by us, our associates, and our third-party service providers in the United States of America and Mexico, which have data protection laws that are different from those of your country.
In addition, your information may be subject to access requests from governments, courts, or law enforcement officials in countries where it may be processed, under the laws of those countries.
By using the Services, you agree to this transfer, storing, or processing. We will take all steps reasonably necessary to ensure that your Personal Information is treated securely and in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
9.
How to Access or Correct Personal Information
An Adult User can review or change the information they provided when they registered for the Services, including by adding or removing Child Users to or from the Account, by updating information through the Parent section of the Services.
As regards Personal Information which cannot be accessed or changed through the Parent section of the Services, a User may make a request to access a copy of the Personal Information held about themselves, or a Child User associated with their Account. A User may also request to have any of their Personal Information, or the Personal Information of a Child User associated with their Account, corrected or updated. An access or correction request should be submitted as described in section 15 (Complaints, Reporting Violations and Contacting Us). We may only implement requests with respect to the Personal Information associated with the email address that you use to send us your request and we may need to take reasonable steps to verify your identity before responding to your request. We will notify you of the outcome of your request within 20 business days.
We may refuse your request in certain circumstances permitted by law. If we are unable to fulfill your request, we will (i) inform you of the reasons why we are unable to do so; (ii) take reasonable steps to include a note with your personal information illustrating that you made a request for access or correction; and (iii) inform you of the mechanisms available to complain about the refusal.
A fee may be charged to cover our reasonable costs of locating the information in responding to your access request. If this is required we will inform you of the fee before processing the access request.
Changing setting options may not result in immediate changes to the settings, which are subject to our operations and maintenance schedules. Please note that information, including Personal Information, may remain in backup or archive records, and we may retain certain data relevant to preventing fraud or future abuse or for legitimate business purposes, such as analysis of aggregated, non-personally-identifiable or Anonymous Data, account recovery, or if required by law. All retained data will continue to be subject to the Privacy Policy in effect at that time.
10.
Withdrawal of Consent
For Users or Child Users located in Singapore, your consent to the collection, use and disclosure of Personal Information provided at the time of registering for Services will remain valid until such time as you withdraw by giving us reasonable notice in writing to the contact provided in section 15 (Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us).
11.
Account Cancellation and Reactivation
At any time, Adult Users may cancel their Accounts through the Parent section of the Services.
For Accounts that have been cancelled, if the Account remains inactive for 24 months, we will, subject to legal requirements to the contrary, delete all Personal Information in our active databases associated with the Account (
Account Information
). The 24 months is provided so that you have the ability, following cancellation of the Account or inactivity, to reactivate your Account and potentially recover previous information and resume where the Child User left off. However, we provide no guarantee and shall have no liability or obligation to ensure that all Account Information and Services-related progress will be available or accessible or all learning or personalisation features will be able to be recovered or resumed.
12.
Links to Other Services
In certain sections of the Services, we may include links to external websites or applications (for example, Facebook and X (formerly known as Twitter)). However, to protect children from accessing these external websites, an Adult User will be required to enter a valid password. These websites and applications are governed by their own privacy policies or information collection practices, which may be substantially different from ours. We encourage you to review the privacy policies and information collection practices of any external websites and applications, as those parties’ practices would not be subject to this Privacy Policy.
13.
Security
The security of your Personal Information is important to us, and we employ reasonable physical, technical, and administrative security measures designed to safeguard the Personal Information collected by the Services and to guard against unauthorised or unlawful processing of Personal Information and against damage to, accidental loss, or destruction of your Personal Information.
Account holders create a password in the registration process. You can help protect against unauthorised access to your account and Personal Information by selecting and protecting your password appropriately and limiting access to your computer and browser by signing off after you have finished accessing your account. At registration, we assign a Member ID to each Account and use those Member IDs to authenticate logins, allow access to the subscription content, and monitor compliance. The Member ID is also used to authenticate users when requesting technical support. Access to information is limited (through user/password credentials and two-factor authentication) to those employees who require it to perform their job functions.
14.
Changes to Our Privacy Policy
We constantly try to provide the best services, and accordingly our Privacy Policy will change from time to time. If we update this Privacy Policy, we will notify you by posting the revised Privacy Policy on the Services, and for certain revisions that materially expand the ways in which we use or share the information previously collected from you through the Services, display an alert upon your login to the Services, or directly communicate with you (e.g., via the email address associated with your Account).
15.
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
To exercise the access, disclosure, data portability, and deletion rights  submit a verifiable consumer request to us by  visiting here:
Privacy Portal
We are committed to resolving any complaints about our collection or use of your Personal Information. If you want to make a complaint or inquiry regarding this Privacy Policy or our practices in relation to your Personal Information, please contact us as described below with the information regarding your complaint. We will reply as soon as we can and, in any event, within 20 business days.
We hope to resolve any complaint brought to our attention; however, if you feel that your complaint has not been adequately resolved, you reserve the right to contact the competent supervisory authority. In Australia, this is the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner(https://www.oaic.gov.au/). In New Zealand, this is the Office of the Privacy Commissioner (
www.privacy.org.nz
). In Singapore, this is the Personal Data Protection Commission (https://www.pdpc.gov.sg/).
Age of Learning, Inc. is located in the United States of America. Age of Learning, Inc. is the operator of all the Services. Any questions, concerns, or complaints regarding this Privacy Policy, our data collection or processing practices, or issues related to your or a Child User’s information for which you are responsible should be directed to us via any of the following methods.
Postal Address:
Age of Learning, Inc.
Attention: Legal Department
P.O. Box 230
Glendale, CA 91209
USA
Telephone Number: 800.633.3331
Email Address:
privacy@aofl.com
Cookie Policy
1.
What Are Cookies?
Our websites and Apps use cookies, which can be found
here
. Cookies are small text files placed on your device to collect standard internet log information and visitor behaviour information. The cookies may transmit information via your browser with a purpose of authenticating or identifying the computer (via, i.e., the IP address) or the User. Cookies may contain information such as registration data and User preferences.
We use cookies to:
i. automatically collect certain technical information from your computer or mobile device over time and across different websites, including when you use the Services, such as your browser type, operating system, device type, the page served, your IP address and your geolocation as described in ii below. When you download and use our App(s), we and our service providers may track and collect App usage data, such as the date and time the App on your device accesses our servers and what information and files have been downloaded to the App based on your device number;
ii. collect and store information about your location to provide you with educational experiences or email updates that are tailored for your region. The location information we have access to may include (1) your postal code, if you provide one to us; and (2) the approximate geographic region your computer or mobile device is in, as determined from your IP address. However, we do not collect your street name and the name of your city/town. You may be able to change the settings on your computer or mobile device to prevent it from providing us with such IP information;
iii. we may collect information from your mobile device if you have downloaded our App(s). This information is generally used to help us deliver the most relevant information to you. Examples of information that may be collected and used include your IP address, geographic location, how you use the App(s), and information about the type of device you use. In addition, in the event our App(s) crash on your mobile device, we will receive information about your mobile device model software version and device carrier, which allows us to identify and fix bugs and otherwise improve the performance of our App(s). This information is sent to us as aggregated information and is not traceable to any individual and cannot be used to identify an individual. In addition, if you choose to turn on your Bluetooth, wi-fi or other geolocation functionality when you use our App(s), we may collect and use your geolocation information; and
iv. we may also use third-party advertising networks to collect cookie information about Adult Users’ visits to the non-child-directed portions of the Services and to (1) deliver interest-based advertising to those Adult Users, including ABCmouse-branded advertising, when those Adult Users visit third-party websites; and (2) provide us with statistics about the effectiveness of our advertising on third-party websites. These third-party advertising networks may use this cookie information in accordance with their own privacy policies. Please refer to section 7 of our Privacy Policy (When We Disclose Information to Third Parties) for more information about what Personal Information is transferred to our third-party advertising measurement partner.
When a server receives a request from a device which stores a cookie from a website, the server can use the information stored in the cookie in combination with the information stored on the server to allow the website to respond to you as an individual and to tailor their operations to your needs, likes, and dislikes by gathering and remembering information about your preferences. A cookie cannot collect information from your computer and cannot carry any viral or other damaging files.
2.
Managing Your Cookies
Cookies help you to get the most out of our Services, and if you disable cookies some Services or website functionality may not be available. For example, you will not be able to remain logged into your account, and therefore you would have to log in during each page transition. If you do not want the Services to collect information through cookies, you can set your web browser or device to reject cookies from the Services.
Sub-policy 4
https://www.ageoflearning.com/abc-privacyandcookie-gdpr/:
Skip to content
ABCmouse Privacy Policy Europe
Effective Date: December 20, 2024
1.
Introduction
Welcome to ABCmouse.com®
Early Learning Academy
(
ABCmouse
), which is owned and operated by Age of Learning, Inc. We are committed to providing children with a learning environment where every activity is just as fun as it is educational and where you can feel confident that your children’s privacy is protected.
This Privacy Policy describes the ways in which Age of Learning, Inc., and its subsidiaries (collectively,
we
,
our
,
us
, or the
Company
) collect, process, and disclose information about our Users (as defined below) within the European Union and the United Kingdom and the children who use the accounts of our European Users through ABCmouse, and any other websites, applications, and online services (
Apps
) that link to this Privacy Policy (collectively, the
Services
). Our Services are directed toward nursery school through second-grade aged children.
This Privacy Policy applies across multiple jurisdictions, such as the European Union where the General Data Protection Regulation (EU) 2016/679 (
GDPR
) and the Directive on Privacy and Electronic Communications (Directive 2002/58/EC) (
ePrivacy Directive
) apply and the United Kingdom where the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation (
UK GDPR
) and the UK Data Protection Act 2018 (
DPA
) apply (collectively the
Privacy Acts
). References to articles of the GDPR also refer to the corresponding articles of the UK GDPR. References to articles of the ePrivacy Directive include references to the national implementation laws of the individual EU Member States.
For more information about how to contact ABCmouse, please see Section 15.
2.
Personal Data
For the purposes of this Privacy Policy, the term “Personal Data” has the meaning as set out in the GDPR.
Personal Data under the GDPR
The term
Personal Data
is defined in the
GDPR
as “
any information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person
(Data Subject)
; an identifiable natural person is one who can be identified, directly or indirectly, in particular by reference to an identifier such as a name, an identification number, location data, an online identifier or one or more factors specific to the physical, physiological, genetic, mental, economic, cultural, or social identity of that natural person.
”
Please read this Privacy Policy carefully to understand our views and practices regarding your Personal Data and how we will treat it.  We may provide additional privacy notices to individuals at the time we collect their Personal Data. This type of an “in-time” notice will govern how we may process the Personal Data you provide at that time, for which purposes and on which legal basis. If you do not agree to our use of your Personal Data in line with this Privacy Policy, please do not use the Services.
3.
Types of Accounts, Services, and Users
How we collect, process, and disclose Personal Data depends on the type of account held and the type of User (as defined below). We currently offer consumers
Family Accounts
, which are detailed in our
Terms & Conditions
.
Users of the Services include
Child Users
(any child under 16 who uses the learning portion of the Services) and
Adult Users
(including parents, legal guardians and anyone with parental responsibility for Child Users), purchasers of an Account as a gift (
Gift Account
), whom are collectively referred to as
Users
.
4.
Personal Data We Collect and How We Collect it
a.
Personal Data Users Provide
As more fully set forth below, we collect Personal Data directly from Users that such Users provide when using the Services, including when Adult Users create an Account, sign up for Services, or contact us with a question, comment, request, or complaint. However, we will only use or disclose this information in accordance with this Privacy Policy and applicable data protection and privacy law. Please see Section 7 (When We Disclose Information to Third Parties) for more information and how we limit disclosure of Child User information.
If you created a profile/registered with us, you will have been asked to provide this information to access our Services, purchase our products, and/or view our content.
i.
Adult Users
Adult Users are asked to provide certain Personal Data about themselves when registering for any Account, including:
1. first name; 2. last name; 3. email address; and 4. telephone number (optional).
Any other information provided at registration depends on the type of Account or Adult User. For example:
Payment information
is collected from Adult Users who purchase a Family Account, including those who purchase a Gift Account for others. For your security, we do not store your complete credit card number in our databases but retain only the first six digits and last four digits so that we can identify your Account and respond to your requests, questions, or complaints.
The email address of a parent, legal guardian, or person with parental responsibility
is collected when the Adult User purchasing a Family Account states that he or she is not the legal guardian.
In addition, Adult Users can provide us with information through separate password-protected sections (i.e., the Parent section) of the Services. These sections, accessible via the Menu or Settings link on the Services, allow Adult Users to administer their accounts, including when they add Child Users, provide testimonials, seek customer support, or submit comments or questions.
We do not ask for certain sensitive Personal Data such as information revealing racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, or trade union membership, or information concerning genetic, biometric, or health data or data concerning a natural person’s sex life or sexual orientation. However, as mentioned above, paying subscribers are asked for payment information when they subscribe. Please see Section 12 (Security) for more information about how we safeguard payment information.
ii. Child Users
Adult Users who register for a Family Account are asked to provide certain Personal Data about the relevant Child Users of such Accounts during ABCmouse® registration, including:
1. the first name (or nickname); 2. birth month and year; and 3. gender of Child Users who will be accessing the Services through their Accounts.
When an Adult User submits any Personal Data relating to a Child User in connection with the Services, the Adult User represents that they have the authority to do so and agree to us using the Personal Data in accordance with this Privacy Policy. To the extent legally required, we request Adult Users to consent to the processing of the Personal Data of their Child User. We may also ask Adult Users submitting Personal Data relating to a Child User that they have the capacity and authorization to do so (i.e., holder of the parental responsibility over the child).
Children can create free-form artwork. We encourage you to use the Services with your Child Users and to view and monitor any content created or uploaded (if applicable) by them. If you would like to review all content saved by your Child Users, you can access this content by clicking on the My Files menu item in each Child User’s About Me section of the Services.
Other than in the places and for the purposes explicitly disclosed in this Privacy Policy, we do not knowingly collect any Personal Data directly from Child Users under the age of 16.
b.
Personal Data Automatically Collected from Users
Because the security of your Personal Data is important to us, we only ask for Personal Data where it is reasonably necessary to provide the Services, and we only process your Personal Data in accordance with this Privacy Policy and applicable data protection and privacy laws (in particular with the Privacy Acts).
We automatically collect some Personal Data directly from users of the Services in the form of the actions they take and activities they complete when using the Services. For example, from Adult Users, we may collect information about patterns of usage and order history; from Child Users, we may collect information about patterns of usage, which activities a child commences and completes, when a child starts and stops an activity, which areas of the Services the child frequents, the number of questions answered correctly or incorrectly, how many Tickets the child earns, what virtual items the child selects to exchange for Tickets, and the child’s choice of Avatar and customisation.
We also use a variety of technologies, such as pixel tags and cookies (small text files that the Services save on your computer or mobile device), to automatically collect certain technical information from your computer or mobile device—see Section 13 (Cookie Policy) for further details about how we use pixel tags and cookies.
c.
App Store Data
When you download our app from your App Store (e.g. Google Play or Apple App Store), certain required information is transmitted to the App Store you have selected. This information includes in particular your user name, your email address and your customer number of the App Store user account, the time of the download of our app, provided that the app requires payment, your payment information (e.g. credit card data) as well as the individual device identification number (Device ID) of the device on which you download and install our app. We have no influence on these data processing operations. It is conducted exclusively by the respective provider of the App Store and we are not responsible for this processing in the meaning of the data protection laws.
d.
Automated Decision Making and Profiling:
We do not use your Personal Data for the purposes of automated decision-making. However, we may do so in order to fulfil obligations imposed by law, in which case we will inform you of any such processing and provide you with an opportunity to object.
e.
Requirement to Provide Personal Data
The provision of Personal Data is not a statutory or contractual requirement, but a prerequisite to enter into a contract with us. You are not obliged to provide us with your Personal Data, but without the provision of Personal Data as stated in this Section 4, we are not able to provide you with our Services.
5.
Advertising and Marketing
a.
Advertising
We use third parties such as network advertisers and others to assist us in advertising, including displaying our advertisements on other websites and through social media platforms; we also may use third parties that display advertisements based on your visits to our Services, as well as other websites, and other third parties to assist us in identifying relevant advertising on our Services. These third parties may collect and use click stream information, browser type, time and date, and subject of advertisements clicked or scrolled over during your visits to the Services and other websites in order to provide advertisements about goods and services likely to be of interest to you. Third-party ad network providers, advertisers, sponsors, and/or traffic measurement services may use cookies, JavaScript, web beacons (including clear GIFs), Flash LSOs, and other technologies to measure the effectiveness of their ads and to personalise advertising content to you.  These third-party cookies and other technologies are governed by each third party’s specific privacy policy, not this one. We may provide these third-party advertisers with Personal Data about your usage of our Services, as well as anonymous data about visitors to and users of our Services.
Advertising to you is based on your visits to the non-child-directed portions of the Services (such as
www.abcmouse.com
) when you visit third-party websites and applications. We will never use information collected in the child-directed portions of the Services for targeted advertising purposes.
We use the following third-party service providers for advertising purposes:
(1) Google Analytics:
(a) Scope of the processing of Personal Data
We use Google Analytics, a web analytics service provided by Google LLC, 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA. The controller for users in the European Union/European Economic Area and Switzerland is Google Ireland Ltd, Gordon House, 4 Barrow Street, D04 E5W5, Dublin, Ireland (hereinafter
Google
). Google examines, among other things, the origin of visitors, their length of stay on individual websites, the use of our websites as well as the use of search engines and thus allows a better control of the success of advertising campaigns. Google stores cookies on your terminal device. This allows personal data to be stored and analyzed, in particular the user’s activity (especially which websites have been visited, which elements have been clicked on, your click paths, clicks on external links and interactions with videos), device and browser information (especially operating system as well as screen resolution and language settings), data about the advertisements displayed (especially which advertisements were displayed and whether the user clicked on them) and also data from advertising partners (especially pseudonymized user IDs). With the help of the user ID, we can assign a unique, permanent identification number to one or more sessions as well as to the activities and interactions with our website that took place during a session and analyze your user behavior across devices. In addition, your approximate location (region), date and time of the website visit, your Internet service provider and the referrer URL, i.e. the website or advertising medium through which you arrived at our website, are recorded. The information collected by the cookies about your use of this online presence is usually transferred to a Google server in the USA and stored there. IP addresses are not stored on the servers of Google for analytics purposes. Only in exceptional cases will the full IP address be transmitted to a Google server in the USA and shortened there. According to Google’s own statement, the IP addresses transmitted in the context of the use of Google Analytics are not merged with other Google data. Please note that there may not be an adequate level of data protection outside the European Union and the European Economic Area. If the data is transferred to the USA, there is a risk that your data may be processed by US authorities for control and monitoring purposes.
You may refuse the use of cookies by selecting the appropriate settings on your browser, however, please note that if you do so, you may not be able to use the full functionality of our Services. You can also prevent the collection of data generated by the cookie and related to your use of our Services (including your IP address) to Google and the processing of this data by Google by
not giving your consent to the setting of the cookie or
downloading and installing the browser add-on to disable Google Analytics
HERE
.
For more information on the terms of use of Google Analytics, please visit
https://www.google.com/analytics/terms/
. For more information on the collection and storage of data by Google, please click here:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?gl=DE&hl=en
.
(b).       Purpose of data processing
The purpose of processing personal data is to specifically address a target group that has already expressed an initial interest by visiting our website and using our Services. On our behalf, Google will use the information mentioned above under lit. (a) to evaluate your use of our website and Services, to compile reports on the activities of the online presence and to provide further services related to the use of the online presence and internet usage to the operator of the online presence. Furthermore, the reports provided by Google Analytics are used to analyze the performance of our website and our Services and to measure the success of our advertising campaigns.
(c).       Legal basis for the processing of personal data
The legal basis for the processing is Art.6 (1) lit. a) GDPR or Art. 5 (3) ePrivacy Directive for the storage and access to information in your terminal device.
This service may transfer the collected data to another country. Please note that this service may transfer data outside the European Union and the European Economic Area and to a country that does not provide an adequate level of data protection. If the data is transferred to the US, there is a risk that your data may be processed by US authorities for control and monitoring purposes. Google relies for the lawfulness of the transfer of your personal data to third countries on relevant adequacy decisions of the European Commission pursuant to Art. 45 GDPR, by which the European Commission has decided and determined that the third country in question has an adequate level of protection with regard to the processing of your personal data. These are the adequacy decisions, which can be found on the following website of the European Commission:
https://commission.europa.eu/law/law-topic/data-protection/international-dimension-data-protection/adequacy-decisions_en.
In particular, for the transfer of your personal data to the United States, Google relies on its certification under the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, available at
https://commission.europa.eu/system/files/2023-07/Adequacy%20decision%20EU-US%20Data%20Privacy%20Framework_en.pdf
. Google states in its privacy policy that, through the certification, it has declared that it complies with the principles of the EU-US Data Privacy Framework and is subject to the investigative and enforcement powers of the US Federal Trade Commission.
The certification specifically applies to Google LLC and its wholly-owned subsidiaries in the U.S. (unless specifically excluded) and can be viewed at the following link:
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/participant-search/participant-detail?id=a2zt000000001L5AAI&status=Active0000001L5AAI&status=Active&hl=de
.
To the extent that the recipient state to which your personal data is transferred is not subject to an adequacy decision by the European Commission, Google bases the lawfulness of the transfer to companies located in such a state on the standard contractual clauses approved by the European Commission and agreed with the receiving companies, which can be viewed here:
https://eur-lex.europa.eu/eli/dec_impl/2021/914/oj?hl=de
.
If neither an adequacy decision of the European Commission nor other appropriate safeguards for the transfer exist for the transfer and processing of your personal data in states outside the European Economic Area, your explicit prior consent pursuant to Article 49 (1) lit. a GDPR constitutes the legal basis for our processing in this regard.
Please note that in cases of data transfer to countries outside the European Union and the European Economic Area for which no adequacy decision exists, there may not be a level of data protection comparable to the GDPR, you may not be entitled to the same rights and remedies, and despite careful selection and commitment of the partners, the high level of data protection in the European Union cannot necessarily be guaranteed.
(d).       Duration of storage
Your Personal Data and corresponding data linked to the cookies will be automatically deleted after 12 months. The maximum lifetime of Google Analytics cookies is 2 years. The deletion of data whose retention period has been reached occurs automatically once a month.
(e).       Possibility of objection and removal
You can prevent the collection as well as the processing of your personal data by Google by preventing the storage of third-party cookies on your computer. For more information on objection and removal options vis-à-vis Google, please visit:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?gl=DE&hl=de
.
(2) Facebook Pixel
(a) Scope of the processing of Personal Data
We use the Facebook pixel of Meta Platforms Ireland Limited (formerly Facebook Ireland Ltd.), 4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland (hereinafter
Facebook
). With its help, we can track the actions of users after they have seen or clicked on a Facebook ad. This allows Personal Data to be stored and evaluated, in particular the user’s activity (in particular which websites have been visited and which elements have been clicked on), device and browser information (in particular the IP address and operating system), data about the advertisements displayed (in particular which advertisements have been displayed and whether the user has clicked on them), and also data from advertising partners (in particular pseudonymized user IDs). This allows us to record the effectiveness of Facebook ads for statistical and market research purposes. The data collected in this way is anonymous to us, i.e. we do not see the Personal Data of individual users. However, this data is stored and processed by Facebook. Facebook can link this data to your Facebook user account and also use it for its own advertising purposes in accordance with Facebook’s Privacy Policy. Further information on the collection and storage of data by Facebook can be found here:
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/policy/?entry_point=facebook_page_footer
(b) Purpose of the data processing
The Facebook pixel is used to analyze and optimize advertising measures.
(c) Legal basis for the processing of personal data
The legal basis for the processing is Art. 6 (1) lit. a) GDPR or Art. 5 (3) ePrivacy Directive for the storage and access to information in your terminal device.
This service may transfer the collected data to another country. Please note that this service may transfer Personal Data outside the European Union and the European Economic Area and to a country that does not offer an adequate level of data protection. If the Personal Data is transferred to the USA, there is a risk that your Personal Data may be processed by US authorities for monitoring and surveillance purposes. For the lawfulness of the transfer of your personal data to third countries, Facebook relies on corresponding adequacy decisions of the European Commission pursuant to Art. 45 GDPR, with which the European Commission has decided and determined that the third country in question has an adequate level of protection with regard to the processing of your Personal Data. The adequacy decisions can be found on the following website of the European Commission:
https://commission.europa.eu/law/law-topic/data-protection/international-dimension-data-protection/adequacy-decisions_en
.
In particular, the EU-US Data Privacy Framework (available at
https://commission.europa.eu/system/files/2023-07/Adequacy%20decision%20EU-US%20Data%20Privacy%20Framework_en.pdf
) applies to the transfer of your Personal Data to the USA. Meta Platforms, Inc, located at 1 Meta Way, Menlo Park, California 94025-1453, is certified under the EU-US Data Privacy Framework as the parent company of Facebook. The certification can be viewed at the following link:
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/participant-search/participant-detail?id=a2zt0000000GnywAAC&status=Active
.
If there is no adequacy decision by the European Commission for the recipient country to which your Personal Data is transferred, Facebook bases the lawfulness of the transfer to companies based in such a country on the standard contractual clauses approved by the European Commission and agreed with the receiving companies, which can be viewed here:
https://eur-lex.europa.eu/eli/dec_impl/2021/914/oj?hl=de
.
If there is neither an adequacy decision by the European Commission nor other suitable guarantees for the transfer and processing of your Personal Data in countries outside the European Economic Area, your express prior consent pursuant to Art. 49 (1) lit. a GDPR constitutes the legal basis for the processing in this regard.
Further information on the security measures taken by Facebook to protect your personal data in the context of third country transfers can be found on the following Facebook information page:
https://about.fb.com/news/2021/03/steps-we-take-to-transfer-data-securely/
.
d. Duration of storage
Your Personal Data will be stored for as long as necessary to fulfill the purposes described in this Privacy Policy or as required by law.
e. Possibility of objection and removal
You can prevent the collection and processing of your Personal Data by Facebook by preventing the storage of third-party cookies on your computer. You can find further information on objection and removal options in relation to Facebook at:
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/policy/?entry_point=facebook_page_footer
(3) ironSource
(a) Scope of the processing of Personal Data
We use the online marketing tools of the Israeli company ironSource Mobile Ltd., 121 Menachem Begin Rd., Tel Aviv, Israel (“
ironSource
”) for our Services. ironSource has appointed Prighter as their privacy representatives in the EU. In case of any questions regarding the processing of Personal Data by ironSource, residents in the EU may contact ironSource’s representative at: Prighter GDPR-Rep by Maetzler Rechtsanwalts GmbH & Co KG, c/o ironSource Ltd., 9 Clare Street, Dublin 2 D02 HH30, Ireland (
https://prighter.com/q/13822340265
).
ironSource is an Israeli company specializing in the development of technologies for mobile app monetization and distribution. ironSource offers software developers and publishers various services to serve advertisements in their mobile apps, to manage their business relationships with advertisement providers, and to monitor and analyze their mobile apps and the advertisements served therein, including the success of advertising campaigns. If consumers download and use a mobile application that uses the services and tools provided by ironSource or otherwise interacts with the advertisements served by ironSource in a mobile application. ironSource collects data in two ways: either directly through a software development kit, a software component integrated by the developer of a mobile application that enables ironSource to serve advertisements in a mobile application and collect information directly from such mobile applications, or indirectly through other third parties with whom ironSource partners to serve advertisements in mobile applications or by receiving information from its advertisers or affiliates. Among other things, ironSource may collect the following data which may include Personal Data: advertising ID, IP-address, a self-created ID unique to a specific app, IDs unique only to apps of the same developer, device’s time zone, free memory on the device, name and version of the mobile app to which the advertisement is served, battery status, operating system and version, language preferences, name of the mobile carrier, internet connection type, indication whether an advertisement was viewed or clicked and whether there was an installation of an advertised mobile application, information on actions performed within an advertiser’s mobile app following such an installation (e.g. in-app purchases), level in the game, the advertisements displayed within a mobile application and interactions with such advertisements.
Subject to the mobile app publisher’s preferences, ironSource may receive additional Personal Data from such publishers, including the age, gender, in-app purchases, advance in the game, and other information provided by the developer. We have decided to share the following data with ironSource when you use our Services and app: information about how many User events occur with respect to mobile application installations, non-member home page visits, subscription page visits, first-time User sign-ins and new subscriptions, in each case, by disclosing advertising IDs assigned to Users.
Further information on how ironSource process your Personal Data can be found in ironSource’s privacy policy for their services, which may be accessed at:
https://developers.is.com/ironsource-mobile/air/ironsource-mobile-privacy-policy/
.
(b) Purpose of the data processing
We use ironSource to analyze our marketing measures as well as to optimize such measures.
(c) Legal basis for the processing of personal data
The legal basis for the processing is Art. 6 (1) lit. a) GDPR or Art. 5 (3) ePrivacy Directive for the storage and access to information in your terminal device.
This service may transfer the collected data to another country. Please note that this service may transfer Personal Data outside the European Union and the European Economic Area and to a country that does not offer an adequate level of data protection. ironSource processes your Personal Data in Israel. However, ironSource may also transfer and process your Personal Data in the USA due to the use of service providers that are based in the US (e.g. Amazon Web Services). If the Personal Data is transferred to the USA, there is a risk that your Personal Data may be processed by US authorities for monitoring and surveillance purposes. For the lawfulness of the transfer of your personal data to third countries, ironSource relies on standard contractual clauses adopted by the European Commission (Art. 46 (2) lit. c) GDPR). The current adopted version of the standard contractual clauses adopted by the European Commission may be reviewed at:
https://commission.europa.eu/publications/standard-contractual-clauses-international-transfers_en
.
With regards to the security of the processing and transfer of Personal Data to Israel, the European Commission has decided and determined that Israel has an adequate level of protection with regard to the processing of your Personal Data (Art. 45 GDPR). The adequacy decisions can be found on the following website of the European Commission:
https://commission.europa.eu/law/law-topic/data-protection/international-dimension-data-protection/adequacy-decisions_en
.
If there is neither an adequacy decision by the European Commission nor other suitable guarantees for the transfer and processing of your Personal Data in countries outside the European Economic Area, your express prior consent pursuant to Art. 49 (1) lit. a GDPR constitutes the legal basis for the processing in this regard.
Further information on how ironSource processes your Personal Data and the security measures taken by ironSource to protect your Personal Data in the context of third country transfers can be found in ironSource’s privacy policy, which can be accessed here:
https://developers.is.com/ironsource-mobile/air/ironsource-mobile-privacy-policy/
.
d. Duration of storage
Your Personal Data will be stored for as long as necessary to fulfill the purposes described in this Privacy Policy or as required by law. For more information about the data retention periods implemented by ironSource, please see the “Maximum Information Retention Period” section of their privacy policy.
e. Control of the Processing of your Personal Data
Further information on how to control your Personal Data processed by ironSource can be found in the “How to Control Information” section of ironSource’s privacy policy, which may be accessed at:
https://developers.is.com/ironsource-mobile/air/ironsource-mobile-privacy-policy/
.
b.
Marketing
We would like to send you information about our products and Services and those of our associated companies which may be of interest to you. If you have opted in to receive marketing information, you may opt out later. You may not opt out of receiving administrative messages from us regarding your Account, such as password reset emails, customer support messages, and emails about changes to our Privacy Policy in accordance with Section 14 (Changes to Our Privacy Policy).
You have a right at any time to stop us or any associated companies from contacting you for marketing purposes—if you no longer wish to be contacted for marketing purposes please contact us via the contact details in Section 15 (Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us) or click on the Unsubscribe button at the bottom of any email received from us.
While it is never our intention to send any marketing messages to children, if you believe a Child User has received such a marketing communication, please contact us as described in Section 15 (Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us).
Push Notifications and SMS.
Additionally, if you downloaded the App on your mobile device to access the Services, as part of your use of the Services we may ask if you would like to receive push notifications, which may include alerts and notifications, badges, banners, and sounds on your mobile device. You may choose to stop receiving push notifications at any time by changing the settings on your mobile device. We may also ask if you would like to receive SMS text messages. Please note that your network provider may charge you for the text messages you receive. To permanently stop receiving SMS text messages from us text STOP, CANCEL, or UNSUBSCRIBE in reply to any SMS text message sent by us.
6.
How We Use Your Personal Data
We may use the information collected from Users for the following purposes:
a.
Adult User Personal Data.
Personal Data about Adult Users may be used:
i. to generate a transaction identification number and member identification number, which is used by us to identify certain actions and Users, such as completing activities or canceling an account. The processing of aforesaid data is necessary to provide you with our Services and to establish and fulfill the contract concluded with you for the use of our Services (Art. 6 (1) lit. b) GDPR);
ii. to permit you to register for and use the Services, including, for example, to send you communications about Child User progress or your Account, or to allow you to provide Feedback through the Parent section. For security purposes, the Parent section is password protected. The legal basis for the processing is the establishment and fulfillment of the contract concluded with you for the use of our Services (Art. 6 (1) lit. b) GDPR);
iii. for paid Accounts, to complete and fulfill your purchase, such as to process your payments, communicate with you regarding your purchase, and provide you with related customer service. The legal basis for the processing is the fulfillment of the contract concluded with you for the use of our Services and to provide you with the purchased orders (Art. 6 (1) lit. b) GDPR);
iv. to respond to your enquiries or complaints and fulfill your requests, retrieve your password or provide technical support. The legal basis for the processing regarding the provision of technical support and the receipt of your password is the fulfillment of the contract concluded with you for the use of our Services (Art. 6 (1) lit. b) GDPR) and regarding the personal data you may provide with your enquiries or complaints our legitimate interest in processing these enquiries and complaints (Art. 6 (1) lit. f) GDPR);
v. to deliver ABCmouse® advertising and to measure the effectiveness of our advertising to adults (see Section 5 (Advertising and Marketing) for more information). The legal basis for the processing is your consent (Art. 6 (1) lit. a) GDPR); and
vi. to send you marketing communications that we believe may be of interest to you (see Section 5 (Advertising and Marketing) for more information). The legal basis for the processing is your consent (Art. 6 (1) lit. a) GDPR).
b.
Child User Personal Data.
Personal Data collected about Child Users may be used:
i. to measure a Child User’s performance in activities and to adapt a Child User’s learning experience to the Child User’s learning needs; and
ii. to analyse, provide progress reports on, or provide an assessment of a Child User’s performance to the Adult User on the Account.
The processing of Child User Personal Data is necessary to perform and fulfill the contract for the use of our Services concluded with the Adult User (Art. 6 (1) lit. b) GDPR).
c.
Both Adult and Child User Personal Data.
Personal Data collected about both Adult and Child Users may be used:
i. to allow us to assess and improve the Services, its educational content, and other services we provide, for example, to improve our content and user experience; to research, evaluate, and improve the Services’ educational efficacy; and to inform our understanding of the Services’ user base. For this purposes, the processing of Adult and Child User Personal Data is based on our legitimate interest pursuant to Art. 6 (1) lit f) GDPR. Our legitimate interest is to provide Child Users using our Services with the consent of the Adult User with Services tailored to their needs, to increase the potential educational benefits for Child Users. At the same time, we seek to provide an excellent service that is adapted to Adult and Child Users’ needs;
ii. to customise, adapt, and personalise Users’ viewing and content-consumption experience, for example, by measuring a Child User’s performance in activities and adapting the Child User’s learning path to his or her learning needs. The processing is necessary to perform and fulfill the contract for the use of our Services concluded with the Adult User (Art. 6 lit. b) GDPR);
iii. to detect fraud (Art. 6 (1) lit. f) GDPR);
iv. to maintain and analyse the functioning of the Services, to detect violations of and enforce our Terms & Conditions, and to protect our rights, privacy, safety, or property, or that of our associates, you, or others. The processing is based on our legitimate interest to protect our Services and technical infrastructure from disruptions, outages and (cyber) attacks (Art. 6 (1) lit. f) GDPR); and
v. to comply with legal process and obligations to which we are subject, and to respond to requests from public and government authorities, including public and government authorities outside your country of residence, and court orders ((Art. 6 (1) lit. c) and lit f) GDPR).
We will never monetize the Personal Data of any User of the Services by providing it to a third party in exchange for money, except as described in this Privacy Policy in the context of a sale of the Company.
Where we intend to process your Personal Data for a purpose other than that for which it was originally collected, we will provide you with information on that other purpose and any relevant further information prior to such processing.
7.
When We Disclose Information to Third Parties
Personal Data collected about both Adult and Child Users will not be disclosed except as follows:
a. to third parties who perform certain services for us, such as to conduct or evaluate research (such as on the educational impact of the Services); and to provide us with our technical infrastructure (i.e. our host provider).
In this case, any transfer or disclosure of your Personal Data will take place for the fulfillment of the contract concluded with you (Art. 6 (1) lit b) GDPR or, in terms of the conduct and evaluation of research, in our legitimate interest (Art. 6 (1) lit f) GDPR.
For the provision of the services mentioned above, we use the following service providers, which we have carefully selected beforehand as processors, whose reliability we have verified pursuant to Art. 28 (1) GDPR and, to the extent required by law, which we have contractually obliged within the scope of Art. 28 (3) GDPR to process all Personal Data provided by us exclusively in accordance with our instructions:
Hosting Service Provider: Amazon Web Services, Inc., 410 Terry Avenue North, Seattle WA 98109, USA. Link to privacy notice:
https://aws.amazon.com/privacy/?nc1=h_ls
. Link to data privacy FAQ on how AWS handles customer content hosted on their servers:
https://aws.amazon.com/compliance/data-privacy-faq/
.
b. to the following payment service providers, who process your debit and credit card and other payment related information:
Google LLC, 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043 USA (for Android users) link to privacy notice:
https://payments.google.com/payments/apis-secure/get_legal_document?ldo=0&ldt=privacynotice&ldl=en
;
Apple, Inc., One Apple Park Way, Cupertino, California, USA (for iOS users) link to privacy notice:
https://www.apple.com/legal/privacy/data/en/apple-pay/
In this case, any transfer or disclosure of your Personal Data will take place for the fulfillment of the contract concluded with you (Art. 6 (1) lit b) GDPR
c. where legally required by law or where requested by public or government authorities, including public and government authorities outside your country of residence, or court order. The legal basis for these processing operations is Art. 6 (1) lit. c) GDPR; and
d. subject to confidentiality agreements, the terms of this Privacy Policy, and applicable data protection and privacy law, information may be disclosed to service providers, advisors, potential transactional partners, or other third parties in connection with the consideration, negotiation, or completion of a corporate transaction in which we are acquired by or merged with another company or we sell, liquidate, transfer, or license all or a portion of our assets in bankruptcy or otherwise. This means that if some or all our assets are acquired or otherwise transferred or licensed, including in bankruptcy, that such acquirer shall be subject to the same commitments stated under this Privacy Policy. The legal basis for the disclosure of your Personal Data is Art. 6 (1) lit. c) and f) GDPR.
We do not disclose the personally identifiable information of any Child User to third parties for any marketing or promotional purposes.
As used in this Privacy Policy,
Anonymous Data
means data that does not relate to an identified or identifiable natural person or Personal Data rendered anonymous in such a manner that the Data Subject is not, or is no longer, identifiable. Anonymous Data does not, by itself, permit the identification of individual persons and is therefore not regarded as Personal Data.
We also may disclose Anonymous Data and/or aggregated User information for any other purpose as permissible by applicable data protection and privacy law—for example, the distribution of anonymous User records to outside researchers or the distribution of reports containing aggregate user demographic and traffic patterns—provided that no individual Adult User or Child User or any specific end-user device can be readily identified.
8. How to Access, Change, or Delete Account Information; Your Rights
An Adult User can review or change the information they provided when they registered for the Services, including by adding or removing Child Users to or from the Account, or by updating information through the Parent section of the Services. In addition, Adult Users may contact us at any time as described in Section 15 (Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us) to request that we provide for their review, or delete from our records, any Personal Data they have provided about Child Users associated with their Accounts, or to cease collecting Personal Data from those Child Users, as applicable. Please keep in mind that a request to delete Personal Data may lead to cancellation of your Account or the inability to use certain Services.
When we change or delete any Personal Data at your request, we will make good faith efforts to make the changes in our then-active databases as soon as reasonably practicable. Changing setting options may not result in immediate changes to the settings, which are subject to our operations and maintenance schedules. Please note that information, including Personal Data, may remain in backup or archive records to comply with statutory or other legal retention obligations which are applicable to us, and we may retain certain data relevant to preventing fraud or future abuse or for legitimate business purposes.
Your Rights:
You have the following statutory rights under GDPR:
a. the right to access the Personal Data we hold about you: you may access the Personal Data we hold about you at any time by contacting us as described in Section 15 (Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us) (Art. 15 GDPR);
b. where our processing of your Personal Data is based on your consent, the right to withdraw your consent to such processing at any time with effect for the future, i.e withdrawing your consent does not affect the lawfulness of the processing based on consent before your withdrawal (Art 7 (3) GDPR);
c. the right to rectification of your Personal Data: you can also contact us to update or correct any inaccuracies in your Personal Data (Art. 16 GDPR);
d. the right to restriction of processing or to object to processing of your Personal Data (Art. 18 GDPR);
e. the right to request us to transfer your Personal Data to a third party in a structured, commonly used machine-readable format (Art. 20 GDPR);
f. the right to object, on grounds relating to the data subjects’ particular situation to the processing of Personal Data which is based on Art. 6 (1) lit e) or f) GDPR and to object to direct marketing measures (as referred to in Section 5) (Art. 21 GDPR);
g. the right to request the erasure of your Personal Data (Art. 17 GDPR “right to be forgotten”); and
h. the right to lodge a complaint with a competent supervisory authority (Art. 77 GDPR).
If you wish to exercise any of these rights, please contact us using the details in Section 15 (Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us). In your request, we encourage you to make clear: (i) what Personal Data is concerned; and (ii) which of the above rights you would like to enforce. For your protection, we may need to verify your identity before implementing a request.  Please note that we may need to retain certain information for recordkeeping purposes and/or to complete any transactions that you began prior to requesting such change or deletion.
9. Account Cancellation and Reactivation; Data Deletion
We only keep your Personal Data for as long as necessary in relation to the purpose for which we are processing that information. To determine the appropriate retention period for Personal Data, we consider the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the Personal Data, the potential risk of harm from unauthorised use or disclosure of your Personal Data, the purposes for which we process your Personal Data and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, and the applicable legal requirements.
At any time, Adult Users may cancel their Accounts through the Parent section of the Services.
For Family Accounts that have been cancelled, if the Account remains inactive for 12 months, subject to legal requirements to the contrary, we will delete all Personal Data in our active databases associated with the Account (
Account Information
). The 12 months is provided so that you have the ability, following cancellation of a Family Account or inactivity, to reactivate your Account and potentially recover previous information and resume where the Child User left off.  If a User requests that Personal Data be deleted prior to the end of the 12-month period of inactivity, we will satisfy that request.
Upon Account cancellation, Adult and Child User Anonymised Data may nonetheless persist internally in our archive files or similar databases and may still be used, on an anonymous basis, for our internal support, administrative, and record-keeping purposes including, but not limited to, allowing us to improve the Services and other services we provide through research, evaluation, and analytics as permissible by applicable data protection and privacy law.
Please note that following a request to delete information or your Account under Sections 8 or 9 of this Privacy Policy, information including Personal Data may remain in backup or archive records if required by law, or relevant to preventing fraud or future abuse. All retained data will continue to be subject to the Privacy Policy in effect at that time and applicable law.
10.
Links to Other Services
In certain sections of the Services, we may include links to external websites or applications (including Facebook, X (formerly Twitter), YouTube, Instagram, and Pinterest). However, in order to protect children from accessing these external websites, an Adult User will be required to enter a valid password. These websites and applications are governed by their own privacy policies or information collection practices, which may be substantially different from ours. We encourage you to review the privacy policies and information collection practices of any external websites and applications, as those parties’ practices would not be subject to this Privacy Policy. These service providers are solely responsible for the data processing that they carry out for their own purposes. Below you will find contact details of the controllers in Europe and some links to further useful information regarding their data processing:
Facebook
(
https://www.facebook.com
): operated by Meta Platforms Ireland Limited (formerly Facebook Ireland Ltd.), 4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland;
Privacy Policy:
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy https://www.facebook.com/settings?tab=ads
Notes on Facebook Pages and Insights: Agreement on joint processing of personal data on Facebook pages: https://www.facebook.com/legal/terms/page_controller_addendum (link only works when copied to browser),
https://www.facebook.com/legal/terms/information_about_page_insights_data
Instagram
(https://www.instagram.com): operated by Meta Platforms Ireland Limited, 4 Grand Canal Square, Dublin 2, Ireland;
Privacy Policy:
https://de-de.facebook.com/help/instagram/155833707900388;
X (formerly Twitter)
(
https://www.twitter.com
): operated by X Corp. 1355 Market Street, Suite 900 San Francisco, CA 94103, USA, data controller in the European Union: Twitter International Unlimited Company, One Cumberland Place, Fenian Street, Dublin 2, D02 AX07 Ireland
Privacy Policy:
https://twitter.com/en/privacy
Youtube
(
https://www.youtube.com
): operated by YouTube LLC, 01 Cherry Ave., San Bruno, CA 94066, USA, data controller in the European Union: Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Privacy Policy:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en
Pinterest
(
https://www.pinterest.com
): operated by Pinterest Europe Ltd., Palmerston House, 2nd Floor, Fenian Street, Dublin 2, Ireland, data controller in the European Union: Pinterest Europe Ltd., Palmerston House, 2nd Floor, Fenian Street, Dublin 2, Ireland jointly with Irland. Pinterest, Inc., 651 Brannan St., San Francisco, CA 94107, USA.
Privacy Policy:
https://policy.pinterest.com/en/privacy-policy
11.
Location of Information Processing
The Services are controlled and operated by us from the United States of America. Your information may be transferred to, stored, and processed by us in any country where we have facilities or in which we engage service providers, including the United States of America, which may have data protection laws that are different from those of your country. Specifically, we may transfer Personal Data from the European Economic Area (EEA) to:
a. countries that the European Commission has deemed to adequately safeguard Personal Data and for which the European Commission has issued an adequacy decision pursuant to Art. 45 GDPR. Information on which countries the European Commission deems to have an adequate level of data protection can be found here:
https://commission.europa.eu/law/law-topic/data-protection/international-dimension-data-protection/adequacy-decisions_en
;
b. pursuant to the recipient’s compliance with standard contractual clauses (Art. 46 (2) lit c) GDPR, or Binding Corporate Rules (Art. 46 (2) lit. b), Art. 47 GDPR);
c. pursuant to the consent of the individual to whom the Personal Data pertains (Art. 49 (1) lit. a) GDPR, or
d. as otherwise permitted by applicable EEA requirements pursuant to Art. 44 et. seq. GDPR.
In addition, your information may be subject to access requests from governments, courts, or law enforcement officials in countries where it may be processed, under the laws of those countries.
We will take all steps reasonably necessary to ensure that your Personal Data is treated securely and in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
12.
Security
The security of your Personal Data is important to us, and we employ reasonable physical, technical, and administrative security measures designed to safeguard the Personal Data collected by the Services and to guard against unauthorised or unlawful processing of Personal Data and against damage to, accidental loss, or destruction of your Personal Data. We use industry-standard SSL (secure socket layer technology) encryption to transfer Personal Data. Other security safeguards include, but are not limited to, data encryption, firewalls, and physical access controls to buildings and files.
Account holders create a password in the registration process. You can help protect against unauthorised access to your account and Personal Data by selecting a strong password, protecting your password appropriately, and limiting access to your computer and browser by signing off after you have finished accessing your Account. At registration, we assign a Member ID to each Account and use those Member IDs to authenticate logins, allow access to the subscription content, and monitor compliance. The Member ID is also used to authenticate users when requesting technical support. Access to information is limited (through user/password credentials and two-factor authentication) to those employees who require it to perform their job functions.
We also use PCI-DDS compliant service providers for credit card processing as required by applicable law.
13.
Cookie Policy
a.
What Are Cookies?
Our websites and Apps use cookies. Cookies are small (text) files placed on your device to collect standard internet log information and visitor behaviour information. The cookies may transmit information via your browser with a purpose of authenticating or identifying the computer (via, e.g., the IP address) or the User. Cookies may contain information such as registration data and User preferences.
We use cookies to:
i. automatically collect certain technical information from your computer or mobile device over time and across different websites, including when you use the Services, such as your browser type, operating system, device type, the page served, your IP address and your geolocation. When you download and use our App(s), we and our service providers may track and collect App usage data, such as the date and time the App on your device accesses our servers and what information and files have been downloaded to the App based on your device number. Storing such cookies on and accessing your end devices to obtain these information is technically necessary to provide our Services to you. Legal basis for storing these cookies on your end devices and accessing your information to obtain these information is based on Art. 5 (3) ePrivacy Directive, and the processing of your Personal Data on Art. 6 (1) lit. f) GDPR.;
ii. collect and store information about your location to provide you with educational experiences or email updates that are tailored for your region. The location information we have access to may include (1) your postal code, if you provide one to us; and (2) the approximate geographic region your computer or mobile device is located in, as determined from your IP address. However, we do not collect your street name and the name of your city/town unless provided during registration. You may be able to change the settings on your computer or mobile device to prevent it from providing us with such IP information. We also have access to your school or classroom location if you (as a teacher) provide it to us. The legal basis for storing corresponding cookies and processing the aforementioned geo localization data is your consent pursuant to Art. 5 (3) ePrivacy Directive, Art. 6 (1) lit. a) GDPR.; and
iii. we may collect information from your mobile device if you have downloaded our App(s). This information is generally used to help us deliver the most relevant information to you. Examples of information that may be collected and used include your IP address, geographic location, how you use the App(s), and information about the type of device you use. In addition, in the event our App(s) crash on your mobile device, we will receive information about your mobile device model software version and device carrier, which allows us to identify and fix bugs and otherwise improve the performance of our App(s). This information is sent to us as aggregated information. In addition, if you choose to turn on your Bluetooth, wi-fi or other geolocation functionality when you use our App(s), we may collect and use your geolocation information. The legal basis for accessing and collecting such information from your device, is your prior consent pursuant to Art. 5 (3) ePrivacy Directive.
b.
Pixel Tags and IFrames:
We also use pixel tags (which are also known as web beacons and clear GIFs) on our Services to track the actions of Users on our Services. Unlike cookies, which are stored on the hard drive of your computer or mobile device by a website, pixel tags are embedded invisibly on web pages. Pixel tags measure the success of our marketing campaigns and compile statistics about usage of the Services, so that we can manage our content more effectively. The information we collect using pixel tags is not actively linked to our Users’ Personal Data (e.g. account data).
We additionally use JavaScript snippets and server to server requests that are provided by our affiliate partners and IFrames (or inline frames) on our Services to insert content from another source into a web page, particularly in respect of advertisements to provide advertisements about goods and services likely to be of interest to our Users. An IFrame is an HTML document embedded inside another HTML document on a website.
We and our third-party service providers listed in Section 5 may use the information collected through these technical methods for several purposes, including delivering content, tracking and enhancing our Users’ experience on the Services, and delivering advertising to visitors of www.abcmouse.com when they visit other websites and applications. For example, when you return to the Services after logging in, cookies help the Services recognise who you are without having to log back in. For more information, see Section 6 (How We Use Your Personal Data). The information collected through these technical methods on the child-directed portions of the Services are used only to support the internal operations of the Services. We do not allow third- party advertising networks to collect information about Child Users who are logged into their Accounts.
c.
Managing Your Cookies
Cookies help you to get the most out of our Services, and if you disable cookies some Services or website functionality may not be available. If you do not want the Services to collect information through the use of cookies, you can set your web browser to reject cookies from the Services.
How to enable and disable cookies using your browser:
Most browsers allow you to manage cookie settings. These settings can usually be found in the Settings, Options, or Preferences menu of your browser. The links below are provided to help you find the settings for some common browsers:
i. manage cookie settings in
Chrome
,
Chrome Android
, and
Chrome iOS
;
ii. manage cookie settings in
Safari
and
Safari iOS
;
iii. manage cookie settings in
Firefox
;
iv. manage cookie settings in
Internet Explorer
; and
v. manage cookie settings in
Opera
.
For all other browsers, please look for a
Help
function in your browser or contact the browser provider.
However, as mentioned above, if you reject or block cookies from the Services, the Services may not function as intended. For example, you will not be able to remain logged in to your Account, and therefore you would have to log in during each page transition.
Further information about cookies, including how to see what cookies have been set on your computer or mobile device and how to manage and delete them, visit
www.allaboutcookies.org
and
www.youronlinechoices.com/uk
.
14.
Changes to Our Privacy Policy
We constantly try to provide the best services, and accordingly our Privacy Policy will change from time to time. If we update this Privacy Policy, we will notify you by posting the revised Privacy Policy on the Services, and for certain revisions that materially expand the ways in which we use or share the information previously collected from you through the Services, either display an alert next to the Privacy Policy, display an alert upon login to the Services, or directly communicate with you (e.g. via the email address associated with your Account).
15.
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
We are committed to resolving any complaints about our collection or use of your Personal Data. If you would like to make a complaint regarding this Privacy Policy or our practices  relating to your Personal Data, please contact us as described below. We will reply to your complaint as soon as we can. We hope to resolve any complaint brought to our attention; however, you reserve the right to contact and file a complaint with a competent supervisory authority, as detailed in Section 8 (How to Access, Change, or Delete Account Information; Your Rights).
Age of Learning, Inc. is located in the United States of America and is the operator of all the Services. Any questions, concerns, or complaints regarding this Privacy Policy, our data collection or processing practices, or issues related to your or a Child User’s information for which you are responsible, should be directed to us via any of the following methods. As Age of Learning, Inc. is in the United States of America, we have appointed a representative in the European Union so that our European Users may easily contact us:
For Family Accounts:
Postal Address: Age of Learning, Inc. Attention: Legal Department P.O. Box 230 Glendale, CA 91209 USA. Telephone Number: 1-800-633-3331 Email Address: privacy@aofl.com
European Representative:
Postal Address: Please see list below.
Attention: DataRep
Email Address:
datarequest@datarep.com
or through the online portal at
www.datarep.com/data-request
We have appointed DataRep as our Data Protection Representative in the European Union so that you can contact them directly in your home country. DataRep has locations in each of the 28 EU countries, so that Age of Learning, Inc.’s customers can always raise the questions they want with them.
PLEASE NOTE: when mailing inquiries, it is ESSENTIAL that you mark your letters for ‘DataRep’ and not ‘Age of Learning, Inc.’ or your inquiry may not reach us. Please refer clearly to Age of Learning, Inc. in your correspondence. On receiving your correspondence, the Company will likely request evidence of your identity, to ensure your personal data and information connected with it is not provided to anyone other than you. If you have any concerns over how DataRep will handle the personal data they will require to undertake their services, please refer to their privacy notice at
www.datarep.com/data-request
.
DataRep Postal Addresses
Country
Address
Austria
DataRep, City Tower, Brückenkopfgasse 1/6. Stock, Graz, 8020, Austria
Belgium
DataRep, Rue des Colonies 11, Brussels, 1000
Bulgaria
DataRep, 132 Mimi Balkanska Str., Sofia, 1540, Bulgaria
Croatia
DataRep, Ground & 9th Floor, Hoto Tower, Savska cesta 32, Zagreb, 10000, Croatia
Cyprus
DataRep, Victory House, 205 Archbishop Makarios Avenue, Limassol, 3030, Cyprus
Czech Republic
DataRep, Platan Office, 28. Října 205/45, Floor 3&4, Ostrava, 70200, Czech Republic
Denmark
DataRep, Lautruphøj 1-3, Ballerup, 2750, Denmark
Estonia
DataRep, 2
nd
Floor, Tornimae 5, Tallinn, 10145, Estonia
Finland
DataRep, Luna House, 5.krs, Mannerheimintie 12 B, Helsinki, 00100, Finland
France
DataRep, 72 rue de Lessard, Rouen, 76100, France
Germany
DataRep, 3rd and 4th floor, Altmarkt 10 B/D, Dresden, 01067, Germany
Greece
DataRep, Ippodamias Sq. 8, 4th floor, Piraeus, Attica, Greece
Hungary
DataRep, President Centre, Kálmán Imre utca 1, Budapest, 1054, Hungary
Iceland
DataRep, Kalkofnsvegur 2, 3
rd
Floor, 101 Reykjavík, Iceland
Ireland
DataRep, The Cube, Monahan Road, Cork, T12 H1XY, Republic of Ireland
Italy
DataRep, Viale Giorgio Ribotta 11, Piano 1, Rome, Lazio, 00144, Italy
Latvia
DataRep, 4th & 5th floors, 14 Terbatas Street, Riga, LV-1011, Latvia
Liechtenstein
DataRep, City Tower, Brückenkopfgasse 1/6. Stock, Graz, 8020, Austria
Lithuania
DataRep, 44A Gedimino Avenue, 01110 Vilnius, Lithuania
Luxembourg
DataRep, BPM 335368, Banzelt 4 A, 6921, Roodt-sur-Syre, Luxembourg
Malta
DataRep, Tower Business Centre, 2nd floor, Tower Street, Swatar, BKR4013, Malta
Netherlands
DataRep, Cuserstraat 93, Floor 2 and 3, Amsterdam, 1081 CN, Netherlands
Norway
DataRep, C.J. Hambros Plass 2c, Oslo, 0164, Norway
Poland
DataRep, Budynek Fronton ul Kamienna 21, Krakow, 31-403, Poland
Portugal
DataRep, Torre de Monsanto, Rua Afonso Praça 30, 7th floor, Algès, Lisbon, 1495-061, Portugal
Romania
DataRep, 15 Piaţa Charles de Gaulle, nr. 1-T, Bucureşti, Sectorul 1, 011857,
Romania
Slovakia
DataRep, Apollo Business Centre II, Block E / 9th floor, 4D Prievozska, Bratislava, 821 09, Slovakia
Slovenia
DataRep, Trg. Republike 3, Floor 3, Ljubljana, 1000, Slovenia
Spain
DataRep, Calle de Manzanares 4, Madrid, 28005, Spain
Sweden
DataRep, S:t Johannesgatan 2, 4th floor, Malmo, SE – 211 46, Sweden
Switzerland
DataRep, Leutschenbachstrasse 95, ZURICH, 8050, Switzerland
United Kingdom
DataRep, 107-111 Fleet Street, London, EC4A 2AB, United Kingdom
Sub-policy 5
https://www.ageoflearning.com/aa-privacy-current/:
Skip to content
Privacy Policies
Age of Learning:
Privacy Policy
ABCmouse:
ABCmouse Privacy Policy English (US) current
Terms & Conditions English (US)
Privacy Policy (Spanish)
Terms & Conditions (Spanish)
Privacy Policy (Australia – New Zealand – Singapore)
Privacy Policy GDPR (EU and UK)
Terms & Conditions GDPR (EU, UK,
Australia
)
Adventure Academy:
Privacy Policy English (US)
Terms & Conditions English (US)
Homeschool +:
Privacy Policy English (US)
Terms & Conditions English (US)
Privacy Policy (Australia)
Privacy Policy EU,UK, and GDPR
Terms & Conditions (EU, UK, and AU GDPR)
Library:
Library Terms and Conditions
Mastery:
My Math Academy & My Reading Academy Privacy Policy
Reading IQ:
Privacy Policy English
Terms & Conditions English
Privacy Policy AUS
Privacy Policy EU/UK
Privacy Policy (China)
Terms & Conditions (China)
Sub-policy 6
https://www.ageoflearning.com/hs-privacy-policy-current/:
Skip to content
Privacy Policies
Age of Learning:
Privacy Policy
ABCmouse:
ABCmouse Privacy Policy English (US) current
Terms & Conditions English (US)
Privacy Policy (Spanish)
Terms & Conditions (Spanish)
Privacy Policy (Australia – New Zealand – Singapore)
Privacy Policy GDPR (EU and UK)
Terms & Conditions GDPR (EU, UK,
Australia
)
Adventure Academy:
Privacy Policy English (US)
Terms & Conditions English (US)
Homeschool +:
Privacy Policy English (US)
Terms & Conditions English (US)
Privacy Policy (Australia)
Privacy Policy EU,UK, and GDPR
Terms & Conditions (EU, UK, and AU GDPR)
Library:
Library Terms and Conditions
Mastery:
My Math Academy & My Reading Academy Privacy Policy
Reading IQ:
Privacy Policy English
Terms & Conditions English
Privacy Policy AUS
Privacy Policy EU/UK
Privacy Policy (China)
Terms & Conditions (China)
Sub-policy 7
https://www.ageoflearning.com/hs-privacy-policy-au/:
Skip to content
Hoomschool+ Australian Privacy Statement
Introduction
Welcome to Homeschool+™, which is owned and operated by Age of Learning, Inc. Homeschool+™ is committed to providing children with a learning environment where every activity is just as fun as it is educational, and where you can feel confident that your children’s privacy is protected.
This Privacy Statement (
Statement
) describes the ways in which Age of Learning, Inc., and its subsidiaries (collectively,
we
,
our
,
us
, or the
Company
) collect, process and disclose information about Users of our Services within Australia and the children who use our Australian Users’ accounts through Homeschool+™ and any other websites, applications, and online services (
Apps
) that link to the Privacy Notice and Cookies Policy on our website (collectively, the
Services
), including Homeschool+™ for Schools operated by our wholly owned subsidiary Age of Learning for Schools, Inc. (
AofL Schools
).
Any words defined in the
Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy
and used in this Statement will have the same meaning unless otherwise stated.
Personal Information
For the purposes of this Statement, the term Personal Information is as defined in the
Privacy Act 1988 (Cth)
, meaning information or an opinion about an identified individual, or an individual who is reasonably identifiable:
whether the information or opinion is true or not; and
whether the information or opinion is recorded in a material form or not.
Collection of Personal Information
We and our third-party service providers collect Personal Information directly from Users who provide the Personal Information when using the Services. This may include when Adult Users create an Account, sign up for Services or contact us with a question, comment, request or complaint. The Personal Information collected may include the name, email address and telephone number of the User.
We may also obtain information about you from other sources, including publicly accessible sources, for example, if you have agreed to share information with one of our partners or an Educational Institution we may add this to information we get from our site/Application(s)/Services.
We collect Personal Information for a number of different purposes, such as: to allow you to register and use the Services, to send you communications about a Child User’s progress; to respond to your enquiries, complaints, fulfill your requests, and to send you marketing communications that we believe may be of interest to you. You have a right at any time to stop us or any associated companies from contacting you for marketing purposes if you no longer wish to be contacted for marketing purposes please contact us.
If you do not provide us with Personal Information, we may not be able to provide our Services to you.
Disclosure of Personal Information
Information collected from both Adult and Child Users will not be disclosed except in limited circumstances such as:
to third parties who perform certain services for us, such as to process debit and credit cards; to conduct or evaluate research (such as on the educational impact of the Services); and to provide us with statistics about the effectiveness of our advertising on third-party websites, provided that the service providers agree to keep the information confidential and to use it only for purposes that are permitted by the Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy;
where parents, legal guardians or those with parental responsibility for Child User(s) have linked a Family Account to a Teacher Account; and
to service providers, advisors, potential transactional partners, or other third parties in connection with the consideration, negotiation, or completion of a corporate transaction in which we are acquired by or merged with another company or we sell, liquidate, transfer, or license all or a portion of our assets in bankruptcy or otherwise.
For further details, please refer to the Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy. For further information regarding when we share Personal Information, please refer to the Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy.
Overseas Disclosure
The Services are controlled and operated by us from the United States of America. Your information may be transferred to, stored and processed by us, our affiliates, and our third-party service providers in any country where we have facilities or in which we engage service providers, including the United States of America and countries within European Economic Area, which may have data protection laws that are different from Australia. For further details, please refer to the Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy.
Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy
Our Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy sets out how you can access and seek correction of your Personal Information held by us, and how to make a complaint to us about our handling of Personal Information. You can find our most up to date Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy here.
Contact Details
For Family Accounts:
Postal Address:
Age of Learning, Inc.
Attention: Legal Department
P.O. Box 230
Glendale, CA 91209
USA
Telephone Number: 800.633.3331
Email Address: privacy@aofl.com
For School Accounts:
Postal Address:
Age of Learning, Inc.
Attention: Legal Department
P.O. Box 230
Glendale, CA 91209
USA
Telephone Number: 800.633.3331
Email Address: privacy@aofl.com
APAC/Australia:
Postal Address:
Age of Learning, Inc.
Attention: Legal Department
P.O. Box 230
Glendale, CA 91209
USA
Telephone Number: 800.633.3331
Email Address: privacy@aofl.com
Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy
Effective Date: January 11, 2023
Table of Contents
Introduction
Types of Accounts, Services, and Users
Child Safe Guarantee
Personal Data We Collect and How We Collect it
Advertising and Marketing
How We Use Your Personal Data
Lawful Basis for Processing of Personal Data
When We Disclose Information to Third Parties
How to Access, Change, or Delete Account Information; Your Rights
Account Cancellation and Reactivation; Data Deletion
Links to Other Services
Location of Information Processing
Security
Cookie Policy
Changes to Our Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
Introduction
Welcome to Homeschool+™, which is owned and operated by Age of Learning, Inc. We are committed to providing children with a learning environment where every activity is just as fun as it is educational and where you can feel confident that your children’s privacy is protected.
This Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy describes the ways in which Age of Learning, Inc., and its subsidiaries (collectively,
we
,
our
,
us
, or the
Company
) collect, process, and disclose information about our Users (as defined below) within Europe and Australia and the children who use the accounts of our European or Australian Users through Homeschool+™, and any other websites, applications, and online services (
Apps
) that link to this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy (collectively, the
Services
), including Homeschool+™ for Schools, operated by our wholly owned subsidiary Age of Learning for Schools, Inc. (
AofL Schools
). AofL Schools provides School Accounts (as defined below) for schools, school districts, licensed childcare facilities, and other licensed educational institutions or programs (each, an
Educational Institution
). Our Services are directed toward nursery school through second-grade aged children.
This Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy applies across multiple jurisdictions, such as Europe (where the General Data Protection Regulation (EU) 2016/679 (
GDPR
)) applies and Australia (where the Australian Privacy Act 1988 (Cth) (
Privacy Act
) applies).
Personal Data
For the purposes of this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, the term “Personal Data” encompasses both the definition of “Personal Data” under the GDPR and the definition of “Personal Information” under the Privacy Act, as set out below for European Users and Australian Users respectively.
Personal Data under the GDPR for European Users
The term
Personal Data
is defined in the
GDPR
as “
any information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person
(Data Subject)
; an identifiable natural person is one who can be identified, directly or indirectly, in particular by reference to an identifier such as a name, an identification number, location data, an online identifier or one or more factors specific to the physical, physiological, genetic, mental, economic, cultural, or social identity of that natural person.
”
Personal Information under the Privacy Act for Australian Users
Under the Privacy Act, “
Personal Information
” is defined to mean “
information or an opinion about an identified individual, or an individual who is reasonably identifiable”:
a) whether the information or opinion is true or not; and
b) whether the information or opinion is recorded in a material form or not.
Please read this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy and our
Terms & Conditions
carefully to understand our views and practices regarding your Personal Data and how we will treat it. By using the Services, you consent to our use of your Personal Data and agree to the terms of this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy. We may provide additional privacy notices to individuals at the time we collect their Personal Data. This type of an “in-time” notice will govern how we may process the Personal Data you provide at that time. If you do not agree to our use of your Personal Data in line with this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, please do not use the Services.
Types of Accounts, Services, and Users
How we collect, process, and disclose Personal Data depends on the type of account held and the type of User (as defined below). We currently offer consumers
Family Accounts
, which are detailed in our
Terms & Conditions
and, separately, AofL Schools provides
School Accounts
for schools, school districts, licensed childcare facilities, or other licensed educational institutions or programs (each, an
Educational Institution
), which are only for Educational Institutions.
The provisions of this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy apply to all Family Accounts and School Accounts (collectively,
Accounts
). Any differences in how the Accounts are treated are identified below.
Users of the Services include
Child Users
(any child under 16 who uses the learning portion of the Services) and
Adult Users
(including parents, legal guardians and anyone with parental responsibility for Child Users, purchasers of an Account as a gift (
Gift Account
), and teachers), collectively referred to as
Users
.
Child Safe Guarantee
The Services are backed by our Child Safe Guarantee. This means that Accounts will never include any pop-up ads or other advertisements directed to children. In addition, Child Users are blocked from accessing external links. External links will only be available if an Adult User enters his or her password.
Personal Data We Collect and How We Collect it
a. Personal Data
As more fully set forth below, we and our third-party service providers collect Personal Data directly from Users that such Users provide when using the Services, including when Adult Users create an Account, sign up for Services, or contact us with a question, comment, request, or complaint. However, we will only use or disclose this information in accordance with this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy and applicable data protection and privacy law. Please see section 8
(When We Disclose Information to Third Parties)
below for more information and how we limit disclosure of Child User information.
If you created a profile/registered with us, you will have been asked to tick to agree to provide this information in order to access our Services, purchase our products, and/or view our content.
i. Adult Users
Adult Users are asked to provide certain Personal Data about themselves when registering for any Account, including:
first name;
last name;
email address; and
telephone number (optional).
Any other information provided at registration depends on the type of Account or Adult User. For example:
Payment information
is collected from Adult Users who purchase a Family Account, including those who purchase a Gift Account for others. For your security, we do not store your complete credit card number in our databases but retain only the first six digits and last four digits so that we can identify your Account and respond to your requests, questions, or complaints.
The email address of a parent, legal guardian, or person with parental responsibility
is collected when the Adult User purchasing a Family Account states that he or she is not the legal guardian, or if a teacher provides such addresses in order for parents, legal guardians, or those with parental responsibility to connect to the Teacher Account or School Account.
Adult Users who register for a Family Account or School Account are asked to provide certain Personal Data about the relevant Child Users of such Accounts during Homeschool+™ registration, including:
the first name (or nickname);
birth month and year; and
gender
of Child Users who will be accessing the Services through their Accounts.
When an Adult User submits any Personal Data relating to a Child User in connection with the Services, the Adult User represents that they have the authority to do so and agree to us using the Personal Data in accordance with this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy.
In addition, Adult Users can provide us with information through separate password-protected sections (i.e., the Parent section or Teacher Dashboard) of the Services. These sections, accessible via the Menu or Settings link on the Services, allow Adult Users to administer their accounts, including when they add Child Users, provide testimonials, seek customer support, or submit comments or questions.
We do not ask for certain sensitive Personal Data such as your national insurance number, driver’s license number, or biometric data. However, as mentioned above, paying subscribers are asked for payment information when they subscribe. Please see section 13
(Security)
below for more information about how we safeguard payment information.
ii. Child Users
Children have the ability to create free-form artwork. We encourage you to use the Services with your Child Users and to view and monitor any content created or uploaded (if applicable) by them. If you would like to review all content saved by your Child Users, you can access this content by clicking on the My Files menu item in each Child User’s About Me section of the Services.
Other than in the places and for the purposes explicitly disclosed in this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, we do not knowingly collect any Personal Data directly from Child Users under the age of 16.
b. Personal Data Automatically Collected from Users
Because the security of your Personal Data is important to us, we only ask for Personal Data where it is reasonably necessary to provide the Services, and we only process your Personal Data in accordance with this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy and applicable data protection and privacy laws.
We and our third-party service providers automatically collect some Personal Data directly from users of the Services in the form of the actions they take and activities they complete when using the Services. For example, from Adult Users, we may collect information about patterns of usage and order history; from Child Users, we may collect information about patterns of usage, which activities a child commences and completes, when a child starts and stops an activity, which areas of the Services the child frequents, the number of questions answered correctly or incorrectly, how many Tickets the child earns, what virtual items the child selects to exchange for Tickets, and the child’s choice of Avatar and customization.
We and our third-party service providers also use a variety of technologies, such as pixel tags and cookies (small text files that the Services save on your computer or mobile device), to automatically collect certain technical information from your computer or mobile device—see section 14
(Cookie Policy)
below for further details about how we use pixel tags and cookies.
c. Automated Decision Making and Profiling:
We do not use your Personal Data for the purposes of automated decision-making. However, we may do so in order to fulfil obligations imposed by law, in which case we will inform you of any such processing and provide you with an opportunity to object.
Advertising and Marketing
a. Advertising
We use third parties such as network advertisers and others to assist us in advertising, including displaying our advertisements on other websites and through social media platforms; we also may use third parties that display advertisements based on your visits to our Services, as well as other websites, and other third parties to assist us in identifying relevant advertising on our Services. These third parties may collect and use click stream information, browser type, time and date, and subject of advertisements clicked or scrolled over during your visits to the Services and other websites in order to provide advertisements about goods and services likely to be of interest to you. Third-party ad network providers, advertisers, sponsors, and/or traffic measurement services may use cookies, JavaScript, web beacons (including clear GIFs), Flash LSOs, and other technologies to measure the effectiveness of their ads and to personalize advertising content to you. These third-party cookies and other technologies are governed by each third party’s specific privacy policy, not this one. We may provide these third-party advertisers with Personal Data about your usage of our Services, as well as anonymous data about visitors to and users of our Services.
Advertising to you is based on your visits to the non-child-directed portions of the Services (such as www.homeschoolplus.com) when you visit third-party websites and applications. We will never use information collected in the child-directed portions of the Services for targeted advertising purposes.
b. Marketing
We would like to send you information about our products and Services and those of our associated companies which may be of interest to you. If you have opted in to receive marketing information, you may opt out at a later date. You may not opt out of receiving administrative messages from us regarding your Account, such as password reset emails, customer support messages, and emails about changes to our Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy in accordance with section 15 (
Changes to Our Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy
).
You have a right at any time to stop us or any associated companies from contacting you for marketing purposes—if you no longer wish to be contacted for marketing purposes please contact us via the contact details in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
) below or click on the Unsubscribe button at the bottom of any email received from us.
While it is never our intention to send any marketing messages to children, if you believe a Child User has received such a marketing communication, please contact us as described in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
) below.
Push Notifications and SMS.
Additionally, if you downloaded the App on your mobile device to access the Services, as part of your use of the Services we may ask if you would like to receive push notifications, which may include alerts and notifications, badges, banners, and sounds on your mobile device. You may choose to stop receiving push notifications at any time by changing the settings on your mobile device. We may also ask if you would like to receive SMS text messages. Please note that your network provider may charge you for the text messages you receive. To permanently stop receiving SMS text messages from us text STOP, CANCEL, or UNSUBSCRIBE in reply to any SMS text message sent by us.
How We Use Your Personal Data
We and our third-party service providers may use the information collected from Users as follows:
a. Adult User Personal Data.
Personal Data collected from Adult Users may be used:
i. to generate a transaction identification number and member identification number, which is used by us to identify certain transactions and Users;
ii. to permit you to register and use the Services, including, for example, to send you communications about Child User progress or your Account, or to allow you to provide Feedback through the Parent section. For security purposes, the Parent section is password protected;
iii. for Family Accounts, to complete and fulfill your purchase, such as to process your payments, communicate with you regarding your purchase, and provide you with related customer service;
iv. to respond to your enquiries or complaints and fulfill your requests, retrieve your password or provide technical support;
v. to deliver Homeschool+™ advertising and to measure the effectiveness of our advertising to adults (see section 5 (
Advertising and Marketing
) above for more information); and
vi. to send you marketing communications that we believe may be of interest to you (see section 5 (
Advertising and Marketing
) above for more information).
b. Child User Personal Data.
Personal Data collected from Child Users may be used:
i. to measure a Child User’s performance in activities and to adapt a Child User’s learning experience to the Child User’s learning needs; and
ii. to analyse, provide progress reports on, or provide an assessment of a Child User’s performance to the Adult User on the Account.
c. Both Adult and Child User Personal Data.
Personal Data collected from both Adult and Child Users may be used:
i. to allow us to assess and improve the Services, its educational content, and other services we provide, for example, to improve our content and user experience; to research, evaluate, and improve the Services’ educational efficacy; and to inform our understanding of the Services’ user base;
ii. to customise, adapt, and personalise Users’ viewing and content-consumption experience, for example, by measuring a Child User’s performance in activities and adapting the Child User’s learning path to his or her learning needs;
iii. to detect fraud;
iv. to maintain and analyse the functioning of the Services; and
v. as we believe to be necessary or appropriate: (a) under applicable data protection and privacy law, including laws outside your country of residence; (b) to comply with legal process; (c) to respond to requests from public and government authorities, including public and government authorities outside your country of residence; (d) to detect violations of and enforce our
Terms and Conditions
; (e) to protect our operations or those of any of our associates, including the security of the Services; (f) to protect our rights, privacy, safety, or property, or that of our associates, you, or others; and (g) to allow us to pursue available remedies or limit the damages that we may sustain (collectively, (a)-(g) are
Other Uses and Disclosures
).
We will never sell or rent the Personal Data of any User of the Services to a third party, except as described in this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy in the context of a sale of the Company.
Where we intend to process your Personal Data for a purpose other than that for which it was originally collected, we will provide you with information on that other purpose and any relevant further information prior to such processing.
Lawful Basis for Processing of Personal Data
We only process Personal Data where we have a lawful basis for doing so, including the following:
User consent:
this refers to where you have given us explicit permission to process Personal Data for a given purpose. For example, by using our website and consenting to our cookies you give consent that we may obtain certain Personal Data about you, including your IP address and certain user preferences (see section 14 (
Cookie Policy
) below for more information). If we rely on consent as a lawful basis for the processing of your Personal Data, we will seek such consent at the time we collect your Personal Data.
For our legitimate business purposes:
this covers where we have a legitimate interest, as a business, to process Personal Data. For example, to manage enquiries, requests, and complaints; to undertake general administrative tasks in connection with our Services; to provide you with information about our Services; to improve, maintain, and analyse our Services; and to detect fraud.
For contractual necessity:
this covers situations where we must process Personal Data to meet our contractual obligations. For example, where you hold an Account with us, we would need to process your payment information to fulfill your subscription.
For compliance with a legal obligation:
this covers situations where we must process Personal Data in order to comply with the law; we may share your information with third parties such as regulatory authorities, or where we are under a legal obligation to disclose your information (for example, where we are required to share information in accordance with legislation, to prevent fraud and other criminal offenses, or because of a court order). We may disclose your information in order to enforce our legal rights or to protect the legal rights of us or others.
When We Disclose Information to Third Parties
Information collected from both Adult and Child Users will not be disclosed except as follows:
to third parties who perform certain services for us, such as to process debit and credit cards; to conduct or evaluate research (such as on the educational impact of the Services); and to provide us with statistics about the effectiveness of our advertising on third-party websites, provided that the service providers agree to keep the information confidential and to use it only for purposes that are permitted by this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy. In respect of advertising analytics data, when a User subscribes or downloads our Apps, certain Personal Data (including a User’s transaction identification number, which cannot be linked to individual Users, and member identification number, which can be linked to individual Users) is transmitted to our advertising measurement partner, Adjust, for the purpose of providing us with advertising statistics. However, Adjust does not store a User’s membership identification number but passes this back to us to assist us in detecting fraud. The third-party pixels and JavaScript snippets that we use for our affiliate partners, as well as for companies such as Google, Bing, Yahoo, and Facebook, work much more simply than those with Adjust. In those cases we use either JavaScript snippets provided by our affiliate partners, an image-based pixel, or IFrame (an IFrame or inline frame is an HTML document embedded inside another HTML document on a website; the IFrame HTML element is often used to insert content from another source, such as an advertisement, into a web page) which fire based on a cookie dropped in the User’s browser, or we use a server-to-server URL which fires based on the initial click identification or transaction identification number based on a cookie;
where parents, legal guardians, or those with parental responsibility for Child User(s) have linked a Family Account to a Teacher Account, as described in the
Terms & Conditions
, the Adult Users of both Accounts will be able to review the progress and details of their Child Users within both Accounts;
as we believe to be necessary or appropriate as set forth above in Other Uses and Disclosures and in other instances substantially similar to those listed in this section;
where legally required and in certain other cases, we may make such disclosures without first providing notice to Users; and
subject to confidentiality agreements, the terms of this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, and applicable data protection and privacy law, information may be disclosed to service providers, advisors, potential transactional partners, or other third parties in connection with the consideration, negotiation, or completion of a corporate transaction in which we are acquired by or merged with another company or we sell, liquidate, transfer, or license all or a portion of our assets in bankruptcy or otherwise. This means that if some or all of our assets are acquired or otherwise transferred or licensed, including in bankruptcy, that such acquirer shall be subject to the same commitments stated under this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy.
Any third parties to whom we disclose Personal Data are governed by terms of their own privacy policy and this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy does not apply to them.
We do not disclose the personally identifiable information of any Child User to third parties for any marketing or promotional purposes.
As used in this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy,
Anonymous Data
means data that does not relate to an identified or identifiable natural person or Personal Data rendered anonymous in such a manner that the Data Subject is not, or is no longer, identifiable. Anonymous Data does not, by itself, permit the identification of individual persons and is therefore not regarded as Personal Data.
We also may disclose Anonymous Data and/or aggregated User information for any other purpose as permissible by applicable data protection and privacy law—for example, the distribution of de-identified User records to outside researchers or the distribution of reports containing aggregate user demographic and traffic patterns—provided that no individual Adult User or Child User or any specific end-user device can be readily identified.
How to Access, Change, or Delete Account Information; Your Rights
An Adult User can review or change the information they provided when they registered for the Services, including by adding or removing Child Users to or from the Account, by updating information through the Parent section of the Services or, for Teacher Accounts, by using the Class Builder or Settings feature in the Teacher Dashboard. In addition, Adult Users may contact us at any time as described in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
) below to request that we provide for their review, or delete from our records, any Personal Data they have provided about Child Users associated with their Accounts, or to cease collecting Personal Data from those Child Users, as applicable. Please keep in mind that a request to delete Personal Data may lead to cancellation of your Account or the inability to use certain Services, and if a Teacher Account is linked to a Family Account, a request to delete Personal Data in one of the Accounts may be reflected in the other Account.
When we change or delete any Personal Data at your request, we will make good faith efforts to make the changes in our then-active databases as soon as reasonably practicable, generally within 24–48 hours. Changing setting options may not result in immediate changes to the settings, which are subject to our operations and maintenance schedules. Please note that information, including Personal Data, may remain in backup or archive records, and we may retain certain data relevant to preventing fraud or future abuse or for legitimate business purposes, such as analysis of aggregated, non-personally-identifiable or Anonymous Data, account recovery, or if required by law. All retained data will continue to be subject to the Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy in effect at that time.
School Accounts:
If you are using the Services through a School Account that is integrated with a school student information system (
SIS
), any request to access or make changes to or delete Personal Data including data concerning students (
Student Data
) must be made by the Educational Institution within the SIS. Once the changes are made within the SIS, the changes will automatically appear within the School Account.
If you are using the Services through a School Account and the Educational Institution is not integrating its SIS with the Services, any request to access, make changes to, or delete Personal Data including Student Data must be made by the Educational Institution’s designated administrator for the School Account. The administrator will be provided access to the School Account User Profile pages in order to update, correct, or delete the information contained therein.
Your Rights:
the right to access the Personal Data we hold about you: you may access the Personal Data we hold about you at any time by contacting us as described in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
);
where our processing of your Personal Data is based on your consent, the right to withdraw your consent to such processing at any time;
the right to rectification of your Personal Data: you can also contact us to update or correct any inaccuracies in your Personal Data;
the right to restriction of processing or to object to processing of your Personal Data;
the right to request us to transfer your Personal Data to a third party in a standardized machine-readable format;
the right to object to direct marketing. You may contact us at any time to opt out of direct marketing communications (as referred to above at section 5 (
Advertising and Marketing
));
the right to request we erase and forget your Personal Data. You can request that we erase your Personal Data; and
the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority. In the United Kingdom, this is the Information Commissioner’s Office (
ICO
) and in Australia, this is the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner (
OAIC
).
If you wish to exercise any of these rights, please contact us using the details in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
). In your request, please make clear: (i)
what
Personal Data is concerned; and (ii)
which of the above rights
you would like to enforce. For your protection, we may only implement requests with respect to the Personal Data associated with the particular email address that you use to send us your request, and we may need to verify your identity before implementing your request. We will try to comply with your request as soon as reasonably practicable and, in any event, within one month of your request. Please note that we may need to retain certain information for recordkeeping purposes and/or to complete any transactions that you began prior to requesting such change or deletion.
Account Cancellation and Reactivation; Data Deletion
We only keep your Personal Data for as long as necessary in relation to the purpose for which we are processing that information. To determine the appropriate retention period for Personal Data, we consider the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the Personal Data, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your Personal Data, the purposes for which we process your Personal Data and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, and the applicable legal requirements.
At any time, Adult Users, with the exception of School Accounts, may cancel their Accounts through the Parent section or Teacher Dashboard section of the Services.
For Family Accounts that have been cancelled, if the Account remains inactive for 24 months, we will delete all Personal Data in our active databases associated with the Account (
Account Information
). The 24 months is provided so that you have the ability, following cancellation of a Family Account or inactivity, to reactivate your Account and potentially recover previous information and resume where the Child User left off. However, we provide no guarantee, and shall have no liability or obligation to ensure that all Account Information and Services-related progress will be available or accessible or all learning or personalization features will be able to be recovered or resumed. If a User requests that Personal Data be deleted prior to the end of the 24-month period of inactivity, we will take commercially reasonable steps to satisfy that request.
For School Accounts, Adult Users should contact their respective Educational Institution for any questions regarding account cancellation and data deletion. If an Educational Institutional terminates its agreement with AofL Schools, AofL Schools will delete, or if requested by the Educational Institution, transfer to the Educational Institution all Student Data within 90 days following the termination of the agreement with the applicable Educational Institution.
Upon Account cancellation, Adult and Child User Anonymised Data may nonetheless persist internally in our archive files or similar databases and may still be used, on an anonymous basis, for our internal support, administrative, and record-keeping purposes including, but not limited to, allowing us to improve the Services and other services we provide through research, evaluation, and analytics as permissible by applicable data protection and privacy law.
Please note that following a request to delete information or your Account under Sections 9 or 10 of this Privacy Policy, information including Personal Data may remain in backup or archive records, and we may retain certain data if required by law, relevant to preventing fraud or future abuse, or for legitimate business purposes, such as account recovery and customer support, and all subject to our internal records retention periods. All retained data will continue to be subject to the Privacy Policy in effect at that time and applicable law.
Links to Other Services
In certain sections of the Services, we may include links to external websites or applications (including Facebook, Twitter, YouTube, Instagram, and Pinterest). However, in order to protect children from accessing these external websites, an Adult User will be required to enter a valid password. These websites and applications are governed by their own privacy policies or information collection practices, which may be substantially different from ours. We encourage you to review the privacy policies and information collection practices of any external websites and applications, as those parties’ practices would not be subject to this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy.
Location of Information Processing
The Services are controlled and operated by us from the United States of America. Your information may be transferred to, stored, and processed by us, our associates, and our third-party service providers in any country where we have facilities or in which we engage service providers, including the United States of America, which may have data protection laws that are different from those of your country. Specifically, we may transfer Personal Data from the European Economic Area (EEA) to:
countries that the European Commission has deemed to adequately safeguard Personal Data;
pursuant to the recipient’s compliance with standard contractual clauses, EU-US Privacy Shield, or Binding Corporate Rules;
pursuant to the consent of the individual to whom the Personal Data pertains, or
as otherwise permitted by applicable EEA requirements.
For Australian Users, we may transfer your Personal Data from Australia to:
the United States of America;
the EEA;
In addition, your information may be subject to access requests from governments, courts, or law enforcement officials in countries where it may be processed, under the laws of those countries.
By using the Services, you agree to this transfer, storing, or processing. We will take all steps reasonably necessary to ensure that your Personal Data is treated securely and in accordance with this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy.
Security
The security of your Personal Data is important to us, and we employ physical, technical, and administrative security measures designed to safeguard the Personal Data collected by the Services and to guard against unauthorized or unlawful processing of Personal Data and against damage to, accidental loss, or destruction of your Personal Data. We use industry-standard SSL (secure socket layer technology) encryption to transfer Personal Data. Other security safeguards include, but are not limited to, data encryption, firewalls, and physical access controls to buildings and files.
Account holders create a password in the registration process. You can help protect against unauthorized access to your account and Personal Data by selecting and protecting your password appropriately and limiting access to your computer and browser by signing off after you have finished accessing your account. At registration, we assign a Member ID to each Account and use those Member IDs to authenticate logins, allow access to the subscription content, and monitor compliance. The Member ID is also used to authenticate users when requesting technical support. Access to information is limited (through user/password credentials and two-factor authentication) to those employees who require it to perform their job functions.
We also use PCI-DDS compliant services providers for credit card processing as required by applicable law.
School Accounts
We are committed to maintaining the security and confidentiality of your and your children’s Personal Data, including, but not limited to, any Student Data, which we receive through School Accounts. Some of the precautions we take include (a) limiting employee access to your and your children’s Personal Data to only those employees with a need to such access to fulfill their job responsibilities; (b) conducting background checks on our employees and, specifically, upon all employees that may have access to Student Data; (c) requiring employees to sign confidentiality agreements upon hiring; (d) conducting regular employee privacy and data security training and education; and (e) protecting Personal Data with technical, contractual, administrative, and physical security safeguards.
Please be aware, however, that no information system can be guaranteed to be 100 percent secure, so we cannot guarantee the absolute security of your information. Moreover, we are not responsible for the security of information you transmit to the Services over networks that we do not control, including the internet and wireless networks. If you have reason to believe that your interaction with us is not secure, please contact us as described in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
) below.
Cookie Policy
What Are Cookies?
Our websites and Apps use cookies. Cookies are small text files placed on your device to collect standard internet log information and visitor behavior information. The cookies may transmit information via your browser with a purpose of authenticating or identifying the computer (via, e.g., the IP address) or the User. Cookies may contain information such as registration data and User preferences.
We use cookies to:
automatically collect certain technical information from your computer or mobile device over time and across different websites, including when you use the Services, such as your browser type, operating system, device type, the page served, your IP address and your geolocation. When you download and use our App(s), we and our service providers may track and collect App usage data, such as the date and time the App on your device accesses our servers and what information and files have been downloaded to the App based on your device number;
collect and store information about your location to provide you with educational experiences or email updates that are tailored for your region. The location information we have access to may include (1) your postal code, if you provide one to us; and (2) the approximate geographic region your computer or mobile device is located in, as determined from your IP address. However, we do not collect your street name and the name of your city/town. You may be able to change the settings on your computer or mobile device to prevent it from providing us with such IP information. We also have access to your school or classroom location if you (as a teacher) provide it to us;
we may collect information from your mobile device if you have downloaded our App(s). This information is generally used to help us deliver the most relevant information to you. Examples of information that may be collected and used include your IP address, geographic location, how you use the App(s), and information about the type of device you use. In addition, in the event our App(s) crash on your mobile device, we will receive information about your mobile device model software version and device carrier, which allows us to identify and fix bugs and otherwise improve the performance of our App(s). This information is sent to us as aggregated information and is not traceable to any individual and cannot be used to identify an individual. In addition, if you choose to turn on your Bluetooth, wi-fi or other geolocation functionality when you use our App(s), we may collect and use your geolocation information; and
we may also use third-party advertising networks to collect cookie information about Adult Users’ visits to the non-child-directed portions of the Services and to (1) deliver interest-based advertising to those Adult Users, including Homeschool+™-branded advertising, when those Adult Users visit third-party websites; and (2) provide us with statistics about the effectiveness of our advertising on third-party websites. These third-party advertising networks may use this cookie information in accordance with their own privacy policies. Please refer to section 8 (
When We Disclose Information to Third Parties
) above for more information about what Personal Data is transferred to our third-party advertising measurement partner.
When a server receives a request from a device which stores a cookie from a website, the server is able to use the information stored in the cookie in combination with the information stored on the server to allow the website to respond to you as an individual and to tailor their operations to your needs, likes, and dislikes by gathering and remembering information about your preferences. A cookie cannot collect information from your computer and cannot carry any viral or other damaging files.
b. Do Not Track Signals:
Some Internet browsers may be configured to send “Do Not Track” signals to the online services that you visit. We currently do not respond to Do Not Track signals. You may opt out of many third-party ad networks, including those operated by members of the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance
(EIDAA)
. For more information regarding this practice by EIDAA members, and your choices regarding having this information used by these companies, including how to opt out of third-party ad networks operated by EIDAA members, please visit their website: http://www.edaa.eu/ (EIDAA) and
www.youronlinechoices.com
and
http://www.youronlinechoices.com.au/
for Australian Users.
c. Effect of Opting Out of Member Network:
Opting out of the EIDAA member network only means that those members no longer will deliver targeted content or ads to you. It does not mean you will no longer receive any targeted content or ads on our Services or other websites. You may continue to receive advertisements, for example, based on the particular website that you are viewing. Also, if your browsers are configured to reject cookies when you visit this opt-out page, or you subsequently erase your cookies, use a different computer, or change web browsers, your EIDAA opt-out may no longer be effective. Additional information is available on EIDAA’s website accessible by the above link.
d. Types of Cookies:
We may offer cookies to you, and if you do not wish to receive them you should ensure that your web browser is set up to not accept cookies. Please note that if you disable cookies, some Services or website functionality may not be available. We use the following cookies:
Essential Cookies
These cookies are essential to provide you with services available through Services and to enable you to use some of its features. For example, they allow you to log in to secure areas of our Services and help the content of the pages you request load quickly. Without these cookies, the services that you have asked for cannot be provided, and we only use these cookies to provide you with those services.
Functionality Cookies
These cookies allow us to remember choices you make when you use our Services, such as remembering your language preferences, remembering your login details, and remembering the changes you make to other parts of Services which you can customize. The purpose of these cookies is to provide you with a more personal experience and to avoid you having to re-enter your preferences every time you visit our Services.
Analytics and Performance Cookies
These cookies are used to collect information about traffic to our Services and how users use the Services. The information gathered does not identify any individual visitor. It includes the number of visitors to our Services, the websites that referred them to our Services, the pages they visited on our Services, what time of day they visited our Services, whether they have visited our Services before, and other similar information. We use this information to help operate our Services more efficiently, to gather broad demographic information, and to monitor the level of activity on our Services.
Social Media Cookies
These cookies are used when you share information using a social media sharing button or “like” button on our Services or you link your account or engage with our content on or through a social networking website such as Facebook, Twitter, or Google+. The social network will record that you have done this.
By continuing to use our Services, you are accepting our use of these cookies that make advertising and communications more relevant to you and your interests and further help us to improve our Services.
e. Pixel Tags and IFrames:
<
We also use pixel tags (which are also known as web beacons and clear GIFs) on our Services to track the actions of Users on our Services. Unlike cookies, which are stored on the hard drive of your computer or mobile device by a website, pixel tags are embedded invisibly on web pages. Pixel tags measure the success of our marketing campaigns and compile statistics about usage of the Services, so that we can manage our content more effectively. The information we collect using pixel tags is not linked to our Users’ Personal Data.
We additionally use JavaScript snippets and server to server requests that are provided by our affiliate partners and IFrames (or inline frames) on our Services to insert content from another source into a web page, particularly in respect of advertisements in order to provide advertisements about goods and services likely to be of interest to our Users. An IFrame is an HTML document embedded inside another HTML document on a website.
We and our third-party service providers may use the information collected through these technical methods for a number of purposes, including delivering content, tracking and enhancing our Users’ experience on the Services, and delivering advertising to visitors of www.homeschoolplus.com when they visit other websites and applications. For example, when you return to the Services after logging in, cookies help the Services recognize who you are without having to log back in. For more information, see section 6 (
How We Use Information
) above. The information collected through these technical methods on the child-directed portions of the Services are used only to support the internal operations of the Services. We do not allow third- party advertising networks to collect information about Child Users who are logged into their Accounts.
f. Cookies We Use:
Our Services use the following
cookies
:
g. Managing You Cookies
Cookies help you to get the most out of our Services, and if you disable cookies some Services or website functionality may not be available. If you do not want the Services to collect information through the use of cookies, you can set your web browser to reject cookies from the Services.
How to enable and disable cookies using your browser:
Most browsers allow you to manage cookie settings. These settings can usually be found in the Settings, Options, or Preferences menu of your browser. The links below are provided to help you find the settings for some common browsers:
manage cookie settings in
Chrome
,
Chrome Android
, and
Chrome iOS
;
manage cookie settings in
Safari
and
Safari iOS
;
manage cookie settings in
Firefox
;
manage cookie settings in
Internet Explorer
; and
manage cookie settings in
Opera
.
For all other browsers, please look for a
Help
function in your browser or contact the browser provider.
However, as mentioned above, if you reject or block cookies from the Services, the Services may not function as intended. For example, you will not be able to remain logged in to your account, and therefore you would have to log in during each page transition.
Further information about cookies, including how to see what cookies have been set on your computer or mobile device and how to manage and delete them, visit
www.allaboutcookies.org
and
www.youronlinechoices.com/uk
and
http://www.youronlinechoices.com.au/
for Australian Users.
Changes to Our Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy
We constantly try to provide the best services, and accordingly our Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy will change from time to time. If we update this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, we will notify you by posting the revised Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy on the Services, and for certain revisions that materially expand the ways in which we use or share the information previously collected from you through the Services, either display an alert next to the Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, display an alert upon login to the Services, or directly communicate with you (e.g., via the email address associated with your Account). If you have a School Account, any modifications to this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy will only apply to you and your Child User in accordance with the AofL Schools agreement with your Educational Institution.
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
To exercise the access, disclosure, data portability, and deletion rights  submit a verifiable consumer request to us by  visiting here:
Privacy Portal
We are committed to resolving any complaints about our collection or use of your Personal Data. If you would like to make a complaint regarding this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy or our practices in relation to your Personal Data, please contact us as described below. We will reply to your complaint as soon as we can and, in any event, within 45 days. We hope to resolve any complaint brought to our attention; however, if you feel that your complaint has not been adequately resolved, you reserve the right to contact the ICO or the OAIC (as applicable), as detailed in section 9 (
How to Access, Change, or Delete Account Information; Your Rights
) above.
Age of Learning, Inc. and Age of Learning for Schools, Inc. are each located in the United States of America. Age of Learning, Inc. is the operator of all of the Services except Homeschool+™ for Schools, operated by Age of Learning for Schools, Inc. Any questions, concerns, or complaints regarding this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, our data collection or processing practices, or issues related to your or a Child User’s information for which you are responsible should be directed to us via any of the following methods. As Age of Learning, Inc. and Age of Learning for Schools, Inc. are each located in the United States of America, we have appointed a representative in the European Union and APAC so that our European Users and Australian Users may easily contact us:
For Family Accounts:
Postal Address:
Age of Learning, Inc.
Attention: Legal Department
P.O. Box 230
Glendale, CA 91209
USA
Telephone Number: 1-800-633-3331
Email Address: privacy@aofl.com
For School Accounts:
Postal Address:
Age of Learning, Inc.
Attention: Legal Department
P.O. Box 230
Glendale, CA 91209
USA
Telephone Number: 1-800-633-3331
Email Address: privacy@aofl.com
European Representative:
Postal Address: Please see list below
Age of Learning, Inc.
Attention: DPR Group
Email Address: datainquiry@dpr.eu.com or through the online portal at
http://www.dpr.eu.com/datarequest
APAC/Australian Representative:
Postal Address:
Age of Learning, Inc.
Attention: Legal Department
P.O. Box 230
Glendale, CA 91209
USA
Telephone Number: 1-800-633-3331
Email Address: privacy@aofl.com
We have appointed DPR Group as our Data Protection Representative in the European Union so that you can contact them directly in your home country. DPR Group has locations in each of the 28 EU countries, so that Age of Learning, Inc.’s customers can always raise the questions they want with them.
PLEASE NOTE: when mailing inquiries, it is ESSENTIAL that you mark your letters for ‘DPR Group’ and not ‘Age of Learning, Inc.’ or your inquiry may not reach us. Please refer clearly to Age of Learning, Inc. in your correspondence. On receiving your correspondence, the Company will likely request evidence of your identity, to ensure your personal data and information connected with it is not provided to anyone other than you. If you have any concerns over how DPR Group will handle the personal data they will require to undertake their services, please refer to their privacy notice at
https://www.dpr.eu.com/legal-privacy
.
DPR Postal Addresses
Austria
DPR Group, City Tower, Brückenkopfgasse 1/6. Stock, Graz, 8020, Austria
Belgium
DPR Group, Place de L’Université 16, Louvain-La-Neuve, Waals Brabant, 1348, Belgium
Bulgaria
DPR Group, 132 Mimi Balkanska Str., Sofia, 1540, Bulgaria
Croatia
DPR Group, Ground & 9th Floor, Hoto Tower, Savska cesta 32, Zagreb, 10000, Croatia
Cyprus
DPR Group, Victory House, 205 Archbishop Makarios Avenue, Limassol, 3030, Cyprus
Czech Republic
DPR Group, IQ Ostrava Ground floor, 28. rijna 3346/91, Ostrava-mesto, Moravska, Ostrava, Czech Republic
Denmark
DPR Group, Lautruphøj 1-3, Ballerup, 2750, Denmark
Estonia
DPR Group, 2nd Floor, Tornimae 5, Tallinn, 10145, Estonia
Finland
DPR Group, Luna House, 5.krs, Mannerheimintie 12 B, Helsinki, 00100, Finland
France
DPR Group, 72 rue de Lessard, Rouen, 76100, France
Germany
DPR Group, 3rd and 4th floor, Altmarkt 10 B/D, Dresden, 01067, Germany
Greece
DPR Group, 24 Lagoumitzi str, Athens, 17671, Greece
Hungary
DPR Group, EMKE Building, Rákóczi Út 42, Budapest, 1072, Hungary
Ireland
DPR Group, Phoenix House, Monahan Road, Cork, T12 H1XY, Republic of Ireland
Italy
DPR Group, BPM 335368, Via Roma 12, 10073 , Turin, Italy
Latvia
DPR Group, 4th & 5th floors, 14 Terbatas Street, Riga, LV-1011, Latvia
Lithuania
DPR Group, 44A Gedimino Avenue, 01110 Vilnius, Lithuania
Luxembourg
DPR Group, BPM 335368, Banzelt 4 A, 6921, Roodt-sur-Syre, Luxembourg
Malta
DPR Group, Tower Business Centre, 2nd floor, Tower Street, Swatar, BKR4013, Malta
Netherlands
DPR Group, Cuserstraat 93, Floor 2 and 3, Amsterdam, 1081 CN, Netherlands
Poland
DPR Group, Budynek Fronton ul Kamienna 21, Krakow, 31-403, Poland
Portugal
DPR Group, Torre de Monsanto, Rua Afonso Praça 30, 7th floor, Algès, Lisbon, 1495-061, Portugal
Romania
DPR Group, World Trade Centre, Piata Montreal no 10, Entrance F, 1st Floor, Sector 1, Bucharest, 11469, Romania
Slovakia
DPR Group, Apollo Business Centre II, Block E / 9th floor, 4D Prievozska, Bratislava, 821 09, Slovakia
Slovenia
DPR Group, Trg. Republike 3, Floor 3, Ljubljana, 1000, Slovenia
Spain
DPR Group, Puerta de las Naciones, Ribera del Loira 46, Madrid, 28042, Spain
Sweden
DPR Group, S:t Johannesgatan 2, 4th floor, Malmo, SE – 211 46, Sweden
United Kingdom
DPR Group, BPM 335368, 372 Old Street, EC1V 9AU, London, United Kingdom
Sub-policy 8
https://www.ageoflearning.com/hs-privacy-gdpr/:
Skip to content
Homeschool Plus Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy
Effective Date: January 11, 2023
Table of Contents
Introduction
Types of Accounts, Services, and Users
Child Safe Guarantee
Personal Data We Collect and How We Collect it
Advertising and Marketing
How We Use Your Personal Data
Lawful Basis for Processing of Personal Data
When We Disclose Information to Third Parties
How to Access, Change, or Delete Account Information; Your Rights
Account Cancellation and Reactivation; Data Deletion
Links to Other Services
Location of Information Processing
Security
Cookie Policy
Changes to Our Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
Introduction
Welcome to Homeschool+™, which is owned and operated by Age of Learning, Inc. We are committed to providing children with a learning environment where every activity is just as fun as it is educational and where you can feel confident that your children’s privacy is protected.
This Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy describes the ways in which Age of Learning, Inc., and its subsidiaries (collectively,
we
,
our
,
us
, or the
Company
) collect, process, and disclose information about our Users (as defined below) within Europe and Australia and the children who use the accounts of our European or Australian Users through Homeschool+™, and any other websites, applications, and online services (
Apps
) that link to this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy (collectively, the
Services
), including Homeschool+™ for Schools, operated by our wholly owned subsidiary Age of Learning for Schools, Inc. (
AofL Schools
). AofL Schools provides School Accounts (as defined below) for schools, school districts, licensed childcare facilities, and other licensed educational institutions or programs (each, an
Educational Institution
). Our Services are directed toward nursery school through second-grade aged children.
This Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy applies across multiple jurisdictions, such as Europe (where the General Data Protection Regulation (EU) 2016/679 (
GDPR
)) applies and Australia (where the Australian Privacy Act 1988 (Cth) (
Privacy Act
) applies).
Personal Data
For the purposes of this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, the term “Personal Data” encompasses both the definition of “Personal Data” under the GDPR and the definition of “Personal Information” under the Privacy Act, as set out below for European Users and Australian Users respectively.
Personal Data under the GDPR for European Users
The term
Personal Data
is defined in the
GDPR
as “
any information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person
(Data Subject)
; an identifiable natural person is one who can be identified, directly or indirectly, in particular by reference to an identifier such as a name, an identification number, location data, an online identifier or one or more factors specific to the physical, physiological, genetic, mental, economic, cultural, or social identity of that natural person.
”
Personal Information under the Privacy Act for Australian Users
Under the Privacy Act, “
Personal Information
” is defined to mean “
information or an opinion about an identified individual, or an individual who is reasonably identifiable”:
a) whether the information or opinion is true or not; and
b) whether the information or opinion is recorded in a material form or not.
Please read this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy and our
Terms & Conditions
carefully to understand our views and practices regarding your Personal Data and how we will treat it. By using the Services, you consent to our use of your Personal Data and agree to the terms of this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy. We may provide additional privacy notices to individuals at the time we collect their Personal Data. This type of an “in-time” notice will govern how we may process the Personal Data you provide at that time. If you do not agree to our use of your Personal Data in line with this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, please do not use the Services.
Types of Accounts, Services, and Users
How we collect, process, and disclose Personal Data depends on the type of account held and the type of User (as defined below). We currently offer consumers
Family Accounts
, which are detailed in our
Terms & Conditions
and, separately, AofL Schools provides
School Accounts
for schools, school districts, licensed childcare facilities, or other licensed educational institutions or programs (each, an
Educational Institution
), which are only for Educational Institutions.
The provisions of this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy apply to all Family Accounts and School Accounts (collectively,
Accounts
). Any differences in how the Accounts are treated are identified below.
Users of the Services include
Child Users
(any child under 16 who uses the learning portion of the Services) and
Adult Users
(including parents, legal guardians and anyone with parental responsibility for Child Users, purchasers of an Account as a gift (
Gift Account
), and teachers), collectively referred to as
Users
.
Child Safe Guarantee
The Services are backed by our Child Safe Guarantee. This means that Accounts will never include any pop-up ads or other advertisements directed to children. In addition, Child Users are blocked from accessing external links. External links will only be available if an Adult User enters his or her password.
Personal Data We Collect and How We Collect it
a. Personal Data
As more fully set forth below, we and our third-party service providers collect Personal Data directly from Users that such Users provide when using the Services, including when Adult Users create an Account, sign up for Services, or contact us with a question, comment, request, or complaint. However, we will only use or disclose this information in accordance with this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy and applicable data protection and privacy law. Please see section 8 (When We Disclose Information to Third Parties) below for more information and how we limit disclosure of Child User information.
If you created a profile/registered with us, you will have been asked to tick to agree to provide this information in order to access our Services, purchase our products, and/or view our content.
i. Adult Users
Adult Users are asked to provide certain Personal Data about themselves when registering for any Account, including:
1. first name;
2. last name;
3. email address; and
4. telephone number (optional).
Any other information provided at registration depends on the type of Account or Adult User. For example:
Payment information
is collected from Adult Users who purchase a Family Account, including those who purchase a Gift Account for others. For your security, we do not store your complete credit card number in our databases but retain only the first six digits and last four digits so that we can identify your Account and respond to your requests, questions, or complaints.
The email address of a parent, legal guardian, or person with parental responsibility
is collected when the Adult User purchasing a Family Account states that he or she is not the legal guardian, or if a teacher provides such addresses in order for parents, legal guardians, or those with parental responsibility to connect to the Teacher Account or School Account.
Adult Users who register for a Family Account or School Account are asked to provide certain Personal Data about the relevant Child Users of such Accounts during Homeschool+™ registration, including:
1. the first name (or nickname);
2. birth month and year; and
3. gender
of Child Users who will be accessing the Services through their Accounts.
When an Adult User submits any Personal Data relating to a Child User in connection with the Services, the Adult User represents that they have the authority to do so and agree to us using the Personal Data in accordance with this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy.
In addition, Adult Users can provide us with information through separate password-protected sections (i.e., the Parent section or Teacher Dashboard) of the Services. These sections, accessible via the Menu or Settings link on the Services, allow Adult Users to administer their accounts, including when they add Child Users, provide testimonials, seek customer support, or submit comments or questions.
We do not ask for certain sensitive Personal Data such as your national insurance number, driver’s license number, or biometric data. However, as mentioned above, paying subscribers are asked for payment information when they subscribe. Please see section 13 (Security) below for more information about how we safeguard payment information.
ii. Child Users
Children have the ability to create free-form artwork. We encourage you to use the Services with your Child Users and to view and monitor any content created or uploaded (if applicable) by them. If you would like to review all content saved by your Child Users, you can access this content by clicking on the My Files menu item in each Child User’s About Me section of the Services.
Other than in the places and for the purposes explicitly disclosed in this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, we do not knowingly collect any Personal Data directly from Child Users under the age of 16.
b. Personal Data Automatically Collected from Users
Because the security of your Personal Data is important to us, we only ask for Personal Data where it is reasonably necessary to provide the Services, and we only process your Personal Data in accordance with this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy and applicable data protection and privacy laws.
We and our third-party service providers automatically collect some Personal Data directly from users of the Services in the form of the actions they take and activities they complete when using the Services. For example, from Adult Users, we may collect information about patterns of usage and order history; from Child Users, we may collect information about patterns of usage, which activities a child commences and completes, when a child starts and stops an activity, which areas of the Services the child frequents, the number of questions answered correctly or incorrectly, how many Tickets the child earns, what virtual items the child selects to exchange for Tickets, and the child’s choice of Avatar and customization.
We and our third-party service providers also use a variety of technologies, such as pixel tags and cookies (small text files that the Services save on your computer or mobile device), to automatically collect certain technical information from your computer or mobile device—see section 14 (Cookie Policy) below for further details about how we use pixel tags and cookies.
c. Automated Decision Making and Profiling:
We do not use your Personal Data for the purposes of automated decision-making. However, we may do so in order to fulfill obligations imposed by law, in which case we will inform you of any such processing and provide you with an opportunity to object.
Advertising and Marketing
a. Advertising
We use third parties such as network advertisers and others to assist us in advertising, including displaying our advertisements on other websites and through social media platforms; we also may use third parties that display advertisements based on your visits to our Services, as well as other websites, and other third parties to assist us in identifying relevant advertising on our Services. These third parties may collect and use click stream information, browser type, time and date, and subject of advertisements clicked or scrolled over during your visits to the Services and other websites in order to provide advertisements about goods and services likely to be of interest to you. Third-party ad network providers, advertisers, sponsors, and/or traffic measurement services may use cookies, JavaScript, web beacons (including clear GIFs), Flash LSOs, and other technologies to measure the effectiveness of their ads and to personalize advertising content to you. These third-party cookies and other technologies are governed by each third party’s specific privacy policy, not this one. We may provide these third-party advertisers with Personal Data about your usage of our Services, as well as anonymous data about visitors to and users of our Services.
Advertising to you is based on your visits to the non-child-directed portions of the Services (such as www.homeschoolplus.com) when you visit third-party websites and applications. We will never use information collected in the child-directed portions of the Services for targeted advertising purposes.
b. Marketing
We would like to send you information about our products and Services and those of our associated companies which may be of interest to you. If you have opted in to receive marketing information, you may opt out at a later date. You may not opt out of receiving administrative messages from us regarding your Account, such as password reset emails, customer support messages, and emails about changes to our Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy in accordance with section 15 (
Changes to Our Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy
).
You have a right at any time to stop us or any associated companies from contacting you for marketing purposes—if you no longer wish to be contacted for marketing purposes please contact us via the contact details in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
) below or click on the Unsubscribe button at the bottom of any email received from us.
While it is never our intention to send any marketing messages to children, if you believe a Child User has received such a marketing communication, please contact us as described in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
) below.
Push Notifications and SMS.
Additionally, if you downloaded the App on your mobile device to access the Services, as part of your use of the Services we may ask if you would like to receive push notifications, which may include alerts and notifications, badges, banners, and sounds on your mobile device. You may choose to stop receiving push notifications at any time by changing the settings on your mobile device. We may also ask if you would like to receive SMS text messages. Please note that your network provider may charge you for the text messages you receive. To permanently stop receiving SMS text messages from us text STOP, CANCEL, or UNSUBSCRIBE in reply to any SMS text message sent by us.
How We Use Your Personal Data
We and our third-party service providers may use the information collected from Users as follows:
Adult User Personal Data.
Personal Data collected from Adult Users may be used:
to generate a transaction identification number and member identification number, which is used by us to identify certain transactions and Users;
to permit you to register and use the Services, including, for example, to send you communications about Child User progress or your Account, or to allow you to provide Feedback through the Parent section. For security purposes, the Parent section is password protected;
for Family Accounts, to complete and fulfill your purchase, such as to process your payments, communicate with you regarding your purchase, and provide you with related customer service;
to respond to your enquiries or complaints and fulfill your requests, retrieve your password or provide technical support;
to deliver Homeschool+™ advertising and to measure the effectiveness of our advertising to adults (see section 5 (
Advertising and Marketing
) above for more information); and
to send you marketing communications that we believe may be of interest to you (see section 5 (
Advertising and Marketing
) above for more information).
Child User Personal Data.
Personal Data collected from Child Users may be used:
to measure a Child User’s performance in activities and to adapt a Child User’s learning experience to the Child User’s learning needs; and
to analyse, provide progress reports on, or provide an assessment of a Child User’s performance to the Adult User on the Account.
Both Adult and Child User Personal Data.
Personal Data collected from both Adult and Child Users may be used:
to allow us to assess and improve the Services, its educational content, and other services we provide, for example, to improve our content and user experience; to research, evaluate, and improve the Services’ educational efficacy; and to inform our understanding of the Services’ user base;
to customize, adapt, and personalize Users’ viewing and content-consumption experience, for example, by measuring a Child User’s performance in activities and adapting the Child User’s learning path to his or her learning needs;
to detect fraud;
to maintain and analyze the functioning of the Services; and
as we believe to be necessary or appropriate: (a) under applicable data protection and privacy law, including laws outside your country of residence; (b) to comply with legal process; (c) to respond to requests from public and government authorities, including public and government authorities outside your country of residence; (d) to detect violations of and enforce our
Terms and Conditions
; (e) to protect our operations or those of any of our associates, including the security of the Services; (f) to protect our rights, privacy, safety, or property, or that of our associates, you, or others; and (g) to allow us to pursue available remedies or limit the damages that we may sustain (collectively, (a)-(g) are
Other Uses and Disclosures
).
We will never sell or rent the Personal Data of any User of the Services to a third party, except as described in this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy in the context of a sale of the Company.
Where we intend to process your Personal Data for a purpose other than that for which it was originally collected, we will provide you with information on that other purpose and any relevant further information prior to such processing.
Lawful Basis for Processing of Personal Data
We only process Personal Data where we have a lawful basis for doing so, including the following:
User consent:
this refers to where you have given us explicit permission to process Personal Data for a given purpose. For example, by using our website and consenting to our cookies you give consent that we may obtain certain Personal Data about you, including your IP address and certain user preferences (see section 14 (
Cookie Policy
) below for more information). If we rely on consent as a lawful basis for the processing of your Personal Data, we will seek such consent at the time we collect your Personal Data.
For our legitimate business purposes:
this covers where we have a legitimate interest, as a business, to process Personal Data. For example, to manage enquiries, requests, and complaints; to undertake general administrative tasks in connection with our Services; to provide you with information about our Services; to improve, maintain, and analyse our Services; and to detect fraud.
For contractual necessity:
this covers situations where we must process Personal Data to meet our contractual obligations. For example, where you hold an Account with us, we would need to process your payment information to fulfill your subscription.
For compliance with a legal obligation:
this covers situations where we must process Personal Data in order to comply with the law; we may share your information with third parties such as regulatory authorities, or where we are under a legal obligation to disclose your information (for example, where we are required to share information in accordance with legislation, to prevent fraud and other criminal offenses, or because of a court order). We may disclose your information in order to enforce our legal rights or to protect the legal rights of us or others.
When We Disclose Information to Third Parties
Information collected from both Adult and Child Users will not be disclosed except as follows:
to third parties who perform certain services for us, such as to process debit and credit cards; to conduct or evaluate research (such as on the educational impact of the Services); and to provide us with statistics about the effectiveness of our advertising on third-party websites, provided that the service providers agree to keep the information confidential and to use it only for purposes that are permitted by this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy. In respect of advertising analytics data, when a User subscribes or downloads our Apps, certain Personal Data (including a User’s transaction identification number, which cannot be linked to individual Users, and member identification number, which can be linked to individual Users) is transmitted to our advertising measurement partner, Adjust, for the purpose of providing us with advertising statistics. However, Adjust does not store a User’s membership identification number but passes this back to us to assist us in detecting fraud. The third-party pixels and JavaScript snippets that we use for our affiliate partners, as well as for companies such as Google, Bing, Yahoo, and Facebook, work much more simply than those with Adjust. In those cases we use either JavaScript snippets provided by our affiliate partners, an image-based pixel, or IFrame (an IFrame or inline frame is an HTML document embedded inside another HTML document on a website; the IFrame HTML element is often used to insert content from another source, such as an advertisement, into a web page) which fire based on a cookie dropped in the User’s browser, or we use a server-to-server URL which fires based on the initial click identification or transaction identification number based on a cookie;
where parents, legal guardians, or those with parental responsibility for Child User(s) have linked a Family Account to a Teacher Account, as described in the
Terms & Conditions
, the Adult Users of both Accounts will be able to review the progress and details of their Child Users within both Accounts;
as we believe to be necessary or appropriate as set forth above in Other Uses and Disclosures and in other instances substantially similar to those listed in this section;
where legally required and in certain other cases, we may make such disclosures without first providing notice to Users; and
subject to confidentiality agreements, the terms of this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, and applicable data protection and privacy law, information may be disclosed to service providers, advisors, potential transactional partners, or other third parties in connection with the consideration, negotiation, or completion of a corporate transaction in which we are acquired by or merged with another company or we sell, liquidate, transfer, or license all or a portion of our assets in bankruptcy or otherwise. This means that if some or all of our assets are acquired or otherwise transferred or licensed, including in bankruptcy, that such acquirer shall be subject to the same commitments stated under this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy.
Any third parties to whom we disclose Personal Data are governed by terms of their own privacy policy and this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy does not apply to them.
We do not disclose the personally identifiable information of any Child User to third parties for any marketing or promotional purposes.
As used in this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy,
Anonymous Data
means data that does not relate to an identified or identifiable natural person or Personal Data rendered anonymous in such a manner that the Data Subject is not, or is no longer, identifiable. Anonymous Data does not, by itself, permit the identification of individual persons and is therefore not regarded as Personal Data.
We also may disclose Anonymous Data and/or aggregated User information for any other purpose as permissible by applicable data protection and privacy law—for example, the distribution of de-identified User records to outside researchers or the distribution of reports containing aggregate user demographic and traffic patterns—provided that no individual Adult User or Child User or any specific end-user device can be readily identified.
How to Access, Change, or Delete Account Information; Your Rights
An Adult User can review or change the information they provided when they registered for the Services, including by adding or removing Child Users to or from the Account, by updating information through the Parent section of the Services or, for Teacher Accounts, by using the Class Builder or Settings feature in the Teacher Dashboard. In addition, Adult Users may contact us at any time as described in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
) below to request that we provide for their review, or delete from our records, any Personal Data they have provided about Child Users associated with their Accounts, or to cease collecting Personal Data from those Child Users, as applicable. Please keep in mind that a request to delete Personal Data may lead to cancellation of your Account or the inability to use certain Services, and if a Teacher Account is linked to a Family Account, a request to delete Personal Data in one of the Accounts may be reflected in the other Account.
When we change or delete any Personal Data at your request, we will make good faith efforts to make the changes in our then-active databases as soon as reasonably practicable, generally within 24–48 hours. Changing setting options may not result in immediate changes to the settings, which are subject to our operations and maintenance schedules. Please note that information, including Personal Data, may remain in backup or archive records, and we may retain certain data relevant to preventing fraud or future abuse or for legitimate business purposes, such as analysis of aggregated, non-personally-identifiable or Anonymous Data, account recovery, or if required by law. All retained data will continue to be subject to the Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy in effect at that time.
School Accounts:
If you are using the Services through a School Account that is integrated with a school student information system (
SIS
), any request to access or make changes to or delete Personal Data including data concerning students (
Student Data
) must be made by the Educational Institution within the SIS. Once the changes are made within the SIS, the changes will automatically appear within the School Account.
If you are using the Services through a School Account and the Educational Institution is not integrating its SIS with the Services, any request to access, make changes to, or delete Personal Data including Student Data must be made by the Educational Institution’s designated administrator for the School Account. The administrator will be provided access to the School Account User Profile pages in order to update, correct, or delete the information contained therein.
Your Rights:
the right to access the Personal Data we hold about you: you may access the Personal Data we hold about you at any time by contacting us as described in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
);
where our processing of your Personal Data is based on your consent, the right to withdraw your consent to such processing at any time;
the right to rectification of your Personal Data: you can also contact us to update or correct any inaccuracies in your Personal Data;
the right to restriction of processing or to object to processing of your Personal Data;
the right to request us to transfer your Personal Data to a third party in a standardized machine-readable format;
the right to object to direct marketing. You may contact us at any time to opt out of direct marketing communications (as referred to above at section 5 (
Advertising and Marketing
));
the right to request we erase and forget your Personal Data. You can request that we erase your Personal Data; and
the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority. In the United Kingdom, this is the Information Commissioner’s Office (
ICO
) and in Australia, this is the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner (
OAIC
).
If you wish to exercise any of these rights, please contact us using the details in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
). In your request, please make clear: (i)
what
Personal Data is concerned; and (ii)
which of the above rights
you would like to enforce. For your protection, we may only implement requests with respect to the Personal Data associated with the particular email address that you use to send us your request, and we may need to verify your identity before implementing your request. We will try to comply with your request as soon as reasonably practicable and, in any event, within one month of your request. Please note that we may need to retain certain information for recordkeeping purposes and/or to complete any transactions that you began prior to requesting such change or deletion.
Account Cancellation and Reactivation; Data Deletion
We only keep your Personal Data for as long as necessary in relation to the purpose for which we are processing that information. To determine the appropriate retention period for Personal Data, we consider the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the Personal Data, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your Personal Data, the purposes for which we process your Personal Data and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, and the applicable legal requirements.
At any time, Adult Users, with the exception of School Accounts, may cancel their Accounts through the Parent section or Teacher Dashboard section of the Services.
For Family Accounts that have been cancelled, if the Account remains inactive for 24 months, we will delete all Personal Data in our active databases associated with the Account (
Account Information
). The 24 months is provided so that you have the ability, following cancellation of a Family Account or inactivity, to reactivate your Account and potentially recover previous information and resume where the Child User left off. However, we provide no guarantee, and shall have no liability or obligation to ensure that all Account Information and Services-related progress will be available or accessible or all learning or personalization features will be able to be recovered or resumed. If a User requests that Personal Data be deleted prior to the end of the 24-month period of inactivity, we will take commercially reasonable steps to satisfy that request.
For School Accounts, Adult Users should contact their respective Educational Institution for any questions regarding account cancellation and data deletion. If an Educational Institutional terminates its agreement with AofL Schools, AofL Schools will delete, or if requested by the Educational Institution, transfer to the Educational Institution all Student Data within 90 days following the termination of the agreement with the applicable Educational Institution.
Upon Account cancellation, Adult and Child User Anonymized Data may nonetheless persist internally in our archive files or similar databases and may still be used, on an anonymous basis, for our internal support, administrative, and record-keeping purposes including, but not limited to, allowing us to improve the Services and other services we provide through research, evaluation, and analytics as permissible by applicable data protection and privacy law.
Please note that following a request to delete information or your Account under Sections 9 or 10 of this Privacy Policy, information including Personal Data may remain in backup or archive records, and we may retain certain data if required by law, relevant to preventing fraud or future abuse, or for legitimate business purposes, such as account recovery and customer support, and all subject to our internal records retention periods. All retained data will continue to be subject to the Privacy Policy in effect at that time and applicable law.
Links to Other Services
In certain sections of the Services, we may include links to external websites or applications (including Facebook, Twitter, YouTube, Instagram, and Pinterest). However, in order to protect children from accessing these external websites, an Adult User will be required to enter a valid password. These websites and applications are governed by their own privacy policies or information collection practices, which may be substantially different from ours. We encourage you to review the privacy policies and information collection practices of any external websites and applications, as those parties’ practices would not be subject to this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy.
Location of Information Processing
The Services are controlled and operated by us from the United States of America. Your information may be transferred to, stored, and processed by us, our associates, and our third-party service providers in any country where we have facilities or in which we engage service providers, including the United States of America, which may have data protection laws that are different from those of your country. Specifically, we may transfer Personal Data from the European Economic Area (EEA) to:
countries that the European Commission has deemed to adequately safeguard Personal Data;
pursuant to the recipient’s compliance with standard contractual clauses, EU-US Privacy Shield, or Binding Corporate Rules;
pursuant to the consent of the individual to whom the Personal Data pertains, or
as otherwise permitted by applicable EEA requirements.
For Australian Users, we may transfer your Personal Data from Australia to:
the United States of America;
the EEA;
In addition, your information may be subject to access requests from governments, courts, or law enforcement officials in countries where it may be processed, under the laws of those countries.
By using the Services, you agree to this transfer, storing, or processing. We will take all steps reasonably necessary to ensure that your Personal Data is treated securely and in accordance with this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy.
Security
The security of your Personal Data is important to us, and we employ physical, technical, and administrative security measures designed to safeguard the Personal Data collected by the Services and to guard against unauthorized or unlawful processing of Personal Data and against damage to, accidental loss, or destruction of your Personal Data. We use industry-standard SSL (secure socket layer technology) encryption to transfer Personal Data. Other security safeguards include, but are not limited to, data encryption, firewalls, and physical access controls to buildings and files.
Account holders create a password in the registration process. You can help protect against unauthorized access to your account and Personal Data by selecting and protecting your password appropriately and limiting access to your computer and browser by signing off after you have finished accessing your account. At registration, we assign a Member ID to each Account and use those Member IDs to authenticate logins, allow access to the subscription content, and monitor compliance. The Member ID is also used to authenticate users when requesting technical support. Access to information is limited (through user/password credentials and two-factor authentication) to those employees who require it to perform their job functions.
We also use PCI-DDS compliant services providers for credit card processing as required by applicable law.
School Accounts
We are committed to maintaining the security and confidentiality of your and your children’s Personal Data, including, but not limited to, any Student Data, which we receive through School Accounts. Some of the precautions we take include (a) limiting employee access to your and your children’s Personal Data to only those employees with a need to such access to fulfill their job responsibilities; (b) conducting background checks on our employees and, specifically, upon all employees that may have access to Student Data; (c) requiring employees to sign confidentiality agreements upon hiring; (d) conducting regular employee privacy and data security training and education; and (e) protecting Personal Data with technical, contractual, administrative, and physical security safeguards.
Please be aware, however, that no information system can be guaranteed to be 100 percent secure, so we cannot guarantee the absolute security of your information. Moreover, we are not responsible for the security of information you transmit to the Services over networks that we do not control, including the internet and wireless networks. If you have reason to believe that your interaction with us is not secure, please contact us as described in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
) below.
Cookie Policy
a. What Are Cookies?
Our websites and Apps use cookies. Cookies are small text files placed on your device to collect standard internet log information and visitor behavior information. The cookies may transmit information via your browser with a purpose of authenticating or identifying the computer (via, e.g., the IP address) or the User. Cookies may contain information such as registration data and User preferences.
We use cookies to:
automatically collect certain technical information from your computer or mobile device over time and across different websites, including when you use the Services, such as your browser type, operating system, device type, the page served, your IP address and your geolocation. When you download and use our App(s), we and our service providers may track and collect App usage data, such as the date and time the App on your device accesses our servers and what information and files have been downloaded to the App based on your device number;
collect and store information about your location to provide you with educational experiences or email updates that are tailored for your region. The location information we have access to may include (1) your postal code, if you provide one to us; and (2) the approximate geographic region your computer or mobile device is located in, as determined from your IP address. However, we do not collect your street name and the name of your city/town. You may be able to change the settings on your computer or mobile device to prevent it from providing us with such IP information. We also have access to your school or classroom location if you (as a teacher) provide it to us;
we may collect information from your mobile device if you have downloaded our App(s). This information is generally used to help us deliver the most relevant information to you. Examples of information that may be collected and used include your IP address, geographic location, how you use the App(s), and information about the type of device you use. In addition, in the event our App(s) crash on your mobile device, we will receive information about your mobile device model software version and device carrier, which allows us to identify and fix bugs and otherwise improve the performance of our App(s). This information is sent to us as aggregated information and is not traceable to any individual and cannot be used to identify an individual. In addition, if you choose to turn on your Bluetooth, wi-fi or other geolocation functionality when you use our App(s), we may collect and use your geolocation information; and
we may also use third-party advertising networks to collect cookie information about Adult Users’ visits to the non-child-directed portions of the Services and to (1) deliver interest-based advertising to those Adult Users, including HomeschoolPlus-branded advertising, when those Adult Users visit third-party websites; and (2) provide us with statistics about the effectiveness of our advertising on third-party websites. These third-party advertising networks may use this cookie information in accordance with their own privacy policies. Please refer to section 8 (
When We Disclose Information to Third Parties
) above for more information about what Personal Data is transferred to our third-party advertising measurement partner.
When a server receives a request from a device which stores a cookie from a website, the server is able to use the information stored in the cookie in combination with the information stored on the server to allow the website to respond to you as an individual and to tailor their operations to your needs, likes, and dislikes by gathering and remembering information about your preferences. A cookie cannot collect information from your computer and cannot carry any viral or other damaging files.
b. Do Not Track Signals:
Some Internet browsers may be configured to send “Do Not Track” signals to the online services that you visit. We currently do not respond to Do Not Track signals. You may opt out of many third-party ad networks, including those operated by members of the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EIDAA). For more information regarding this practice by EIDAA members, and your choices regarding having this information used by these companies, including how to opt out of third-party ad networks operated by EIDAA members, please visit their website: http://www.edaa.eu/ (EIDAA) and
www.youronlinechoices.com
and
http://www.youronlinechoices.com.au/
for Australian Users.
c. Effect of Opting Out of Member Network:
Opting out of the EIDAA member network only means that those members no longer will deliver targeted content or ads to you. It does not mean you will no longer receive any targeted content or ads on our Services or other websites. You may continue to receive advertisements, for example, based on the particular website that you are viewing. Also, if your browsers are configured to reject cookies when you visit this opt-out page, or you subsequently erase your cookies, use a different computer, or change web browsers, your EIDAA opt-out may no longer be effective. Additional information is available on EIDAA’s website accessible by the above link.
d. Types of Cookies:
We may offer cookies to you, and if you do not wish to receive them you should ensure that your web browser is set up to not accept cookies. Please note that if you disable cookies, some Services or website functionality may not be available. We use the following cookies:
Essential Cookies
These cookies are essential to provide you with services available through Services and to enable you to use some of its features. For example, they allow you to log in to secure areas of our Services and help the content of the pages you request load quickly. Without these cookies, the services that you have asked for cannot be provided, and we only use these cookies to provide you with those services.
Functionality Cookies
These cookies allow us to remember choices you make when you use our Services, such as remembering your language preferences, remembering your login details, and remembering the changes you make to other parts of Services which you can customize. The purpose of these cookies is to provide you with a more personal experience and to avoid you having to re-enter your preferences every time you visit our Services.
Analytics and Performance Cookies
These cookies are used to collect information about traffic to our Services and how users use the Services. The information gathered does not identify any individual visitor. It includes the number of visitors to our Services, the websites that referred them to our Services, the pages they visited on our Services, what time of day they visited our Services, whether they have visited our Services before, and other similar information. We use this information to help operate our Services more efficiently, to gather broad demographic information, and to monitor the level of activity on our Services.
Social Media Cookies
These cookies are used when you share information using a social media sharing button or “like” button on our Services or you link your account or engage with our content on or through a social networking website such as Facebook, Twitter, or Google+. The social network will record that you have done this.
By continuing to use our Services, you are accepting our use of these cookies that make advertising and communications more relevant to you and your interests and further help us to improve our Services.
e. Pixel Tags and IFrames:
We also use pixel tags (which are also known as web beacons and clear GIFs) on our Services to track the actions of Users on our Services. Unlike cookies, which are stored on the hard drive of your computer or mobile device by a website, pixel tags are embedded invisibly on web pages. Pixel tags measure the success of our marketing campaigns and compile statistics about usage of the Services, so that we can manage our content more effectively. The information we collect using pixel tags is not linked to our Users’ Personal Data.
We additionally use JavaScript snippets and server to server requests that are provided by our affiliate partners and IFrames (or inline frames) on our Services to insert content from another source into a web page, particularly in respect of advertisements in order to provide advertisements about goods and services likely to be of interest to our Users. An IFrame is an HTML document embedded inside another HTML document on a website.
We and our third-party service providers may use the information collected through these technical methods for a number of purposes, including delivering content, tracking and enhancing our Users’ experience on the Services, and delivering advertising to visitors of www.homeschoolplus.com when they visit other websites and applications. For example, when you return to the Services after logging in, cookies help the Services recognize who you are without having to log back in. For more information, see section 6 (
How We Use Information
) above. The information collected through these technical methods on the child-directed portions of the Services are used only to support the internal operations of the Services. We do not allow third- party advertising networks to collect information about Child Users who are logged into their Accounts.
f. Cookies We Use:
Our Services use the following
cookies
:
g. Managing Your Cookies
Cookies help you to get the most out of our Services, and if you disable cookies some Services or website functionality may not be available. If you do not want the Services to collect information through the use of cookies, you can set your web browser to reject cookies from the Services.
How to enable and disable cookies using your browser:
Most browsers allow you to manage cookie settings. These settings can usually be found in the Settings, Options, or Preferences menu of your browser. The links below are provided to help you find the settings for some common browsers:
manage cookie settings in
Chrome
,
Chrome Android
, and
Chrome iOS
;
manage cookie settings in
Safari
and
Safari iOS
;
manage cookie settings in
Firefox
;
manage cookie settings in
Internet Explorer
; and
manage cookie settings in
Opera
.
For all other browsers, please look for a
Help
function in your browser or contact the browser provider.
However, as mentioned above, if you reject or block cookies from the Services, the Services may not function as intended. For example, you will not be able to remain logged in to your account, and therefore you would have to log in during each page transition.
Further information about cookies, including how to see what cookies have been set on your computer or mobile device and how to manage and delete them, visit
www.allaboutcookies.org
and
www.youronlinechoices.com/uk
and
http://www.youronlinechoices.com.au/
for Australian Users.
Changes to Our Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy
We constantly try to provide the best services, and accordingly our Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy will change from time to time. If we update this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, we will notify you by posting the revised Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy on the Services, and for certain revisions that materially expand the ways in which we use or share the information previously collected from you through the Services, either display an alert next to the Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, display an alert upon login to the Services, or directly communicate with you (e.g., via the email address associated with your Account). If you have a School Account, any modifications to this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy will only apply to you and your Child User in accordance with the AofL Schools agreement with your Educational Institution.
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
To exercise the access, disclosure, data portability, and deletion rights  submit a verifiable consumer request to us by  visiting here:
Privacy Portal
We are committed to resolving any complaints about our collection or use of your Personal Data. If you would like to make a complaint regarding this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy or our practices in relation to your Personal Data, please contact us as described below. We will reply to your complaint as soon as we can and, in any event, within 45 days. We hope to resolve any complaint brought to our attention; however, if you feel that your complaint has not been adequately resolved, you reserve the right to contact the ICO or the OAIC (as applicable), as detailed in section 9 (
How to Access, Change, or Delete Account Information; Your Rights
) above.
Age of Learning, Inc. and Age of Learning for Schools, Inc. are each located in the United States of America. Age of Learning, Inc. is the operator of all of the Services except Homeschool+™ for Schools, operated by Age of Learning for Schools, Inc. Any questions, concerns, or complaints regarding this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, our data collection or processing practices, or issues related to your or a Child User’s information for which you are responsible should be directed to us via any of the following methods. As Age of Learning, Inc. and Age of Learning for Schools, Inc. are each located in the United States of America, we have appointed a representative in the European Union and APAC so that our European Users and Australian Users may easily contact us:
For Family Accounts:
Postal Address:
Age of Learning, Inc.
Attention: Legal Department
P.O. Box 230
Glendale, CA 91209
USA
Telephone Number: 1-800-633-3331
Email Address: privacy@aofl.com
For School Accounts:
Postal Address:
Age of Learning for Schools, Inc.
Attention: Legal Department
P.O. Box 230
Glendale, CA 91209
USA
Telephone Number: 1-800-633-3331
Email Address: privacy@aofls.com
European Representative:
Postal Address: Please see list below
Attention: DPR Group
Email Address: datainquiry@dpr.eu.com or through the online portal at
http://www.dpr.eu.com/datarequest
APAC/Australian Representative:
Postal Address:
Age of Learning, Inc.
Attention: Legal Department
P.O. Box 230
Glendale, CA 91209
USA
Telephone Number: 1-800-633-3331
Email Address: privacy@aofl.com
We have appointed DPR Group as our Data Protection Representative in the European Union so that you can contact them directly in your home country. DPR Group has locations in each of the 28 EU countries, so that Age of Learning, Inc.’s customers can always raise the questions they want with them.
PLEASE NOTE: when mailing inquiries, it is ESSENTIAL that you mark your letters for ‘DPR Group’ and not ‘Age of Learning, Inc.’ or your inquiry may not reach us. Please refer clearly to Age of Learning, Inc. in your correspondence. On receiving your correspondence, the Company will likely request evidence of your identity, to ensure your personal data and information connected with it is not provided to anyone other than you. If you have any concerns over how DPR Group will handle the personal data they will require to undertake their services, please refer to their privacy notice at
https://www.dpr.eu.com/legal-privacy
.
DPR Postal Addresses
Austria
DPR Group, City Tower, Brückenkopfgasse 1/6. Stock, Graz, 8020, Austria
Belgium
DPR Group, Place de L’Université 16, Louvain-La-Neuve, Waals Brabant, 1348, Belgium
Bulgaria
DPR Group, 132 Mimi Balkanska Str., Sofia, 1540, Bulgaria
Croatia
DPR Group, Ground & 9th Floor, Hoto Tower, Savska cesta 32, Zagreb, 10000, Croatia
Cyprus
DPR Group, Victory House, 205 Archbishop Makarios Avenue, Limassol, 3030, Cyprus
Czech Republic
DPR Group, IQ Ostrava Ground floor, 28. rijna 3346/91, Ostrava-mesto, Moravska, Ostrava, Czech Republic
Denmark
DPR Group, Lautruphøj 1-3, Ballerup, 2750, Denmark
Estonia
DPR Group, 2nd Floor, Tornimae 5, Tallinn, 10145, Estonia
Finland
DPR Group, Luna House, 5.krs, Mannerheimintie 12 B, Helsinki, 00100, Finland
France
DPR Group, 72 rue de Lessard, Rouen, 76100, France
Germany
DPR Group, 3rd and 4th floor, Altmarkt 10 B/D, Dresden, 01067, Germany
Greece
DPR Group, 24 Lagoumitzi str, Athens, 17671, Greece
Hungary
DPR Group, EMKE Building, Rákóczi Út 42, Budapest, 1072, Hungary
Ireland
DPR Group, Phoenix House, Monahan Road, Cork, T12 H1XY, Republic of Ireland
Italy
DPR Group, BPM 335368, Via Roma 12, 10073 , Turin, Italy
Latvia
DPR Group, 4th & 5th floors, 14 Terbatas Street, Riga, LV-1011, Latvia
Lithuania
DPR Group, 44A Gedimino Avenue, 01110 Vilnius, Lithuania
Luxembourg
DPR Group, BPM 335368, Banzelt 4 A, 6921, Roodt-sur-Syre, Luxembourg
Malta
DPR Group, Tower Business Centre, 2nd floor, Tower Street, Swatar, BKR4013, Malta
Netherlands
DPR Group, Cuserstraat 93, Floor 2 and 3, Amsterdam, 1081 CN, Netherlands
Poland
DPR Group, Budynek Fronton ul Kamienna 21, Krakow, 31-403, Poland
Portugal
DPR Group, Torre de Monsanto, Rua Afonso Praça 30, 7th floor, Algès, Lisbon, 1495-061, Portugal
Romania
DPR Group, World Trade Centre, Piata Montreal no 10, Entrance F, 1st Floor, Sector 1, Bucharest, 11469, Romania
Slovakia
DPR Group, Apollo Business Centre II, Block E / 9th floor, 4D Prievozska, Bratislava, 821 09, Slovakia
Slovenia
DPR Group, Trg. Republike 3, Floor 3, Ljubljana, 1000, Slovenia
Spain
DPR Group, Puerta de las Naciones, Ribera del Loira 46, Madrid, 28042, Spain
Sweden
DPR Group, S:t Johannesgatan 2, 4th floor, Malmo, SE – 211 46, Sweden
United Kingdom
DPR Group, BPM 335368, 372 Old Street, EC1V 9AU, London, United Kingdom
Sub-policy 9
https://www.ageoflearning.com/mastery-privacy/:
Skip to content
My Math Academy & My Reading Academy Privacy Policy
Effective Date: December 14th, 2022
Welcome to the adaptive learning solutions
My Math Academy
® and
My Reading Academy®,
which are owned and operated by Age of Learning, Inc. We are committed to providing children with a learning environment where every activity is just as fun as it is educational and where you can feel confident that your children’s privacy is protected.
This Privacy Policy describes the ways in which Age of Learning, Inc., and its subsidiaries (collectively,
we, our, us,
or the
Company
) collect, use, and disclose information about you and the children who use
My Math Academy
or
My Reading Academy
® and any other websites, applications, and online services (
App[s]
) that link to this policy (collectively, the
Services
). We provide account licenses (
Account[s]
) to the Services for schools, school districts, licensed childcare facilities, and other licensed educational institutions or programs (each, an
Educational Institution
). These Educational Institutions provide access to children and families to serve their educational goals.
Please read this Privacy Policy closely.
By using the Services, you agree to the handling of your information in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
Summary of Key Points
You should read this entire Privacy Policy, but here are some key points:
Personal Information
, or
PI
, is defined in this policy to mirror the text of the California Consumer Privacy Act
(CCPA)
and means information that identifies, relates to, describes, is capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household.
We take your privacy seriously, and will only use your
PI
, in accordance with this policy, applicable law, and the agreement we have with your Educational Institution.
Other than in the places and for the purposes explicitly disclosed in this Privacy Policy, we do not knowingly collect any PI directly from Child Users (defined below) under age 13. For more information about where in the Services we may collect PI from children, please see
Section 3(B) (Information We Collect from Users)
We do not ask for sensitive PI, such as Social Security numbers, driver’s license numbers, orbiometric data.
We use commercially reasonable physical, technical, and administrative security measures designed to safeguard all information collected by the Services.
Unless an Educational Institution requires otherwise, Adult Users (as defined below) may contact us at any time as described in
Section 13 (Contact Us)
to request that we provide for their review, or delete from our records, any PI they have provided about Child Users associated with their Account, or to cease collecting PI from those Child Users. For information about when we automatically delete PI due to Account cancellation or inactivity, please see
Section 10 (Location of Information Processing)
.
We provide
Accounts
to Educational Institutions. In addition to this Privacy Policy and the Terms & Conditions, each Educational Institution will have a separate agreement with the terms and conditions governing Accounts, which may provide additional protections for you.
Additional privacy protections apply if your Educational Institution provides us with students’ personally identifiable information (
Student Data
) as defined by the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. § 1232g) and its implementing regulations (34 CFR Part 99) (collectively,
FERPA
) and applicable state laws. The Educational Institution is responsible for obtaining parental consent and/or ensuring that an exception applies prior to transferring Student Data to the Company, which acts as a third-party vendor school official in this context.
We will only access, collect, record, organize, use, or disclose (collectively,
Process
) Student Data collected through the Services as described in our agreement(s) with the applicable Educational Institution and this Privacy Policy. We will Process the data consistent with all applicable laws, including, but not limited to, FERPA.
We will delete, or if requested by the Educational Institution, transfer to the Educational Institution all Student Data within 90 days (or a shorter time frame if required by applicable law) following the termination of our agreement with the applicable Educational Institution.
We may de-identify Student Data received in connection with providing the Services and use such data as described in this Privacy Policy.
Student Privacy Pledge
The Company is a signatory of the Student Privacy Pledge. The Future of Privacy Forum and the Software & Information Industry Association introduced the Student Privacy Pledge to safeguard student privacy regarding the collection, maintenance, and use of student Personal Information. Since 2014, more than 300 companies have signed on. Signing the pledge demonstrates our commitment to complying with the highest standards for safeguarding Student Data.
Table of Contents
No Advertisements to Children
Account Users
Information Collection
How We Use Information
When We Disclose Information to Third Parties
How to Access, Change, or Delete Account Information
Account Cancellation and Reactivation; Data Deletion
California Privacy Rights
Links to Other Services
Location of Information Processing
Security
Changes to Our Privacy Policy
Contact Us
1.
No Advertisements to Children
The Services will never include any pop-up ads or other advertisements directed to children. In addition, if external links are ever present, Child Users will be blocked from accessing them. External links will only be available if an Adult User enters his or her password.
2.
Account Users
We provide Accounts for Educational Institutions. Users of the Services include Child Users (any child under age 18 who uses the learning portion of the Services) and Adult Users (including teachers, parents, and legal guardians of Child Users), collectively referred to as
Users
.
3.
Information Collection
There are two general categories of information that we collect.
A. Information Users Provide to Us
As more fully set forth below, we and our third-party service providers collect information that Users provide when using the Services, including when Adult Users contact us with a question, comment, or request and when Child Users engage in activities. However, we will only use or disclose this information in accordance with this policy and applicable law. Please see
Section 5 (When We Disclose Information to Third Parties)
below for more information and how we limit disclosure of Child User information.
Educational Institutions register Child Users (i.e., students) through their administrative Accounts. Adult Users who register are asked to provide certain Personal Information about themselves when registering for an Account, including email address and, optionally, their first and last name. If you submit any information relating to other people in connection with the Services, you represent that you have the authority to do so and permit us to use the information in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
B. Information We Collect from Users
We and our third-party service providers collect Personal Information directly from Users of the Services in the form of the actions they take and activities they complete when using the Services. For example, from Adult Users, we may collect information about patterns of usage; from Child Users, we may collect information about patterns of usage, which activities a child commences and completes, when a child starts and stops an activity, which areas of the Services the child frequents, the number of questions answered correctly or incorrectly, and inferences drawn from the foregoing to create an adaptive learning profile for the Child User reflecting, for example, the Child User’s aptitudes and abilities. From all Users, we may collect usage logs and information transmitted to Customer Support.
Where Adult Users access the Services through an Internet browser, we and our third-party service providers also use a variety of technologies, such as cookies (small text files that the Services save on your computer or mobile device), to automatically collect certain technical information from your computer or mobile device including when you use the Services, such as your browser type, operating system, device type, the page served, your IP address, and the approximate geographic region your computer or mobile device is located in. When you download and use one of our Apps, we and our service providers may track and collect App usage data, such as the date and time the App on your device accesses our servers and what information and files have been downloaded to the App based on your device number.
We and our third-party service providers may use the information collected through these technical methods for several purposes, including delivering content, tracking, and enhancing our Users’ experience with the Services. For example, when you return to the Services after logging in, cookies help the Services recognize who you are without having to log back in. For more information, see
Section 4 (How We Use Information)
. The information collected through these technical methods on the child-directed portions of the Services are used only to support the internal operations of the Services.
We do not allow third-party advertising networks to collect information submitted through the Services by Users
.
Cookies
We use cookies, which are small text files placed on your device, to collect certain internet log information and visitor behavior information. More information about cookies is available at
www.aboutcookies.org
. We use cookies to recognize your device and to provide and improve our Services as described below. We use the following cookies:
Essential Cookies
These cookies are essential to provide you with services available through the Services and to enable you to use some of its features. For example, they allow you to log in to secure areas of our Services and help the content of the pages you request load quickly. Without these cookies, the services that you have asked for cannot be provided, and we only use these cookies to provide you with those services.
Functionality Cookies
These cookies allow us to remember choices you make when you use our Services, such as remembering your language preferences, remembering your login details, and remembering the changes you make to other parts of Services that you can customize. The purpose of these cookies is to provide you with a more personal experience and to avoid you having to reenter your preferences every time you visit our Services.
Analytics and Performance Cookies
These cookies are used to collect information about traffic to our Services and how Users use the Services. The information gathered does not identify any individual visitor. It includes the number of visitors to our Services, the pages they visited on our Services, what time of day they visited our Services, whether they have visited our Services before, and other similar information. We use this information to help operate our Services more efficiently, to gather broad demographic information and to monitor the level of activity on our Services.
If you do not want the Services to collect information through cookies, you can set your web browser to reject cookies from the Services. Each browser is different, so you should check your browser’s Help menu to learn how to change your cookie preferences. However, please note that if you reject or block cookies from the Services, the Services may not function as intended. For example, you will not be able to remain logged into the Services, and therefore, you would have to log in during each page transition.
Push Notifications and SMS
. Additionally, if you downloaded the App on your mobile device to access the Services as part of your use of the Services, we may ask if you would like to receive push notifications, which may include alerts and notifications, badges, banners, and sounds on your mobile device. You may choose to stop receiving push notifications at any time by changing the settings on your mobile device. If you provide us with your mobile phone number, we may send you SMS text messages about your Account, and we may also ask if you would like to receive marketing SMS text messages. Please note that your carrier may charge you for the text messages you receive. To permanently stop receiving SMS text messages from us (if you are located in the U.S. or Canada) text STOP, CANCEL, or UNSUBSCRIBE in reply to any SMS text message sent by us.
4.
How We Use Information
We will never monetize the Personal Information of any User of the Services by providing it to a third party in exchange for money, except as described in this policy in the context of a sale of the Company.
We and our third-party service providers may use the information collected from Users as follows:
A. Adult User Information
Information collected from Adult Users may be used:
i. To permit you to use the Services
ii. To communicate with you regarding your Account and to provide you with related customer service
iii. To respond to your inquiries and to fulfill your requests, retrieve your password, or provide technical support
B. Child User Information
Information collected from Child Users may be used:
i. To evaluate a Child User’s performance in activities and to adapt a Child User’s learning experience to the Child User’s learning needs
ii. To draw inferences from a Child User’s performance in activities to create an adaptive learning profile for the Child User reflecting, for example, the Child User’s aptitudes and abilities
iii. To analyze, to provide progress reports on or to provide an assessment of a Child User’s performance in activities, and to provide reports about that analysis to the Adult User(s) on the Account and inform recommendations for supporting activities Adult Users can do with their Child User(s)
C. Both Adult and Child User Information
Information collected from both Adult and Child Users may be used:
i. To allow us to assess and improve the Services, its educational content, and other services we provide (for example, to improve our content and User experience); to research, evaluate, and improve the educational efficacy of the Services; and to inform our understanding of the Services’ User base
ii. To customize, adapt, and personalize Users’ viewing and content-consumption experience; for example, by measuring a Child User’s performance in activities and adapting the Child User’s experience to their learning needs
iii. To maintain and analyze the functioning of the Services
iv. As we believe to be necessary or appropriate: (a) under applicable law; (b) to comply with legal process; (c) to respond to requests from public and government authorities; (d) to detect violations of and enforce our terms and conditions; (e) to protect our operations or those of any of our affiliates, including the security of the Services; (f) to protect our rights, privacy, safety, or property, or that of our affiliates, you, or others; and (g) to allow us to pursue available remedies or limit the damages that we may sustain (collectively, (a)–(g) are
Other Uses and Disclosures
)
5.
When We Disclose Information to Third Parties
Information collected from both Adult and Child Users will not be disclosed except for the following purposes, which include our operations purposes:
A. To third parties who perform certain services for us, such as conducting and evaluating research (for example, on the educational impact of the Services), provided that the service providers agree to keep the information confidential and to use it only for purposes that are permitted by this Privacy Policy
B. As we believe to be necessary or appropriate as set forth above in Other Uses and Disclosures and in other instances substantially similar to those listed in this Section
C. Where legally required and in certain other cases, we may make such disclosures without first providing notice to Users
D. Subject to confidentiality agreements, the terms of this Privacy Policy, and applicable law, information may be disclosed to service providers, advisers, potential transactional partners, or other third parties in connection with the consideration, negotiation, or completion of a corporate transaction in which we are acquired by or merged with another company, or we sell, liquidate, transfer, or license all or a portion of our assets in bankruptcy or otherwise. This means that if some or all our assets are acquired or otherwise transferred or licensed, including in bankruptcy, that such acquirer shall be subject to the same commitments stated under this Privacy Policy.
We do not disclose the Personal Information of Users to third parties for any marketing or promotional purposes.
We also may disclose de-identified and/or aggregated User information for any other purpose as permissible by applicable law—for example, the distribution of de-identified User records to outside researchers or the distribution of reports containing aggregate User demographic information—provided that no individual Adult User or Child User or any specific end-user device can be readily identified.
6.
How to Access, Change, or Delete Account Information
If you are using the Services through an Account that is integrated with an Education Institution’s student information system (
SIS
), unless otherwise required by law, any request to access or make changes to or delete PI including Student Data must be made by the Educational Institution within the SIS. Once the changes are made within the SIS, the changes will automatically appear within the Account.
If you are using the Services through an Account and the Educational Institution is not integrating its SIS with the Services, unless otherwise required by law, any request to access, make changes to, or delete PI including Student Data must be made by the Educational Institution’s designated administrator for the Account. The administrators will be provided access to the Account User Profile pages to update, correct, or delete the information contained therein.
7.
Account Cancellation and Reactivation; Data Deletion
Adult Users should contact their respective Educational Institution for any questions regarding Account cancellation and data deletion. Should an Adult User initially contact us, we will first inform the applicable Educational Institution prior to taking any requested action by the Adult User, and subject to applicable law, we will wait for the Educational Institution’s instructions. If an Educational Institutional terminates its agreement with us, we will delete, or if requested by the Educational Institution, we will transfer to the Educational Institution, all Student Data within 90 days (or a shorter time frame if required by applicable law or the terms of our agreement with the Educational Institution) following the termination of the agreement with the applicable Educational Institution. Upon Account cancellation, de-identified Adult and Child User information may nonetheless persist internally in our archive files or similar databases, and may still be used, on a de-identified basis, for our internal support, administrative, and record-keeping purposes including but not limited to allowing us to improve the Services and other services we provide through research, evaluation, and analytics as permissible by applicable law.
Please note that following a request to delete information or your Account under this Privacy Policy, information including PI may remain in backup or archive records, and we may retain certain data if required by law, relevant to preventing fraud or future abuse, or for legitimate business purposes, such as account recovery and customer support—all subject to our internal records retention periods. All retained data will continue to be subject to the Privacy Policy in effect at that time and applicable law.
8.
California Privacy Rights
CCPA provides California residents with specific rights regarding their Personal Information. This section describes your CCPA rights and explains how to exercise those rights. In this section “you” or “your” refers to California residents. Under the CCPA, we are required to disclose the categories of sources from whom we collect Personal Information, and the third parties with whom we share it, which we have explained above. We are also required to communicate information about rights you have under California law, such as:
Right to access Personal Information.
You may be entitled to receive the specific pieces of your Personal Information we hold.
Right to data portability.
You may be entitled to receive a copy of your electronic Personal Information in a readily-usable format.
Right to disclosure.
You may be entitled to receive information regarding the categories of Personal Information we collected, the sources from which we collected Personal Information, the purposes for which we collected and shared Personal Information, the categories of Personal Information that we sold, the categories of third parties to whom the Personal Information was sold, and the categories of Personal Information that we disclosed for a business purpose in the 12 months preceding your request.
Right to deletion.
You may be entitled to request that we delete the Personal Information that we have collected from you. We will use commercially reasonable efforts to honor your request in compliance with applicable laws, including contacting your Educational Institution who may provide us with guidance on your request. Please note, however, that we may need or be required to keep such information for our legitimate business purposes or to comply with applicable law.
For details on exercising these rights, please see “
Exercising Access, Disclosure, Data Portability, and Deletion Rights
” below.
Information We Collect and Share
We collect information that identifies, relates to, describes, references, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household.
We have collected the following categories of Personal Information from or about consumers within the last 12 months:
Category
Examples
Collected
A. Identifiers
A real name, alias, unique personal identifier, online identifier, Internet Protocol address, email address, telephone number, Account name, or other similar identifiers
Adult
Child
Yes
Yes
B. Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e))
A name or a telephone number
Some Personal Information included in this category may overlap with other categories.
Yes
Yes
C. Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law
Sex (including gender)
Yes
Yes
D. Commercial information
Records of personal property; products or services, purchased, obtained, or considered; or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies
No
No
E. Biometric information
Genetic, physiological, behavioral, and biological characteristics or activity patterns used to extract a template or other identifier or identifying information—such as fingerprints, faceprints, voiceprints, iris or retina scans, keystroke, gait, or other physical patterns and sleep, health, or exercise data
No
No
F. Internet or other similar network activity
Browsing history; search history; or information on a consumer’s interaction with a website, application, or advertisement
Yes
Yes
G. Geolocation data
Physical location or movements
No
No
H. Sensory data
Audio, electronic, visual, thermal, olfactory, or similar information
No
No
I. Professional or employment-related information
Current or past job history or performance evaluations
No
No
J. Nonpublic education information (per the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Section 1232g, 34 C.F.R. Part 99))
Education records directly related to a student, such as grades, class lists, student schedules, and student identification codes, maintained by an educational institution or party acting on its behalf
No
Yes
K. Inferences drawn from other Personal Information
Profile information reflecting a person’s preferences, characteristics, psychological trends, predispositions, behavior, attitudes, intelligence, abilities, and aptitudes
No
Yes
Business and Commercial Purposes That We Use Personal Information for:
We may use or disclose the Personal Information we collect from each of the Categories of Personal Information listed above for one or more of the following purposes:
To fulfill or meet the reason you provided the information;
To provide, support, personalize, and develop our Services;
To process your requests;
To provide you with support and to respond to your inquiries, including to investigate and address your concerns and to monitor and improve our responses;
To provide customer service;
To understand how Users interact with our Services;
To conduct research, testing, analysis, and development;
To detect security incidents and prevent fraud;
To debug and repair errors;
To create, maintain, customize, and secure your Account with us;
To respond to law enforcement requests and as required by applicable law, court order, or governmental regulations;
As described to you when collecting your personal information or as otherwise set forth in the CCPA; and
To evaluate or conduct a merger, divestiture, restructuring, reorganization, dissolution, or other sale or transfer of some or all our assets, whether as a going concern or as part of bankruptcy, liquidation, or similar proceeding, in which personal information held by us about our Users/consumers is among the assets transferred.
Categories of Personal Information We Share:
We may share your Personal Information by disclosing it to a third party for a business purpose described below. We only make these business purpose disclosures under written contracts that describe the purposes, require the recipient to keep the personal information confidential, and prohibit using the disclosed information for any purpose except performing the contract.

We do not sell Personal Information, and in the preceding 12 months, we have not sold personal information. In the preceding 12 months, we have also disclosed the following categories of Personal Information for one or more business purposes:
Personal Information Category
Category of Third-Party Recipients
Business Purpose Disclosures of Adult and Child Personal Information
Sales
A: Identifiers
Affiliates, partners, parent/subsidiary organizations, service providers, advertising networks (only applies to Adult PI), and government entities
None
B: California Customer Records personal information categories
None
None
C: Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law
None
None
D: Commercial information
Affiliates, partners, parent/subsidiary organizations, service providers, advertising networks, and government entities
None
E: Biometric information
None
None
F: Internet or other similar network activity
Affiliates, partners, parent/subsidiary organizations, service providers, advertising networks, and government entities
None
G: Geolocation data
None
None
H: Sensory data
None
None
I: Professional or employment-related information
None
None
J: Non-public education information
None
None
K: Inferences drawn from other personal information
Affiliates, partners, parent/subsidiary organizations, service providers, advertising networks, and government entities
None
Our Retention of Personal Information
We retain Personal Information for as long as necessary to provide the services and fulfill the transactions you have requested, or for other business such purposes as complying with our legal obligations, resolving disputes, and enforcing our agreements. We decide how long we need personal information on a case-by-case basis. We may consider the following factors when making retention decisions:
Whether we need to keep some of your Personal Information to maintain your Account;
Whether we are required by law to keep some types of Personal Information for certain periods of time to comply with our legal obligations; and
Whether we need some of your Personal Information for other business purposes, such as to prevent harm and ensure safety and security of our Sites; investigate possible violations of our terms and conditions of use; or protect ourselves.
If we determine your Personal Information is no longer necessary using the factors above, we will generally destroy or anonymize that Personal Information.
Exercising Access, Disclosure, Data Portability, and Deletion Rights
Please note that you may need to directly contact the relevant Educational Institution to exercise these rights.
To exercise the access, disclosure, data portability, and deletion rights described above, please submit a verifiable consumer request to us by either contacting us as set forth in
Section 13 (Contact Us)
below or visiting the link below:
Privacy Portal
Only you or a person registered with the California Secretary of State that you authorize to act on your behalf may make a verifiable consumer request related to your Personal Information. You may also make a verifiable consumer request on behalf of your Child; however, that your Educational Institution may require you to contact them to make any request on behalf of your Child.
You may only make a verifiable consumer request for access or data portability twice within a 12-month period. The verifiable consumer request must:
Provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected Personal Information or an authorized representative
Describe your request with sufficient detail that allows us to properly understand, evaluate, and respond to it
We cannot respond to your request or provide you with Personal Information if we cannot verify your identity or authority to make the request and confirm the Personal Information relates to you. Making a verifiable consumer request does not require you to create an account with us. We will only use Personal Information provided in a verifiable consumer request to verify the requestor’s identity or authority to make the request.
Nondiscrimination
We fully support your privacy rights and will not discriminate against you for exercising any of your CCPA rights.
CCPA Metrics:
www.ageoflearning.com/ccpa
9.
Links to Other Services
In the future the Services may include links to external websites or applications. However, to protect children from accessing these external websites, an Adult User will be required to enter a valid password. Any third party websites and applications are governed by their own privacy policies or information collection practices, which may be substantially different from ours. We encourage you to review the privacy policies and information collection practices of any external websites and apps as those parties’ practices would not be subject to this policy.
10.
Location of Information Processing
The Services are controlled and operated by us from the United States. Your information may be stored and processed in any country where we have facilities or in which we engage service providers, including the United States, which may have data protection laws that are different from those of your country. In addition, your information may be subject to access requests from governments, courts, or law enforcement officials in countries where it may be processed under the laws of those countries.
11.
Security
The security of your Personal Information is important to us, and we employ physical, technical, and administrative security measures designed to safeguard the information collected by the Services. We use industry standard SSL (secure socket layer technology) encryption to transfer Personal Information. Other security safeguards include but are not limited to data encryption, firewalls, and physical access controls to buildings and files.
Adult Users create a password to access the Service after being invited to do so based upon data received from Educational Institutions. Accounts cannot be created without a specific invitation from an Educational Institution. You can help protect against unauthorized access to the Account you use and PI by selecting and protecting your password appropriately and limiting access to your computer and browser by signing off after you have finished accessing the Services. At registration, we assign a Member ID to each Account and use those Member IDs to authenticate logins, allow access to the subscription content, and monitor compliance. The Member ID is also used to authenticate Users when requesting technical support. Access to PI is limited (through User/password credentials and two-factor authentication) to those employees who require it to perform their job functions. Details of this process may change depending on how any given Educational Institution operates its network or integrates with the Service (for example, some Educational Institutions will use Single Sign-On solutions, while others will use separate account credentials).
We are committed to maintaining the security and confidentiality of your information as well as your children’s information, including but not limited to any Student Data, which we receive through Accounts. Some of the precautions we take include (a) limiting employee access to your PI and your children’s PI to only those employees with a need to such access to fulfill their job responsibilities; (b) conducting background checks on our employees and, specifically, upon all employees who may have access to Student Data; (c) requiring employees to sign confidentiality agreements upon hiring; (d) conducting regular employee privacy and data security training and education; and (e) protecting PI with commercially reasonable technical, contractual, administrative, and physical security safeguards.
Please be aware, however, that no information system can be guaranteed to be 100 percent secure, so we cannot guarantee the absolute security of your information. Moreover, we are not responsible for the security of information you transmit to the Services over networks that we do not control, including the internet and wireless networks. If you have reason to believe that your interaction with us is not secure, please contact us as described in
Section 13 (Contact Us)
below.
12.
Changes to Our Privacy Policy
We constantly try to provide the best services, and accordingly our Privacy Policy will change from time to time. If we update any provision of this Privacy Policy that materially expands the ways in which we use or share the information previously collected from you through the Services, we will notify you by posting the revised Privacy Policy on the Services and display a prominent pop-up notice on the Services with a statement that by continuing to use the Services, you are consenting to the revised Privacy Policy
.
Any modifications to this Privacy Policy will only apply to you and your Child User in accordance with our agreement with your Educational Institution.
13.
Contact Us
Age of Learning, Inc., is in the United States of America and is the operator of the Services. Questions regarding this Privacy Policy and issues related to your information or a Child User’s information for which you are responsible should be directed to us via any of the following methods:
Mailing address:
Age of Learning, Inc.
Attention: Legal Department
P.O. Box 230
Glendale, CA 91209
USA
Telephone Number: 800.633.3331
Email address:
privacy@aofl.com
Sub-policy 10
https://www.ageoflearning.com/riq-privacy-current/:
Skip to content
Privacy Policies
Age of Learning:
Privacy Policy
ABCmouse:
ABCmouse Privacy Policy English (US) current
Terms & Conditions English (US)
Privacy Policy (Spanish)
Terms & Conditions (Spanish)
Privacy Policy (Australia – New Zealand – Singapore)
Privacy Policy GDPR (EU and UK)
Terms & Conditions GDPR (EU, UK,
Australia
)
Adventure Academy:
Privacy Policy English (US)
Terms & Conditions English (US)
Homeschool +:
Privacy Policy English (US)
Terms & Conditions English (US)
Privacy Policy (Australia)
Privacy Policy EU,UK, and GDPR
Terms & Conditions (EU, UK, and AU GDPR)
Library:
Library Terms and Conditions
Mastery:
My Math Academy & My Reading Academy Privacy Policy
Reading IQ:
Privacy Policy English
Terms & Conditions English
Privacy Policy AUS
Privacy Policy EU/UK
Privacy Policy (China)
Terms & Conditions (China)
Sub-policy 11
https://www.ageoflearning.com/riq-privacy-aus/:
Skip to content
ReadingIQ Australian Privacy Statement
1.
Introduction
Welcome to ReadingIQ™ (
ReadingIQ
), which is owned and operated by Age of Learning, Inc. ReadingIQ is committed to providing children with a learning environment where every book is just as fun as it is educational, and where you can feel confident that your children’s privacy is protected.
This Privacy Statement (
Statement
) describes the ways in which Age of Learning, Inc., and its subsidiaries (collectively,
we
,
our
,
us
, or the
Company
) collect, process and disclose information about Users of our Services within Australia and the children who use our Australian Users’ accounts through ReadingIQ and any other websites, applications, and online services (
Apps
) that link to the Privacy Notice and Cookies Policy on our website (collectively, the
Services
), including ABCmouse® for Schools operated by our wholly owned subsidiary Age of Learning for Schools, Inc. (
AofL Schools
).
Any words defined in the
Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy
and used in this Statement will have the same meaning unless otherwise stated.
Personal Information
For the purposes of this Statement, the term Personal Information is as defined in the
Privacy Act 1988
(Cth), meaning information or an opinion about an identified individual, or an individual who is reasonably identifiable:
whether the information or opinion is true or not; and
whether the information or opinion is recorded in a material form or not.
2.
Collection of Personal Information
We and our third-party service providers collect Personal Information directly from Users who provide the Personal Information when using the Services. This may include when Adult Users create an Account, sign up for Services or contact us with a question, comment, request or complaint. The Personal Information collected may include the name, email address and telephone number of the User.
We may also obtain information about you from other sources, including publicly accessible sources, for example, if you have agreed to share information with one of our partners or an Educational Institution we may add this to information we get from our site/Application(s)/Services.
We collect Personal Information for a number of different purposes, such as: to allow you to register and use the Services, to send you communications about a Child User’s progress; to respond to your enquiries, complaints, fulfill your requests, and to send you marketing communications that we believe may be of interest to you. You have a right at any time to stop us or any associated companies from contacting you for marketing purposes if you no longer wish to be contacted for marketing purposes please contact us.
If you do not provide us with Personal Information, we may not be able to provide our Services to you.
3.
Disclosure of Personal Information
We and our third-party service providers collect Personal Information directly from Users who provide the Personal Information when using the Services. This may include when Adult Users create an Account, sign up for Services or contact us with a question, comment, request or complaint. The Personal Information collected may include the name, email address and telephone number of the User.
We may also obtain information about you from other sources, including publicly accessible sources, for example, if you have agreed to share information with one of our partners or an Educational Institution we may add this to information we get from our site/Application(s)/Services.
Information collected from both Adult and Child Users will not be disclosed except in limited circumstances such as:
to third parties who perform certain services for us, such as to process debit and credit cards; to conduct or evaluate research (such as on the educational impact of the Services); and to provide us with statistics about the effectiveness of our advertising on third-party websites, provided that the service providers agree to keep the information confidential and to use it only for purposes that are permitted by the Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy;
where parents, legal guardians or those with parental responsibility for Child User(s) have linked a Family Account to a Teacher Account; and
to service providers, advisors, potential transactional partners, or other third parties in connection with the consideration, negotiation, or completion of a corporate transaction in which we are acquired by or merged with another company or we sell, liquidate, transfer, or license all or a portion of our assets in bankruptcy or otherwise.
For further details, please refer to the Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy. For further information regarding when we share Personal Information, please refer to the Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy.
4.
Overseas Disclosure
The Services are controlled and operated by us from the United States of America. Your information may be transferred to, stored and processed by us, our affiliates, and our third-party service providers in any country where we have facilities or in which we engage service providers, including the United States of America and countries within European Economic Area, which may have data protection laws that are different from Australia. For further details, please refer to the Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy.
5.
Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy
Our Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy sets out how you can access and seek correction of your Personal Information held by us, and how to make a complaint to us about our handling of Personal Information. You can find our most up to date Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy
here
.
Contact Details
Postal Address:
Age of Learning, Inc.
Attention: Legal Department
P.O. Box 230
Glendale, CA 91209
USA
Telephone Number: 800.633.3331
Email address: privacy@aofl.com
For School Accounts:
Postal Address:
Age of Learning for Schools, Inc.
Attention: Legal Department
P.O. Box 230
Glendale, CA 91209
USA
Telephone Number: 866.360.9492
Email Address: privacy@aofls.com
APAC/Australia
Age of Learning, Inc.
Attention: Legal Department
P.O. Box 230
Glendale, CA 91209
USA
Telephone Number: 800.633.3331
Email address: privacy@aofl.com
Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy
Effective Date: November 15, 2019
Table of Contents
Introduction
Types of Accounts, Services, and Users
Child Safe Guarantee
Personal Data We Collect and How We Collect it
Advertising and Marketing
How We Use Your Personal Data
Lawful Basis for Processing of Personal Data
When We Disclose Information to Third Parties
How to Access, Change, or Delete Account Information; You Rights
Account Cancellation and Reactivation; Data Deletion
Links to Other Services
Location of Information Processing
Security
Cookie Policy
Changes to Our Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
1. Introduction
Welcome to ABCmouse.com®
Early Learning Academy
(
ABCmouse
), which is owned and operated by Age of Learning, Inc. We are committed to providing children with a learning environment where every activity is just as fun as it is educational and where you can feel confident that your children’s privacy is protected.
This Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy describes the ways in which Age of Learning, Inc., and its subsidiaries (collectively,
we
,
our
,
us
, or the
Company
) collect, process, and disclose information about our Users (as defined below) within Europe and Australia and the children who use the accounts of our European or Australian Users through ABCmouse, and any other websites, applications, and online services (
Apps
) that link to this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy (collectively, the
Services
), including ABCmouse® for Schools, operated by our wholly owned subsidiary Age of Learning for Schools, Inc. (
AofL Schools
). AofL Schools provides School Accounts (as defined below) for schools, school districts, licensed childcare facilities, and other licensed educational institutions or programs (each, an
Educational Institution
). Our Services are directed toward nursery school through second-grade aged children.
This Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy applies across multiple jurisdictions, such as Europe (where the General Data Protection Regulation (EU) 2016/679 (
GDPR
)) applies and Australia (where the Australian Privacy Act 1988 (Cth) (
Privacy Act
) applies).
Personal Data
For the purposes of this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, the term “Personal Data” encompasses both the definition of “Personal Data” under the GDPR and the definition of “Personal Information” under the Privacy Act, as set out below for European Users and Australian Users respectively.
Personal Data under the GDPR for European Users
The term
Personal Data
is defined in the
GDPR
as “
any information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person
(Data Subject)
; an identifiable natural person is one who can be identified, directly or indirectly, in particular by reference to an identifier such as a name, an identification number, location data, an online identifier or one or more factors specific to the physical, physiological, genetic, mental, economic, cultural, or social identity of that natural person.
”
Personal Information under the Privacy Act for Australian Users
Under the Privacy Act, “
Personal Information
” is defined to mean “
information or an opinion about an identified individual, or an individual who is reasonably identifiable:
a) whether the information or opinion is true or not; and
b) whether the information or opinion is recorded in a material form or not.
“
Please read this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy and our
Terms & Conditions
carefully to understand our views and practices regarding your Personal Data and how we will treat it. By using the Services, you consent to our use of your Personal Data and agree to the terms of this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy. We may provide additional privacy notices to individuals at the time we collect their Personal Data. This type of an “in-time” notice will govern how we may process the Personal Data you provide at that time. If you do not agree to our use of your Personal Data in line with this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, please do not use the Services.
2.
Types of Accounts, Services, and Users
How we collect, process, and disclose Personal Data depends on the type of account held and the type of User (as defined below). We currently offer consumers
Family Accounts
, which are detailed in our
Terms & Conditions
and, separately, AofL Schools provides
School Accounts
for schools, school districts, licensed childcare facilities, or other licensed educational institutions or programs (each, an
Educational Institution
), which are only for Educational Institutions.
The provisions of this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy apply to all Family Accounts and School Accounts (collectively,
Accounts
). Any differences in how the Accounts are treated are identified below.
Users of the Services include
Child Users
(any child under 16 who uses the learning portion of the Services) and
Adult Users
(including parents, legal guardians and anyone with parental responsibility for Child Users, purchasers of an Account as a gift (
Gift Account
), and teachers), collectively referred to as
Users
.
3.
Child Safe Guarantee
The Services are backed by our Child Safe Guarantee. This means that Accounts will never include any pop-up ads or other advertisements directed to children. In addition, Child Users are blocked from accessing external links. External links will only be available if an Adult User enters his or her password.
4.
Personal Data We Collect and How We Collect it
A. Personal Data Users Provide to Us
As more fully set forth below, we and our third-party service providers collect Personal Data directly from Users that such Users provide when using the Services, including when Adult Users create an Account, sign up for Services, or contact us with a question, comment, request, or complaint. However, we will only use or disclose this information in accordance with this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy and applicable data protection and privacy law. Please see section 8 (
When We Disclose Information to Third Parties
) below for more information and how we limit disclosure of Child User information.
If you created a profile/registered with us, you will have been asked to tick to agree to provide this information in order to access our Services, purchase our products, and/or view our content.
i.
Adult Users
Adult Users are asked to provide certain Personal Data about themselves when registering for any Account, including:
first name;
last name;
email address; and
telephone number (optional).
Any other information provided at registration depends on the type of Account or Adult User. For example:
Payment information
is collected from Adult Users who purchase a Family Account, including those who purchase a Gift Account for others. For your security, we do not store your complete credit card number in our databases but retain only the first six digits and last four digits so that we can identify your Account and respond to your requests, questions, or complaints.
The email address of a parent, legal guardian, or person with parental responsibility
is collected when the Adult User purchasing a Family Account states that he or she is not the legal guardian, or if a teacher provides such addresses in order for parents, legal guardians, or those with parental responsibility to connect to the Teacher Account or School Account.
The school name and address (country, state, and postal code only)
are collected from Adult Users who register for a Teacher Account.
Adult Users who register for a Family Account or School Account are asked to provide certain Personal Data about the relevant Child Users of such Accounts during ReadingIQ™ registration, including:
the first name (or nickname);
birth month and year; and
gender;
of Child Users who will be accessing the Services through their Accounts.
In the future, we may enable Users to create User-generated content through the Services. Creating User-generated content may include giving Adult Users the ability to upload a photographic image of a Child User (
Photo
) when registering, or allowing use of the microphone on your device to record the voice of a User. If you access the recording feature, it will record the voice of anyone speaking into or near the microphone of your device. We do not share the Photos, recordings, or data from these recordings with any third parties, and we only use the recordings in compliance with applicable law and this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy.
When an Adult User submits any Personal Data relating to a Child User in connection with the Services, the Adult User represents that they have the authority to do so and agree to us using the Personal Data in accordance with this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy. Where the recording feature is not disabled by an Adult User, the Adult User will be deemed to have agreed to our processing of recorded data of all Users.
In addition, Adult Users can provide us with information through separate password-protected sections (i.e., the Parent section or Teacher Dashboard) of the Services. These sections, accessible via the Menu or Settings link on the Services, allow Adult Users to administer their accounts, including when they add Child Users, provide testimonials, seek customer support, or submit comments or questions.
We do not ask for certain sensitive Personal Data such as your national insurance number, driver’s licence number or biometric data. However, as mentioned above, paying subscribers are asked for payment information when they subscribe. Please see section 13 (
Security
) below for more information about how we safeguard payment information.
ii.
Child Users
Children have the ability to create free-form artwork and may, in the future, have the ability to record their voice. We encourage you to use the Services with your Child Users and to view and monitor any content created or uploaded (if applicable) by them. If you would like to review all content saved by your Child Users, you can access this content by clicking on the My Files menu item in each Child User’s About Me section of the Services.
Other than in the places and for the purposes explicitly disclosed in this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, we do not knowingly collect any Personal Data directly from Child Users under the age of 16.
B. Personal Data Automatically Collected from Users
Because the security of your Personal Data is important to us, we only ask for Personal Data where it is reasonably necessary to provide the Services, and we only process your Personal Data in accordance with this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy and applicable data protection and privacy laws.
We and our third-party service providers automatically collect some Personal Data directly from users of the Services in the form of the actions they take and activities they complete when using the Services. For example, from Adult Users, we may collect information about patterns of usage and order history; from Child Users, we may collect information about patterns of usage, which activities a child commences and completes, when a child starts and stops an activity, which areas of the Services the child frequents, the number of questions answered correctly or incorrectly, how many Tickets the child earns, what virtual items the child selects to exchange for Tickets, and the child’s choice of Avatar and customisation.
We and our third-party service providers also use a variety of technologies, such as pixel tags and cookies (small text files that the Services save on your computer or mobile device), to automatically collect certain technical information from your computer or mobile device—see section 14 (
Cookie Policy
) below for further details about how we use pixel tags and cookies.
C. Automated Decision Making and Profiling
We do not use your Personal Data for the purposes of automated decision-making. However, we may do so in order to fulfil obligations imposed by law, in which case we will inform you of any such processing and provide you with an opportunity to object.
5.
Advertising and Marketing
A. Advertising
We use third parties such as network advertisers and others to assist us in advertising, including displaying our advertisements on other websites and through social media platforms; we also may use third parties that display advertisements based on your visits to our Services, as well as other websites, and other third parties to assist us in identifying relevant advertising on our Services. These third parties may collect and use click stream information, browser type, time and date, and subject of advertisements clicked or scrolled over during your visits to the Services and other websites in order to provide advertisements about goods and services likely to be of interest to you. Third-party ad network providers, advertisers, sponsors, and/or traffic measurement services may use cookies, JavaScript, web beacons (including clear GIFs), Flash LSOs, and other technologies to measure the effectiveness of their ads and to personalise advertising content to you. These third-party cookies and other technologies are governed by each third party’s specific privacy policy, not this one. We may provide these third-party advertisers with Personal Data about your usage of our Services, as well as anonymous data about visitors to and users of our Services.
Advertising to you is based on your visits to the non-child-directed portions of the Services (such as www.ReadingIQ.com) when you visit third-party websites and applications. We will never use information collected in the child-directed portions of the Services for targeted advertising purposes.
B. Marketing
We would like to send you information about our products and Services and those of our associated companies which may be of interest to you. If you have opted in to receive marketing information, you may opt out at a later date. You may not opt out of receiving administrative messages from us regarding your Account, such as password reset emails, customer support messages, and emails about changes to our Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy in accordance with section 15 (
Changes to Our Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy
).
You have a right at any time to stop us or any associated companies from contacting you for marketing purposes—if you no longer wish to be contacted for marketing purposes please contact us via the contact details in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
) below or click on the Unsubscribe button at the bottom of any email received from us.
While it is never our intention to send any marketing messages to children, if you believe a Child User has received such a marketing communication, please contact us as described in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
) below.
Push Notifications and SMS
. Additionally, if you downloaded the App on your mobile device to access the Services, as part of your use of the Services we may ask if you would like to receive push notifications, which may include alerts and notifications, badges, banners, and sounds on your mobile device. You may choose to stop receiving push notifications at any time by changing the settings on your mobile device. We may also ask if you would like to receive SMS text messages. Please note that your network provider may charge you for the text messages you receive. To permanently stop receiving SMS text messages from us text STOP, CANCEL, or UNSUBSCRIBE in reply to any SMS text message sent by us.
6.
How We Use Your Personal Data
We and our third-party service providers may use the information collected from Users as follows:
A. Adult User Information.
Information collected from Adult Users may be used:
i.
to generate a transaction identification number and member identification number, which is used by us to identify certain transactions and Users;
ii.
to permit you to register and use the Services, including, for example, to send you communications about Child User progress or your Account, or to allow you to provide Feedback through the Parent section. For security purposes, the Parent section is password protected;
iii.
for Family Accounts, to complete and fulfill your purchase, such as to process your payments, communicate with you regarding your purchase, and provide you with related customer service;
iv.
to respond to your enquiries or complaints and fulfill your requests, retrieve your password or provide technical support;
v.
to deliver ReadingIQ™ advertising and to measure the effectiveness of our advertising to adults (see section 5 (
Advertising and Marketing
) below for more information); and
vi.
to send you marketing communications that we believe may be of interest to you (see section 5 (
Advertising and Marketing
) below for more information).
B. Child User Information.
Information collected from Child Users may be used:
i.
to measure a Child User’s performance in activities and to adapt a Child User’s learning experience to the Child User’s learning needs; and
ii.
to analyse, provide progress reports on, or provide an assessment of a Child User’s performance to the Adult User on the Account.
C. Both Adult and Child User Information.
Information collected from both Adult and Child Users may be used:
i.
to allow us to assess and improve the Services, its educational content, and other services we provide, for example, to improve our content and user experience; to research, evaluate, and improve the Services’ educational efficacy; and to inform our understanding of the Services’ user base;
ii.
to customise, adapt, and personalise Users’ viewing and content-consumption experience, for example, by measuring a Child User’s performance in activities and adapting the Child User’s learning path to his or her learning needs;
iii.
to detect fraud;
iv.
to maintain and analyse the functioning of the Services; and
v.
as we believe to be necessary or appropriate: (a) under applicable data protection and privacy law, including laws outside your country of residence; (b) to comply with legal process; (c) to respond to requests from public and government authorities, including public and government authorities outside your country of residence; (d) to detect violations of and enforce our
Terms & Conditions
; (e) to protect our operations or those of any of our affiliates, including the security of the Services; (f) to protect our rights, privacy, safety, or property, or that of our affiliates, you, or others; and (g) to allow us to pursue available remedies or limit the damages that we may sustain (collectively, (a)-(g) are
Other Uses and Disclosures
).
We will never sell or rent the Personal Data of any User of the Services to a third party, except as described in this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy in the context of a sale of the Company.
Where we intend to process your Personal Data for a purpose other than that for which it was originally collected, we will provide you with information on that other purpose and any relevant further information prior to such processing.
7.
Lawful Basis for Processing of Personal Data
We only process Personal Data where we have a lawful basis for doing so, including the following:
User consent:
this refers to where you have given us explicit permission to process Personal Data for a given purpose. For example, by using our website and consenting to our cookies you give consent that we may obtain certain Personal Data about you, including your IP address and certain user preferences (see section 14 (
Cookie Policy
) below for more information). If we rely on consent as a lawful basis for the processing of your Personal Data, we will seek such consent at the time we collect your Personal Data.
For our legitimate business purposes:
this covers where we have a legitimate interest, as a business, to process Personal Data. For example, to manage enquiries, requests, and complaints; to undertake general administrative tasks in connection with our Services; to provide you with information about our Services; to improve, maintain, and analyse our Services; and to detect fraud.
For contractual necessity:
this covers situations where we must process Personal Data to meet our contractual obligations. For example, where you hold an Account with us, we would need to process your payment information to fulfil your subscription.
For compliance with a legal obligation:
this covers situations where we must process Personal Data in order to comply with the law; we may share your information with third parties such as regulatory authorities, or where we are under a legal obligation to disclose your information (for example, where we are required to share information in accordance with legislation, to prevent fraud and other criminal offences, or because of a court order). We may disclose your information in order to enforce our legal rights or to protect the legal rights of us or others.
8.
When We Disclose Information to Third Parties
Information collected from both Adult and Child Users will not be disclosed except as follows:
to third parties who perform certain services for us, such as to process debit and credit cards; to conduct or evaluate research (such as on the educational impact of the Services); and to provide us with statistics about the effectiveness of our advertising on third-party websites, provided that the service providers agree to keep the information confidential and to use it only for purposes that are permitted by this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy. In respect of advertising analytics data, when a User subscribes or downloads our Apps, certain Personal Data (including a User’s transaction identification number, which cannot be linked to individual Users, and member identification number, which can be linked to individual Users) is transmitted to our advertising measurement partner, Adjust, for the purpose of providing us with advertising statistics. However, Adjust does not store a User’s membership identification number but passes this back to us to assist us in detecting fraud. The third-party pixels and JavaScript snippets that we use for our affiliate partners, as well as for companies such as Google, Bing, Yahoo, and Facebook, work much more simply than those with Adjust. In those cases we use either JavaScript snippets provided by our affiliate partners, an image-based pixel, or IFrame (an IFrame or inline frame is an HTML document embedded inside another HTML document on a website; the IFrame HTML element is often used to insert content from another source, such as an advertisement, into a web page) which fire based on a cookie dropped in the User’s browser, or we use a server-to-server URL which fires based on the initial click identification or transaction identification number based on a cookie;
where parents, legal guardians, or those with parental responsibility for Child User(s) have linked a Family Account to a Teacher Account, as described in the
Terms and Conditions
, the Adult Users of both Accounts will be able to review the progress and details of their Child Users within both Accounts;
as we believe to be necessary or appropriate as set forth above in Other Uses and Disclosures and in other instances substantially similar to those listed in this section;
where legally required and in certain other cases, we may make such disclosures without first providing notice to Users; and
subject to confidentiality agreements, the terms of this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, and applicable data protection and privacy law, information may be disclosed to service providers, advisors, potential transactional partners, or other third parties in connection with the consideration, negotiation, or completion of a corporate transaction in which we are acquired by or merged with another company or we sell, liquidate, transfer, or license all or a portion of our assets in bankruptcy or otherwise. This means that if some or all of our assets are acquired or otherwise transferred or licensed, including in bankruptcy, that such acquirer shall be subject to the same commitments stated under this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy.
We do not disclose the personally identifiable information of any Child User to third parties for any marketing or promotional purposes.
As used in this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy,
Anonymous Data
means data that does not relate to an identified or identifiable natural person or Personal Data rendered anonymous in such a manner that the Data Subject is not, or is no longer, identifiable. Anonymous Data does not, by itself, permit the identification of individual persons and is therefore not regarded as Personal Data.
We also may disclose Anonymous Data and/or aggregated User information for any other purpose as permissible by applicable data protection and privacy law—for example, the distribution of de-identified User records to outside researchers or the distribution of reports containing aggregate user demographic and traffic patterns, provided that no individual Adult User or Child User or any specific end-user device can be readily identified.
9.
How to Access, Change, or Delete Account Information; Your Rights
An Adult User can review or change the information they provided when they registered for the Services, including by adding or removing Child Users to or from the Account, by updating information through the Parent section of the Services or, for Teacher Accounts, by using the Class Builder or Settings feature in the Teacher Dashboard. In addition, Adult Users may contact us at any time as described in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
) below to request that we provide for their review, or delete from our records, any Personal Data they have provided about Child Users associated with their Accounts, or to cease collecting Personal Data from those Child Users, as applicable. Please keep in mind that a request to delete Personal Data may lead to cancellation of your Account or the inability to use certain Services, and if a Teacher Account is linked to a Family Account, a request to delete Personal Data in one of the Accounts may be reflected in the other Account.
When we change or delete any Personal Data at your request, we will make good faith efforts to make the changes in our then-active databases as soon as reasonably practicable, generally within 24–48 hours. Changing setting options may not result in immediate changes to the settings, which are subject to our operations and maintenance schedules. Please note that information, including Personal Data, may remain in backup or archive records, and we may retain certain data relevant to preventing fraud or future abuse or for legitimate business purposes, such as analysis of aggregated, non-personally-identifiable or Anonymous Data, account recovery, or if required by law. All retained data will continue to be subject to the Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy in effect at that time.
School Accounts:
If you are using the Services through a School Account that is integrated with a school student information system (
SIS
), any request to access or make changes to or delete Personal Data including data concerning students (
Student Data
) must be made by the Educational Institution within the SIS. Once the changes are made within the SIS, the changes will automatically appear within the School Account.
If you are using the Services through a School Account and the Educational Institution is not integrating its SIS with the Services, any request to access, make changes to, or delete Personal Data including Student Data must be made by the Educational Institution’s designated administrator for the School Account. The administrator will be provided access to the School Account User Profile pages in order to update, correct, or delete the information contained therein.
Your Rights:
the right to access the Personal Data we hold about you: you may access the Personal Data we hold about you at any time by contacting us as described in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
);
where our processing of your Personal Data is based on your consent, the right to withdraw your consent to such processing at any time;
the right to rectification of your Personal Data: you can also contact us to update or correct any inaccuracies in your Personal Data;
the right to restriction of processing or to object to processing of your Personal Data;
the right to request us to transfer your Personal Data to a third party in a standardised machine-readable format;
the right to object to direct marketing. You may contact us at any time to opt out of direct marketing communications (as referred to above at section 5 (
Advertising and Marketing
));
the right to request we erase and forget your Personal Data. You can request that we erase your Personal Data; and
the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority. In the United Kingdom, this is the Information Commissioner’s Office (
ICO
).
If you wish to exercise any of these rights, please contact us using the details in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
). In your request, please make clear: (i)
what
Personal Data is concerned; and (ii)
which of the above rights
you would like to enforce. For your protection, we may only implement requests with respect to the Personal Data associated with the particular email address that you use to send us your request, and we may need to verify your identity before implementing your request. We will try to comply with your request as soon as reasonably practicable and, in any event, within one month of your request. Please note that we may need to retain certain information for recordkeeping purposes and/or to complete any transactions that you began prior to requesting such change or deletion.
10.
Account Cancellation and Reactivation; Data Deletion
We only keep your Personal Data for as long as necessary in relation to the purpose for which we are processing that information. To determine the appropriate retention period for Personal Data, we consider the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the Personal Data, the potential risk of harm from unauthorised use or disclosure of your Personal Data, the purposes for which we process your Personal Data and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, and the applicable legal requirements.
At any time, Adult Users, with the exception of School Accounts, may cancel their Accounts through the Parent section or Teacher Dashboard section of the Services.
For Family Accounts that have been cancelled, if the Account remains inactive for 24 months, we will delete all Personal Data in our active databases associated with the Account (
Account Information
). The 24 months is provided so that you have the ability, following cancellation of a Family Account or inactivity, to reactivate your Account and potentially recover previous information and resume where the Child User left off. However, we provide no guarantee, and shall have no liability or obligation to ensure that all Account Information and Services-related progress will be available or accessible or all learning or personalisation features will be able to be recovered or resumed. If a User requests that Personal Data be deleted prior to the end of the 24-month period of inactivity, we will take commercially reasonable steps to satisfy that request.
For Teacher Accounts, if you cancel your Account, we will delete all Account Information 48 hours after the cancellation,
unless
a Child User’s parent or legal guardian has linked to the Account, in which case we will delete that Child User’s Account Information as described in the previous paragraph.
Please note that cancelling an entire Teacher Account will result in the loss of activities and progress data for every Child User, except for Child Users whose parents or legal guardians have linked to the Account.
If a Teacher Account is not cancelled, we will delete all Account Information 24 months after the last activity on the Account.
For School Accounts, Adult Users should contact their respective Educational Institution for any questions regarding account cancellation and data deletion. If an Educational Institutional terminates its agreement with AofL Schools, AofL Schools will delete, or if requested by the Educational Institution, transfer to the Educational Institution all Student Data within 90 days following the termination of the agreement with the applicable Educational Institution.
Upon Account cancellation, Adult and Child User Anonymised Data may nonetheless persist internally in our archive files or similar databases and may still be used, on an anonymous basis, for our internal support, administrative, and record-keeping purposes including, but not limited to, allowing us to improve the Services and other services we provide through research, evaluation, and analytics as permissible by applicable data protection and privacy law.
11.
Links to Other Services
In certain sections of the Services, we may include links to external websites or applications (including Facebook, Twitter, YouTube, Instagram, and Pinterest). However, in order to protect children from accessing these external websites, an Adult User will be required to enter a valid password. These websites and applications are governed by their own privacy policies or information collection practices, which may be substantially different from ours. We encourage you to review the privacy policies and information collection practices of any external websites and applications, as those parties’ practices would
not
be subject to this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy.
12.
Location of Information Processing
The Services are controlled and operated by us from the United States. Your information may be transferred to, stored, and processed by us, our associates, and our third-party service providers in any country where we have facilities or in which we engage service providers, including the United States, which may have data protection laws that are different from those of your country. Specifically, we may transfer Personal Data from the European Economic Area (
EEA
) to:
countries that the European Commission has deemed to adequately safeguard Personal Data;
pursuant to the recipient’s compliance with standard contractual clauses, EU-US Privacy Shield, or Binding Corporate Rules;
pursuant to the consent of the individual to whom the Personal Data pertains, or
as otherwise permitted by applicable EEA requirements.
In addition, your information may be subject to access requests from governments, courts, or law enforcement officials in countries where it may be processed, under the laws of those countries.
By using the Services, you agree to this transfer, storing, or processing. We will take all steps reasonably necessary to ensure that your Personal Data is treated securely and in accordance with this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy.
13.
Security
The security of your Personal Data is important to us, and we employ physical, technical, and administrative security measures designed to safeguard the Personal Data collected by the Services and to guard against unauthorised or unlawful processing of Personal Data and against damage to, accidental loss, or destruction of your Personal Data. We use industry-standard SSL (secure socket layer technology) encryption to transfer Personal Data. Other security safeguards include, but are not limited to, data encryption, firewalls, and physical access controls to buildings and files.
Account holders create a password in the registration process. You can help protect against unauthorised access to your account and Personal Data by selecting and protecting your password appropriately and limiting access to your computer and browser by signing off after you have finished accessing your account. At registration, we assign a Member ID to each Account and use those Member IDs to authenticate logins, allow access to the subscription content, and monitor compliance. The Member ID is also used to authenticate users when requesting technical support. Access to information is limited (through user/password credentials and two-factor authentication) to those employees who require it to perform their job functions.
School Accounts
We are committed to maintaining the security and confidentiality of your and your children’s Personal Data, including, but not limited to, any Student Data, which we receive through School Accounts. Some of the precautions we take include (a) limiting employee access to your and your children’s Personal Data to only those employees with a need to such access to fulfill their job responsibilities; (b) conducting background checks on our employees and, specifically, upon all employees that may have access to Student Data; (c) requiring employees to sign confidentiality agreements upon hiring; (d) conducting regular employee privacy and data security training and education; and (e) protecting Personal Data with technical, contractual, administrative, and physical security safeguards.
Please be aware, however, that no information system can be guaranteed to be 100 percent secure, so we cannot guarantee the absolute security of your information. Moreover, we are not responsible for the security of information you transmit to the Services over networks that we do not control, including the internet and wireless networks. If you have reason to believe that your interaction with us is not secure, please contact us as described in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
) below.
14.
Cookie Policy
Our websites and Apps use cookies. Cookies are small text files placed on your device to collect standard internet log information and visitor behaviour information. The cookies may transmit information via your browser with a purpose of authenticating or identifying the computer (via, e.g., the IP address) or the User. Cookies may contain information such as registration data and User preferences.
We use cookies to:
i.
automatically collect certain technical information from your computer or mobile device over time and across different websites, including when you use the Services, such as your browser type, operating system, device type, the page served, your IP address and your geolocation. When you download and use our App(s), we and our service providers may track and collect App usage data, such as the date and time the App on your device accesses our servers and what information and files have been downloaded to the App based on your device number;
ii.
collect and store information about your location to provide you with educational experiences or email updates that are tailored for your region. The location information we have access to may include (1) your postal code, if you provide one to us; and (2) the approximate geographic region your computer or mobile device is located in, as determined from your IP address. However, we do not collect your street name and the name of your city/town. You may be able to change the settings on your computer or mobile device to prevent it from providing us with such IP information. We also have access to your school or classroom location if you (as a teacher) provide it to us;
iii.
we may collect information from your mobile device if you have downloaded our App(s). This information is generally used to help us deliver the most relevant information to you. Examples of information that may be collected and used include your IP address, geographic location, how you use the App(s), and information about the type of device you use. In addition, in the event our App(s) crash on your mobile device, we will receive information about your mobile device model software version and device carrier, which allows us to identify and fix bugs and otherwise improve the performance of our App(s). This information is sent to us as aggregated information and is not traceable to any individual and cannot be used to identify an individual. In addition, if you choose to turn on your Bluetooth, wi-fi or other geolocation functionality when you use our App(s), we may collect and use your geolocation information; and
iv.
we may also use third-party advertising networks to collect cookie information about Adult Users’ visits to the non-child-directed portions of the Services and to (1) deliver interest-based advertising to those Adult Users, including ReadingIQ-branded advertising, when those Adult Users visit third-party websites; and (2) provide us with statistics about the effectiveness of our advertising on third-party websites. These third-party advertising networks may use this cookie information in accordance with their own privacy policies. Please refer to section 8 (
When We Disclose Information to Third Parties
) above for more information about what Personal Data is transferred to our third-party advertising measurement partner.
When a server receives a request from a device which stores a cookie from a website, the server is able to use the information stored in the cookie in combination with the information stored on the server to allow the website to respond to you as an individual and to tailor their operations to your needs, likes, and dislikes by gathering and remembering information about your preferences. A cookie cannot collect information from your computer and cannot carry any viral or other damaging files.
B. Do Not Track Signals
Some Internet browsers may be configured to send “Do Not Track” signals to the online services that you visit. We currently do not respond to Do Not Track signals. You may opt out of many third-party ad networks, including those operated by members of the European Interaction Digital Advertising Alliance (
EIDAA
). For more information regarding this practice by EIDAA members, and your choices regarding having this information used by these companies, including how to opt out of third-party ad networks operated by EIDAA members, please visit their website:
http://www.edaa.eu/
(EIDAA) and
www.youronlinechoices.com
.
C. Effect of Opting Out of Member Network
Opting out of the EIDAA member network only means that those members no longer will deliver targeted content or ads to you. It does not mean you will no longer receive any targeted content or ads on our Services or other websites. You may continue to receive advertisements, for example, based on the particular website that you are viewing. Also, if your browsers are configured to reject cookies when you visit this opt-out page, or you subsequently erase your cookies, use a different computer, or change web browsers, your EIDAA opt-out may no longer be effective. Additional information is available on EIDAA’s website accessible by the above link.
D. Types of Cookies
We may offer cookies to you, and if you do not wish to receive them you should ensure that your web browser is set up to not accept cookies. Please note that if you disable cookies, some Services or website functionality may not be available. We use the following cookies:
Type of cookie
Purpose
Essential Cookies
These cookies are essential to provide you with services available through Services and to enable you to use some of its features. For example, they allow you to log in to secure areas of our Services and help the content of the pages you request load quickly. Without these cookies, the services that you have asked for cannot be provided, and we only use these cookies to provide you with those services.
Functionality Cookies
These cookies allow us to remember choices you make when you use our Services, such as remembering your language preferences, remembering your login details, and remembering the changes you make to other parts of Services which you can customise. The purpose of these cookies is to provide you with a more personal experience and to avoid you having to re-enter your preferences every time you visit our Services.
Analytics and Performance Cookies
These cookies are used to collect information about traffic to our Services and how users use the Services. The information gathered does not identify any individual visitor. It includes the number of visitors to our Services, the websites that referred them to our Services, the pages they visited on our Services, what time of day they visited our Services, whether they have visited our Services before, and other similar information. We use this information to help operate our Services more efficiently, to gather broad demographic information, and to monitor the level of activity on our Services.
Social Media Cookies
These cookies are used when you share information using a social media sharing button or “like” button on our Services or you link your account or engage with our content on or through a social networking website such as Facebook, Twitter, or Google+. The social network will record that you have done this.
By continuing to use our Services, you are accepting our use of these cookies that make advertising and communications more relevant to you and your interests and further help us to improve our Services.
E. Pixel Tags and IFrames
We also use pixel tags (which are also known as web beacons and clear GIFs) on our Services to track the actions of Users on our Services. Unlike cookies, which are stored on the hard drive of your computer or mobile device by a website, pixel tags are embedded invisibly on web pages. Pixel tags measure the success of our marketing campaigns and compile statistics about usage of the Services, so that we can manage our content more effectively. The information we collect using pixel tags is not linked to our Users’ Personal Data.
We additionally use JavaScript snippets and server to server requests that are provided by our affiliate partners and IFrames (or inline frames) on our Services to insert content from another source into a web page, particularly in respect of advertisements in order to provide advertisements about goods and services likely to be of interest to our Users. An IFrame is an HTML document embedded inside another HTML document on a website.
We and our third-party service providers may use the information collected through these technical methods for a number of purposes, including delivering content, tracking and enhancing our Users’ experience on the Services, and delivering advertising to visitors of www.ReadingIQ.com when they visit other websites and applications. For example, when you return to the Services after logging in, cookies help the Services recognise who you are without having to log back in. For more information, see section 6 (
How We Use Information
) above. The information collected through these technical methods on the child-directed portions of the Services are used only to support the internal operations of the Services. We do not allow third- party advertising networks to collect information about Child Users who are logged into their Accounts.
F. Cookies We Use
Our Services use the following
cookies
:
G. Managing Your Cookies
Cookies help you to get the most out of our Services, and if you disable cookies some Services or website functionality may not be available. If you do not want the Services to collect information through the use of cookies, you can set your web browser to reject cookies from the Services.
How to enable and disable cookies using your browser:
Most browsers allow you to manage cookie settings. These settings can usually be found in the
Settings, Options, or Preferences
menu of your browser. The links below are provided to help you find the settings for some common browsers:
i.
manage cookie settings in
Chrome
,
Chrome Android
, and
Chrome iOS
;
ii.
manage cookie settings in
Safari
and
Safari iOS
;
iii.
manage cookie settings in
Firefox
;
iv.
manage cookie settings in
Internet Explorer
; and
v.
manage cookie settings in
Opera
.
For all other browsers, please look for a
Help
function in your browser or contact the browser provider.
However, as mentioned above, if you reject or block cookies from the Services, the Services may not function as intended. For example, you will not be able to remain logged in to your account, and therefore you would have to log in during each page transition.
Further information about cookies, including how to see what cookies have been set on your computer or mobile device and how to manage and delete them, visit
www.allaboutcookies.org
and
www.youronlinechoices.com/uk
.
15.
Changes to Our Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy
We constantly try to provide the best services, and accordingly our Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy will change from time to time. If we update this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, we will notify you by posting the revised Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy on the Services, and for certain revisions that materially expand the ways in which we use or share the information previously collected from you through the Services, either display an alert next to the Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, display an alert upon login to the Services, or directly communicate with you (e.g., via the email address associated with your Account).
If you have a School Account, any modifications to this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy will only apply to you and your Child User in accordance with the AofL Schools agreement with your Educational Institution.
16.
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
To exercise the access, disclosure, data portability, and deletion rights  submit a verifiable consumer request to us by  visiting here:
Privacy Portal
We are committed to resolving any complaints about our collection or use of your Personal Data. If you would like to make a complaint regarding this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy or our practices in relation to your Personal Data, please contact us as described below. We will reply to your complaint as soon as we can and, in any event, within 45 days. We hope to resolve any complaint brought to our attention; however, if you feel that your complaint has not been adequately resolved, you reserve the right to contact the ICO, as detailed in section 9 (
How to Access, Change, or Delete Account Information; Your Rights
) above.
Age of Learning, Inc. and Age of Learning for Schools, Inc. are each located in the United States of America. Age of Learning, Inc. is the operator of all of the Services except ABCmouse® for Schools, operated by Age of Learning for Schools, Inc. Any questions, concerns, or complaints regarding this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, our data collection or processing practices, or issues related to your or a Child User’s information for which you are responsible should be directed to us via any of the following methods. As Age of Learning, Inc. and Age of Learning for Schools, Inc. are each located in the United States of America, we have appointed a representative in the European Union so that our European Users may easily contact us:
For Family Accounts:
Postal Address:
Age of Learning, Inc.
Attention: Legal Department
P.O. Box 230
Glendale, CA 91209
USA
Telephone Number: 1-800-633-3331
Email address: privacy@aofl.com
For School Accounts:
Postal Address:
Age of Learning for Schools, Inc.
Attention: Legal Department
P.O. Box 230
Glendale, CA 91209
USA
Telephone Number: 1-866-360-9492
Email Address: privacy@aofls.com
European Representative:
We have appointed DPR Group as our Data Protection Representative in the European Union so that you can contact them directly in your home country. DPR Group has locations in each of the 28 EU countries, so that Age of Learning, Inc.’s customers can always raise the questions they want with them.
PLEASE NOTE: when mailing inquiries, it is ESSENTIAL that you mark your letters for ‘DPR Group’ and not ‘Age of Learning, Inc.’ or your inquiry may not reach us. Please refer clearly to Age of Learning, Inc. in your correspondence. On receiving your correspondence, the Company will likely request evidence of your identity, to ensure your personal data and information connected with it is not provided to anyone other than you. If you have any concerns over how DPR Group will handle the personal data they will require to undertake their services, please refer to their privacy notice at
https://www.dpr.eu.com/legal-privacy
.
DPR Postal Addresses
Country
Addresses
Austria
DPR Group, City Tower, Brückenkopfgasse 1/6. Stock, Graz, 8020, Austria
Belgium
DPR Group, Place de L’Université 16, Louvain-La-Neuve, Waals Brabant, 1348, Belgium
Bulgaria
DPR Group, 132 Mimi Balkanska Str., Sofia, 1540, Bulgaria
Croatia
DPR Group, Ground & 9th Floor, Hoto Tower, Savska cesta 32, Zagreb, 10000, Croatia
Cyprus
DPR Group, Victory House, 205 Archbishop Makarios Avenue, Limassol, 3030, Cyprus
Czech Republic
DPR Group, IQ Ostrava Ground floor, 28. rijna 3346/91, Ostrava-mesto, Moravska, Ostrava, Czech Republic
Denmark
DPR Group, Lautruphøj 1-3, Ballerup, 2750, Denmark
Estonia
DPR Group, 2nd Floor, Tornimae 5, Tallinn, 10145, Estonia
Finland
DPR Group, Luna House, 5.krs, Mannerheimintie 12 B, Helsinki, 00100, Finland
France
DPR Group, 72 rue de Lessard, Rouen, 76100, France
Germany
DPR Group, 3rd and 4th floor, Altmarkt 10 B/D, Dresden, 01067, Germany
Greece
DPR Group, 24 Lagoumitzi str, Athens, 17671, Greece
Hungary
DPR Group, EMKE Building, Rákóczi Út 42, Budapest, 1072, Hungary
Ireland
DPR Group, Phoenix House, Monahan Road, Cork, T12 H1XY, Republic of Ireland
Italy
DPR Group, BPM 335368, Via Roma 12, 10073 , Turin, Italy
Latvia
DPR Group, 4th & 5th floors, 14 Terbatas Street, Riga, LV-1011, Latvia
Lithuania
DPR Group, 44A Gedimino Avenue, 01110 Vilnius, Lithuania
Luxembourg
DPR Group, BPM 335368, Banzelt 4 A, 6921, Roodt-sur-Syre, Luxembourg
Malta
DPR Group, Tower Business Centre, 2nd floor, Tower Street, Swatar, BKR4013, Malta
Netherlands
DPR Group, Cuserstraat 93, Floor 2 and 3, Amsterdam, 1081 CN, Netherlands
Poland
DPR Group, Budynek Fronton ul Kamienna 21, Krakow, 31-403, Poland
Portugal
DPR Group, Torre de Monsanto, Rua Afonso Praça 30, 7th floor, Algès, Lisbon, 1495-061, Portugal
Romania
DPR Group, World Trade Centre, Piata Montreal no 10, Entrance F, 1st Floor, Sector 1, Bucharest, 11469, Romania
Slovakia
DPR Group, Apollo Business Centre II, Block E / 9th floor, 4D Prievozska, Bratislava, 821 09, Slovakia
Slovenia
DPR Group, Trg. Republike 3, Floor 3, Ljubljana, 1000, Slovenia
Spain
DPR Group, Puerta de las Naciones, Ribera del Loira 46, Madrid, 28042, Spain
Sweden
DPR Group, S:t Johannesgatan 2, 4th floor, Malmo, SE – 211 46, Sweden
United Kingdom
DPR Group, BPM 335368, 372 Old Street, EC1V 9AU, London, United Kingdom
Sub-policy 12
https://www.ageoflearning.com/riq-privacy-eu-uk/:
Skip to content
ReadingIQ Privacy Policy
Effective Date: May 1, 2019
Table of Contents
Introduction
Types of Accounts, Services, and Users
Child Safe Guarantee
Personal Data We Collect and How We Collect it
Advertising and Marketing
How We Use Your Personal Data
Lawful Basis for Processing of Personal Data
When We Disclose Information to Third Parties
How to Access, Change, or Delete Account Information; Your Rights
Account Cancellation and Reactivation; Data Deletion
Links to Other Services
Location of Information Processing
Security
Cookie Policy
Changes to Our Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
1.
Introduction
Welcome to ReadingIQ™ (
ReadingIQ
), which is owned and operated by Age of Learning, Inc. We are committed to providing children with a learning environment where every book is just as fun as it is educational and where you can feel confident that your child’s privacy is protected.
This Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy describes the ways in which Age of Learning, Inc., and its subsidiaries (collectively,
we, our, us,
or the
Company
) collect, process, and disclose information about our Users (as defined below) within Europe and the children who use our European Users’ accounts through ReadingIQ™ and any other websites, applications, and online services (
Apps
) that link to this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy (collectively, the
Services
), including ABCmouse® for Schools operated by our wholly owned subsidiary Age of Learning for Schools, Inc. (
AofL Schools
). AofL Schools provides School Accounts (as defined below) for schools, school districts, licensed childcare facilities, and other licensed educational institutions or programs (each, an
Educational Institution
). Our Services are directed toward nursery-school-aged children through children up to 12 years old.
Personal Data
As used in this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy,
Personal Data
is as defined in the General Data Protection Regulation (
GDPR
) as
“any information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person
(
Data Subject
)
; an identifiable natural person is one who can be identified, directly or indirectly, in particular by reference to an identifier such as a name, an identification number, location data, an online identifier or one or more factors specific to the physical, physiological, genetic, mental, economic, cultural, or social identity of that natural person
.”
Please read this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy and our
Terms and Conditions
carefully to understand our views and practices regarding your Personal Data and how we will treat it. By using the Services, you consent to our use of your Personal Data and agree to the terms of this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy. We may provide additional privacy notices to individuals at the time we collect their Personal Data. This type of an “in-time” notice will govern how we may process the Personal Data you provide at that time. If you do not agree to our use of your Personal Data in line with this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, please do not use the Services.
2.
Types of Accounts, Services, and Users
Terms and Conditions
and, separately, AofL Schools provides
School Accounts
for schools, school districts, licensed childcare facilities, or other licensed educational institutions or programs (each, an
Educational Institution
), which are only for Educational Institutions.
The provisions of this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy apply to all Family Accounts and School Accounts (collectively,
Accounts
). Any differences in how the Accounts are treated are identified below.
Users of the Services include
Child Users
(any child under 16 who uses the learning portion of the Services) and
Adult Users
(including parents, legal guardians and anyone with parental responsibility for Child Users, purchasers of an Account as a gift (
Gift Account
), and teachers), collectively referred to as
Users
.
3.
Child Safe Guarantee
The Services are backed by our Child Safe Guarantee. This means that Accounts will never include any pop-up ads or other advertisements directed to children. In addition, Child Users are blocked from accessing external links. External links will only be available if an Adult User enters his or her password.
4.
Personal Data We Collect and How We Collect it
A. Personal Data Users Provide to Us
As more fully set forth below, we and our third-party service providers collect Personal Data directly from Users that such Users provide when using the Services, including when Adult Users create an Account, sign up for Services, or contact us with a question, comment, request, or complaint. However, we will only use or disclose this information in accordance with this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy and applicable data protection and privacy law. Please see section 8 (
When We Disclose Information to Third Parties
) below for more information and how we limit disclosure of Child User information.
If you created a profile/registered with us, you will have been asked to tick to agree to provide this information in order to access our Services, purchase our products, and/or view our content.
i.
Adult Users
Adult Users are asked to provide certain Personal Data about themselves when registering for any Account, including:
first name;
last name;
email address; and
telephone number (optional).
Any other information provided at registration depends on the type of Account or Adult User. For example:
Payment information
is collected from Adult Users who purchase a Family Account, including those who purchase a Gift Account for others. For your security, we do not store your complete credit card number in our databases but retain only the first six digits and last four digits so that we can identify your Account and respond to your requests, questions, or complaints.
The email address of a parent, legal guardian, or person with parental responsibility
is collected when the Adult User purchasing a Family Account states that he or she is not the legal guardian, or if a teacher provides such addresses in order for parents, legal guardians, or those with parental responsibility to connect to the Teacher Account or School Account.
The school name and address (country, state, and postal code only)
are collected from Adult Users who register for a Teacher Account.
Adult Users who register for a Family Account or School Account are asked to provide certain Personal Data about the relevant Child Users of such Accounts during ReadingIQ™ registration, including:
the first name (or nickname);
birth month and year; and
gender;
of Child Users who will be accessing the Services through their Accounts.
In the future, we may enable Users to create User-generated content through the Services. Creating User-generated content may include giving Adult Users the ability to upload a photographic image of a Child User (
Photo
) when registering, or allowing use of the microphone on your device to record the voice of a User. If you access the recording feature, it will record the voice of anyone speaking into or near the microphone of your device. We do not share the Photos, recordings, or data from these recordings with any third parties, and we only use the recordings in compliance with applicable law and this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy.
When an Adult User submits any Personal Data relating to a Child User in connection with the Services, the Adult User represents that they have the authority to do so and agree to us using the Personal Data in accordance with this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy. Where the recording feature is not disabled by an Adult User, the Adult User will be deemed to have agreed to our processing of recorded data of all Users.
In addition, Adult Users can provide us with information through separate password-protected sections (i.e., the Parent section or Teacher Dashboard) of the Services. These sections, accessible via the Menu or Settings link on the Services, allow Adult Users to administer their accounts, including when they add Child Users, provide testimonials, seek customer support, or submit comments or questions.
We do not ask for certain sensitive Personal Data such as your national insurance number, driver’s licence number or biometric data. However, as mentioned above, paying subscribers are asked for payment information when they subscribe. Please see section 13 (
Security
) below for more information about how we safeguard payment information.
ii.
Child Users
Children have the ability to create free-form artwork and may, in the future, have the ability to record their voice. We encourage you to use the Services with your Child Users and to view and monitor any content created or uploaded (if applicable) by them. If you would like to review all content saved by your Child Users, you can access this content by clicking on the My Files menu item in each Child User’s About Me section of the Services.
Other than in the places and for the purposes explicitly disclosed in this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, we do not knowingly collect any Personal Data directly from Child Users under the age of 16.
B.
Personal Data Automatically Collected from Users
Because the security of your Personal Data is important to us, we only ask for Personal Data where it is reasonably necessary to provide the Services, and we only process your Personal Data in accordance with this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy and applicable data protection and privacy laws.
We and our third-party service providers automatically collect some Personal Data directly from users of the Services in the form of the actions they take and activities they complete when using the Services. For example, from Adult Users, we may collect information about patterns of usage and order history; from Child Users, we may collect information about patterns of usage, which activities a child commences and completes, when a child starts and stops an activity, which areas of the Services the child frequents, the number of questions answered correctly or incorrectly, how many Tickets the child earns, what virtual items the child selects to exchange for Tickets, and the child’s choice of Avatar and customisation.
We and our third-party service providers also use a variety of technologies, such as pixel tags and cookies (small text files that the Services save on your computer or mobile device), to automatically collect certain technical information from your computer or mobile device—see section 14 (
Cookie Policy
) below for further details about how we use pixel tags and cookies.
C.
Automated Decision Making and Profiling
We do not use your Personal Data for the purposes of automated decision-making. However, we may do so in order to fulfil obligations imposed by law, in which case we will inform you of any such processing and provide you with an opportunity to object.
5.
Advertising and Marketing
A. Advertising
We use third parties such as network advertisers and others to assist us in advertising, including displaying our advertisements on other websites and through social media platforms; we also may use third parties that display advertisements based on your visits to our Services, as well as other websites, and other third parties to assist us in identifying relevant advertising on our Services. These third parties may collect and use click stream information, browser type, time and date, and subject of advertisements clicked or scrolled over during your visits to the Services and other websites in order to provide advertisements about goods and services likely to be of interest to you. Third-party ad network providers, advertisers, sponsors, and/or traffic measurement services may use cookies, JavaScript, web beacons (including clear GIFs), Flash LSOs, and other technologies to measure the effectiveness of their ads and to personalise advertising content to you. These third-party cookies and other technologies are governed by each third party’s specific privacy policy, not this one. We may provide these third-party advertisers with Personal Data about your usage of our Services, as well as anonymous data about visitors to and users of our Services.
Advertising to you is based on your visits to the non-child-directed portions of the Services (such as www.ReadingIQ.com) when you visit third-party websites and applications. We will never use information collected in the child-directed portions of the Services for targeted advertising purposes.
B. Marketing
We would like to send you information about our products and Services and those of our associated companies which may be of interest to you. If you have opted in to receive marketing information, you may opt out at a later date. You may not opt out of receiving administrative messages from us regarding your Account, such as password reset emails, customer support messages, and emails about changes to our Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy in accordance with section 15 (
Changes to Our Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy
).
You have a right at any time to stop us or any associated companies from contacting you for marketing purposes—if you no longer wish to be contacted for marketing purposes please contact us via the contact details in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
) below or click on the Unsubscribe button at the bottom of any email received from us.
While it is never our intention to send any marketing messages to children, if you believe a Child User has received such a marketing communication, please contact us as described in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
) below.
Push Notifications and SMS
. Additionally, if you downloaded the App on your mobile device to access the Services, as part of your use of the Services we may ask if you would like to receive push notifications, which may include alerts and notifications, badges, banners, and sounds on your mobile device. You may choose to stop receiving push notifications at any time by changing the settings on your mobile device. We may also ask if you would like to receive SMS text messages. Please note that your network provider may charge you for the text messages you receive. To permanently stop receiving SMS text messages from us text STOP, CANCEL, or UNSUBSCRIBE in reply to any SMS text message sent by us.
6.
How We Use Your Personal Data
A. Adult User Information.
Information collected from Adult Users may be used:
i.
to generate a transaction identification number and member identification number, which is used by us to identify certain transactions and Users;
ii.
to permit you to register and use the Services, including, for example, to send you communications about Child User progress or your Account, or to allow you to provide Feedback through the Parent section. For security purposes, the Parent section is password protected;
iii.
for Family Accounts, to complete and fulfill your purchase, such as to process your payments, communicate with you regarding your purchase, and provide you with related customer service;
iv.
to respond to your enquiries or complaints and fulfill your requests, retrieve your password or provide technical support;
v.
to deliver ReadingIQ™ advertising and to measure the effectiveness of our advertising to adults (see section 5 (
Advertising and Marketing
) below for more information); and
vi.
to send you marketing communications that we believe may be of interest to you (see section 5 (
Advertising and Marketing
) below for more information).
B. Child User Information.
Information collected from Child Users may be used:
i.
to measure a Child User’s performance in activities and to adapt a Child User’s learning experience to the Child User’s learning needs; and
ii.
to analyse, provide progress reports on, or provide an assessment of a Child User’s performance to the Adult User on the Account.
C. Both Adult and Child User Information.
Information collected from both Adult and Child Users may be used:
i.
to allow us to assess and improve the Services, its educational content, and other services we provide, for example, to improve our content and user experience; to research, evaluate, and improve the Services’ educational efficacy; and to inform our understanding of the Services’ user base;
ii.
to customise, adapt, and personalise Users’ viewing and content-consumption experience, for example, by measuring a Child User’s performance in activities and adapting the Child User’s learning path to his or her learning needs;
iii.
to detect fraud;
iv.
to maintain and analyse the functioning of the Services; and
v.
as we believe to be necessary or appropriate: (a) under applicable data protection and privacy law, including laws outside your country of residence; (b) to comply with legal process; (c) to respond to requests from public and government authorities, including public and government authorities outside your country of residence; (d) to detect violations of and enforce our
Terms & Conditions
; (e) to protect our operations or those of any of our affiliates, including the security of the Services; (f) to protect our rights, privacy, safety, or property, or that of our affiliates, you, or others; and (g) to allow us to pursue available remedies or limit the damages that we may sustain (collectively, (a)-(g) are
Other Uses and Disclosures
).
We will never sell or rent the Personal Data of any User of the Services to a third party, except as described in this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy in the context of a sale of the Company.
Where we intend to process your Personal Data for a purpose other than that for which it was originally collected, we will provide you with information on that other purpose and any relevant further information prior to such processing.
7.
Lawful Basis for Processing of Personal Data
We only process Personal Data where we have a lawful basis for doing so, including the following:
User consent:
this refers to where you have given us explicit permission to process Personal Data for a given purpose. For example, by using our website and consenting to our cookies you give consent that we may obtain certain Personal Data about you, including your IP address and certain user preferences (see section 14 (
Cookie Policy
) below for more information). If we rely on consent as a lawful basis for the processing of your Personal Data, we will seek such consent at the time we collect your Personal Data.
For our legitimate business purposes:
this covers where we have a legitimate interest, as a business, to process Personal Data. For example, to manage enquiries, requests, and complaints; to undertake general administrative tasks in connection with our Services; to provide you with information about our Services; to improve, maintain, and analyse our Services; and to detect fraud.
For contractual necessity:
this covers situations where we must process Personal Data to meet our contractual obligations. For example, where you hold an Account with us, we would need to process your payment information to fulfil your subscription.
For compliance with a legal obligation:
this covers situations where we must process Personal Data in order to comply with the law; we may share your information with third parties such as regulatory authorities, or where we are under a legal obligation to disclose your information (for example, where we are required to share information in accordance with legislation, to prevent fraud and other criminal offences, or because of a court order). We may disclose your information in order to enforce our legal rights or to protect the legal rights of us or others.
8.
When We Disclose Information to Third Parties
Information collected from both Adult and Child Users will not be disclosed except as follows:
to third parties who perform certain services for us, such as to process debit and credit cards; to conduct or evaluate research (such as on the educational impact of the Services); and to provide us with statistics about the effectiveness of our advertising on third-party websites, provided that the service providers agree to keep the information confidential and to use it only for purposes that are permitted by this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy. In respect of advertising analytics data, when a User subscribes or downloads our Apps, certain Personal Data (including a User’s transaction identification number, which cannot be linked to individual Users, and member identification number, which can be linked to individual Users) is transmitted to our advertising measurement partner, Adjust, for the purpose of providing us with advertising statistics. However, Adjust does not store a User’s membership identification number but passes this back to us to assist us in detecting fraud. The third-party pixels and JavaScript snippets that we use for our affiliate partners, as well as for companies such as Google, Bing, Yahoo, and Facebook, work much more simply than those with Adjust. In those cases we use either JavaScript snippets provided by our affiliate partners, an image-based pixel, or IFrame (an IFrame or inline frame is an HTML document embedded inside another HTML document on a website; the IFrame HTML element is often used to insert content from another source, such as an advertisement, into a web page) which fire based on a cookie dropped in the User’s browser, or we use a server-to-server URL which fires based on the initial click identification or transaction identification number based on a cookie;
where parents, legal guardians, or those with parental responsibility for Child User(s) have linked a Family Account to a Teacher Account, as described in the
Terms and Conditions
, the Adult Users of both Accounts will be able to review the progress and details of their Child Users within both Accounts;
as we believe to be necessary or appropriate as set forth above in Other Uses and Disclosures and in other instances substantially similar to those listed in this section;
where legally required and in certain other cases, we may make such disclosures without first providing notice to Users; and
subject to confidentiality agreements, the terms of this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, and applicable data protection and privacy law, information may be disclosed to service providers, advisors, potential transactional partners, or other third parties in connection with the consideration, negotiation, or completion of a corporate transaction in which we are acquired by or merged with another company or we sell, liquidate, transfer, or license all or a portion of our assets in bankruptcy or otherwise. This means that if some or all of our assets are acquired or otherwise transferred or licensed, including in bankruptcy, that such acquirer shall be subject to the same commitments stated under this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy.
We do not disclose the personally identifiable information of any Child User to third parties for any marketing or promotional purposes.
As used in this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy,
Anonymous Data
means data that does not relate to an identified or identifiable natural person or Personal Data rendered anonymous in such a manner that the Data Subject is not, or is no longer, identifiable. Anonymous Data does not, by itself, permit the identification of individual persons and is therefore not regarded as Personal Data.
We also may disclose Anonymous Data and/or aggregated User information for any other purpose as permissible by applicable data protection and privacy law—for example, the distribution of de-identified User records to outside researchers or the distribution of reports containing aggregate user demographic and traffic patterns, provided that no individual Adult User or Child User or any specific end-user device can be readily identified.
9.
How to Access, Change, or Delete Account Information; Your Rights
An Adult User can review or change the information they provided when they registered for the Services, including by adding or removing Child Users to or from the Account, by updating information through the Parent section of the Services or, for Teacher Accounts, by using the Class Builder or Settings feature in the Teacher Dashboard. In addition, Adult Users may contact us at any time as described in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
) below to request that we provide for their review, or delete from our records, any Personal Data they have provided about Child Users associated with their Accounts, or to cease collecting Personal Data from those Child Users, as applicable. Please keep in mind that a request to delete Personal Data may lead to cancellation of your Account or the inability to use certain Services, and if a Teacher Account is linked to a Family Account, a request to delete Personal Data in one of the Accounts may be reflected in the other Account.
When we change or delete any Personal Data at your request, we will make good faith efforts to make the changes in our then-active databases as soon as reasonably practicable, generally within 24–48 hours. Changing setting options may not result in immediate changes to the settings, which are subject to our operations and maintenance schedules. Please note that information, including Personal Data, may remain in backup or archive records, and we may retain certain data relevant to preventing fraud or future abuse or for legitimate business purposes, such as analysis of aggregated, non-personally-identifiable or Anonymous Data, account recovery, or if required by law. All retained data will continue to be subject to the Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy in effect at that time.
School Accounts:
If you are using the Services through a School Account that is integrated with a school student information system (
SIS
), any request to access or make changes to or delete Personal Data including data concerning students (
Student Data
) must be made by the Educational Institution within the SIS. Once the changes are made within the SIS, the changes will automatically appear within the School Account.
If you are using the Services through a School Account and the Educational Institution is not integrating its SIS with the Services, any request to access, make changes to, or delete Personal Data including Student Data must be made by the Educational Institution’s designated administrator for the School Account. The administrator will be provided access to the School Account User Profile pages in order to update, correct, or delete the information contained therein.
Your Rights:
the right to access the Personal Data we hold about you: you may access the Personal Data we hold about you at any time by contacting us as described in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
);
where our processing of your Personal Data is based on your consent, the right to withdraw your consent to such processing at any time;
the right to rectification of your Personal Data: you can also contact us to update or correct any inaccuracies in your Personal Data;
the right to restriction of processing or to object to processing of your Personal Data;
the right to request us to transfer your Personal Data to a third party in a standardised machine-readable format;
the right to object to direct marketing. You may contact us at any time to opt out of direct marketing communications (as referred to above at section 5 (
Advertising and Marketing
));
the right to request we erase and forget your Personal Data. You can request that we erase your Personal Data; and
the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority. In the United Kingdom, this is the Information Commissioner’s Office (
ICO
).
If you wish to exercise any of these rights, please contact us using the details in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
). In your request, please make clear: (i)
what
Personal Data is concerned; and (ii)
which of the above rights
you would like to enforce. For your protection, we may only implement requests with respect to the Personal Data associated with the particular email address that you use to send us your request, and we may need to verify your identity before implementing your request. We will try to comply with your request as soon as reasonably practicable and, in any event, within one month of your request. Please note that we may need to retain certain information for recordkeeping purposes and/or to complete any transactions that you began prior to requesting such change or deletion.
10.
Account Cancellation and Reactivation; Data Deletion
We only keep your Personal Data for as long as necessary in relation to the purpose for which we are processing that information. To determine the appropriate retention period for Personal Data, we consider the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the Personal Data, the potential risk of harm from unauthorised use or disclosure of your Personal Data, the purposes for which we process your Personal Data and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, and the applicable legal requirements.
At any time, Adult Users, with the exception of School Accounts, may cancel their Accounts through the Parent section or Teacher Dashboard section of the Services.
For Family Accounts that have been cancelled, if the Account remains inactive for 24 months, we will delete all Personal Data in our active databases associated with the Account (
Account Information
). The 24 months is provided so that you have the ability, following cancellation of a Family Account or inactivity, to reactivate your Account and potentially recover previous information and resume where the Child User left off. However, we provide no guarantee, and shall have no liability or obligation to ensure that all Account Information and Services-related progress will be available or accessible or all learning or personalisation features will be able to be recovered or resumed. If a User requests that Personal Data be deleted prior to the end of the 24-month period of inactivity, we will take commercially reasonable steps to satisfy that request.
For Teacher Accounts, if you cancel your Account, we will delete all Account Information 48 hours after the cancellation,
unless
a Child User’s parent or legal guardian has linked to the Account, in which case we will delete that Child User’s Account Information as described in the previous paragraph.
Please note that cancelling an entire Teacher Account will result in the loss of activities and progress data for every Child User, except for Child Users whose parents or legal guardians have linked to the Account.
If a Teacher Account is not cancelled, we will delete all Account Information 24 months after the last activity on the Account.
For School Accounts, Adult Users should contact their respective Educational Institution for any questions regarding account cancellation and data deletion. If an Educational Institutional terminates its agreement with AofL Schools, AofL Schools will delete, or if requested by the Educational Institution, transfer to the Educational Institution all Student Data within 90 days following the termination of the agreement with the applicable Educational Institution.
Upon Account cancellation, Adult and Child User Anonymised Data may nonetheless persist internally in our archive files or similar databases and may still be used, on an anonymous basis, for our internal support, administrative, and record-keeping purposes including, but not limited to, allowing us to improve the Services and other services we provide through research, evaluation, and analytics as permissible by applicable data protection and privacy law.
11.
Links to Other Services
In certain sections of the Services, we may include links to external websites or applications (including Facebook, Twitter, YouTube, Instagram, and Pinterest). However, in order to protect children from accessing these external websites, an Adult User will be required to enter a valid password. These websites and applications are governed by their own privacy policies or information collection practices, which may be substantially different from ours. We encourage you to review the privacy policies and information collection practices of any external websites and applications, as those parties’ practices would
not
be subject to this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy.
12.
Location of Information Processing
The Services are controlled and operated by us from the United States. Your information may be transferred to, stored, and processed by us, our associates, and our third-party service providers in any country where we have facilities or in which we engage service providers, including the United States, which may have data protection laws that are different from those of your country. Specifically, we may transfer Personal Data from the European Economic Area (
EEA
) to:
countries that the European Commission has deemed to adequately safeguard Personal Data;
pursuant to the recipient’s compliance with standard contractual clauses, EU-US Privacy Shield, or Binding Corporate Rules;
pursuant to the consent of the individual to whom the Personal Data pertains, or
as otherwise permitted by applicable EEA requirements.
In addition, your information may be subject to access requests from governments, courts, or law enforcement officials in countries where it may be processed, under the laws of those countries.
By using the Services, you agree to this transfer, storing, or processing. We will take all steps reasonably necessary to ensure that your Personal Data is treated securely and in accordance with this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy.
13.
Security
The security of your Personal Data is important to us, and we employ physical, technical, and administrative security measures designed to safeguard the Personal Data collected by the Services and to guard against unauthorised or unlawful processing of Personal Data and against damage to, accidental loss, or destruction of your Personal Data. We use industry-standard SSL (secure socket layer technology) encryption to transfer Personal Data. Other security safeguards include, but are not limited to, data encryption, firewalls, and physical access controls to buildings and files.
Account holders create a password in the registration process. You can help protect against unauthorised access to your account and Personal Data by selecting and protecting your password appropriately and limiting access to your computer and browser by signing off after you have finished accessing your account. At registration, we assign a Member ID to each Account and use those Member IDs to authenticate logins, allow access to the subscription content, and monitor compliance. The Member ID is also used to authenticate users when requesting technical support. Access to information is limited (through user/password credentials and two-factor authentication) to those employees who require it to perform their job functions.
School Accounts
We are committed to maintaining the security and confidentiality of your and your children’s Personal Data, including, but not limited to, any Student Data, which we receive through School Accounts. Some of the precautions we take include (a) limiting employee access to your and your children’s Personal Data to only those employees with a need to such access to fulfill their job responsibilities; (b) conducting background checks on our employees and, specifically, upon all employees that may have access to Student Data; (c) requiring employees to sign confidentiality agreements upon hiring; (d) conducting regular employee privacy and data security training and education; and (e) protecting Personal Data with technical, contractual, administrative, and physical security safeguards.
Please be aware, however, that no information system can be guaranteed to be 100 percent secure, so we cannot guarantee the absolute security of your information. Moreover, we are not responsible for the security of information you transmit to the Services over networks that we do not control, including the internet and wireless networks. If you have reason to believe that your interaction with us is not secure, please contact us as described in section 16 (
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
) below.
14.
Cookie Policy
A. What Are Cookies?
Our websites and Apps use cookies. Cookies are small text files placed on your device to collect standard internet log information and visitor behaviour information. The cookies may transmit information via your browser with a purpose of authenticating or identifying the computer (via, e.g., the IP address) or the User. Cookies may contain information such as registration data and User preferences.
We use cookies to:
i.
automatically collect certain technical information from your computer or mobile device over time and across different websites, including when you use the Services, such as your browser type, operating system, device type, the page served, your IP address and your geolocation. When you download and use our App(s), we and our service providers may track and collect App usage data, such as the date and time the App on your device accesses our servers and what information and files have been downloaded to the App based on your device number;
ii.
collect and store information about your location to provide you with educational experiences or email updates that are tailored for your region. The location information we have access to may include (1) your postal code, if you provide one to us; and (2) the approximate geographic region your computer or mobile device is located in, as determined from your IP address. However, we do not collect your street name and the name of your city/town. You may be able to change the settings on your computer or mobile device to prevent it from providing us with such IP information. We also have access to your school or classroom location if you (as a teacher) provide it to us;
iii.
we may collect information from your mobile device if you have downloaded our App(s). This information is generally used to help us deliver the most relevant information to you. Examples of information that may be collected and used include your IP address, geographic location, how you use the App(s), and information about the type of device you use. In addition, in the event our App(s) crash on your mobile device, we will receive information about your mobile device model software version and device carrier, which allows us to identify and fix bugs and otherwise improve the performance of our App(s). This information is sent to us as aggregated information and is not traceable to any individual and cannot be used to identify an individual. In addition, if you choose to turn on your Bluetooth, wi-fi or other geolocation functionality when you use our App(s), we may collect and use your geolocation information; and
iv.
we may also use third-party advertising networks to collect cookie information about Adult Users’ visits to the non-child-directed portions of the Services and to (1) deliver interest-based advertising to those Adult Users, including ReadingIQ-branded advertising, when those Adult Users visit third-party websites; and (2) provide us with statistics about the effectiveness of our advertising on third-party websites. These third-party advertising networks may use this cookie information in accordance with their own privacy policies. Please refer to section 8 (
When We Disclose Information to Third Parties
) above for more information about what Personal Data is transferred to our third-party advertising measurement partner.
When a server receives a request from a device which stores a cookie from a website, the server is able to use the information stored in the cookie in combination with the information stored on the server to allow the website to respond to you as an individual and to tailor their operations to your needs, likes, and dislikes by gathering and remembering information about your preferences. A cookie cannot collect information from your computer and cannot carry any viral or other damaging files.
B. Do Not Track Signals
Some Internet browsers may be configured to send “Do Not Track” signals to the online services that you visit. We currently do not respond to Do Not Track signals. You may opt out of many third-party ad networks, including those operated by members of the European Interaction Digital Advertising Alliance (
EIDAA
). For more information regarding this practice by EIDAA members, and your choices regarding having this information used by these companies, including how to opt out of third-party ad networks operated by EIDAA members, please visit their website:
http://www.edaa.eu/
(EIDAA) and
www.youronlinechoices.com
.
C.
Effect of Opting Out of Member Network
Opting out of the EIDAA member network only means that those members no longer will deliver targeted content or ads to you. It does not mean you will no longer receive any targeted content or ads on our Services or other websites. You may continue to receive advertisements, for example, based on the particular website that you are viewing. Also, if your browsers are configured to reject cookies when you visit this opt-out page, or you subsequently erase your cookies, use a different computer, or change web browsers, your EIDAA opt-out may no longer be effective. Additional information is available on EIDAA’s website accessible by the above link.
D. Types of Cookies
We may offer cookies to you, and if you do not wish to receive them you should ensure that your web browser is set up to not accept cookies. Please note that if you disable cookies, some Services or website functionality may not be available. We use the following cookies:
Type of cookie
Purpose
Essential Cookies
These cookies are essential to provide you with services available through Services and to enable you to use some of its features. For example, they allow you to log in to secure areas of our Services and help the content of the pages you request load quickly. Without these cookies, the services that you have asked for cannot be provided, and we only use these cookies to provide you with those services.
Functionality Cookies
These cookies allow us to remember choices you make when you use our Services, such as remembering your language preferences, remembering your login details, and remembering the changes you make to other parts of Services which you can customise. The purpose of these cookies is to provide you with a more personal experience and to avoid you having to re-enter your preferences every time you visit our Services.
Analytics and Performance Cookies
These cookies are used to collect information about traffic to our Services and how users use the Services. The information gathered does not identify any individual visitor. It includes the number of visitors to our Services, the websites that referred them to our Services, the pages they visited on our Services, what time of day they visited our Services, whether they have visited our Services before, and other similar information. We use this information to help operate our Services more efficiently, to gather broad demographic information, and to monitor the level of activity on our Services.
Social Media Cookies
These cookies are used when you share information using a social media sharing button or “like” button on our Services or you link your account or engage with our content on or through a social networking website such as Facebook, Twitter, or Google+. The social network will record that you have done this.
By continuing to use our Services, you are accepting our use of these cookies that make advertising and communications more relevant to you and your interests and further help us to improve our Services.
E. Pixel Tags and IFrames
We also use pixel tags (which are also known as web beacons and clear GIFs) on our Services to track the actions of Users on our Services. Unlike cookies, which are stored on the hard drive of your computer or mobile device by a website, pixel tags are embedded invisibly on web pages. Pixel tags measure the success of our marketing campaigns and compile statistics about usage of the Services, so that we can manage our content more effectively. The information we collect using pixel tags is not linked to our Users’ Personal Data.
We additionally use JavaScript snippets and server to server requests that are provided by our affiliate partners and IFrames (or inline frames) on our Services to insert content from another source into a web page, particularly in respect of advertisements in order to provide advertisements about goods and services likely to be of interest to our Users. An IFrame is an HTML document embedded inside another HTML document on a website.
We and our third-party service providers may use the information collected through these technical methods for a number of purposes, including delivering content, tracking and enhancing our Users’ experience on the Services, and delivering advertising to visitors of www.ReadingIQ.com when they visit other websites and applications. For example, when you return to the Services after logging in, cookies help the Services recognise who you are without having to log back in. For more information, see section 6 (
How We Use Information
) above. The information collected through these technical methods on the child-directed portions of the Services are used only to support the internal operations of the Services. We do not allow third- party advertising networks to collect information about Child Users who are logged into their Accounts.
F. Cookies We Use
Our Services use the following
cookies
:
G. Managing Your Cookies
Cookies help you to get the most out of our Services, and if you disable cookies some Services or website functionality may not be available. If you do not want the Services to collect information through the use of cookies, you can set your web browser to reject cookies from the Services.
How to enable and disable cookies using your browser:
Most browsers allow you to manage cookie settings. These settings can usually be found in the
Settings, Options, or Preferences
menu of your browser. The links below are provided to help you find the settings for some common browsers:
i.
manage cookie settings in
Chrome
,
Chrome Android
, and
Chrome iOS
;
ii.
manage cookie settings in
Safari
and
Safari iOS
;
iii.
manage cookie settings in
Firefox
;
iv.
manage cookie settings in
Internet Explorer
; and
v.
manage cookie settings in
Opera
.
For all other browsers, please look for a
Help
function in your browser or contact the browser provider.
However, as mentioned above, if you reject or block cookies from the Services, the Services may not function as intended. For example, you will not be able to remain logged in to your account, and therefore you would have to log in during each page transition.
Further information about cookies, including how to see what cookies have been set on your computer or mobile device and how to manage and delete them, visit
www.allaboutcookies.org
and
www.youronlinechoices.com/uk
.
15. Changes to Our Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy
We constantly try to provide the best services, and accordingly our Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy will change from time to time. If we update this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, we will notify you by posting the revised Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy on the Services, and for certain revisions that materially expand the ways in which we use or share the information previously collected from you through the Services, either display an alert next to the Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, display an alert upon login to the Services, or directly communicate with you (e.g., via the email address associated with your Account).
If you have a School Account, any modifications to this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy will only apply to you and your Child User in accordance with the AofL Schools agreement with your Educational Institution.
16.
Complaints, Reporting Violations, and Contacting Us
To exercise the access, disclosure, data portability, and deletion rights  submit a verifiable consumer request to us by  visiting here:
Privacy Portal
We are committed to resolving any complaints about our collection or use of your Personal Data. If you would like to make a complaint regarding this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy or our practices in relation to your Personal Data, please contact us as described below. We will reply to your complaint as soon as we can and, in any event, within 45 days. We hope to resolve any complaint brought to our attention; however, if you feel that your complaint has not been adequately resolved, you reserve the right to contact the ICO, as detailed in section 9 (
How to Access, Change, or Delete Account Information; Your Rights
) above.
Age of Learning, Inc. and Age of Learning for Schools, Inc. are each located in the United States of America. Age of Learning, Inc. is the operator of all of the Services except ABCmouse® for Schools, operated by Age of Learning for Schools, Inc. Any questions, concerns, or complaints regarding this Privacy Notice and Cookie Policy, our data collection or processing practices, or issues related to your or a Child User’s information for which you are responsible should be directed to us via any of the following methods. As Age of Learning, Inc. and Age of Learning for Schools, Inc. are each located in the United States of America, we have appointed a representative in the European Union so that our European Users may easily contact us:
For Family Accounts:
Postal Address:
Age of Learning, Inc.
Attention: Legal Department
P.O. Box 230
Glendale, CA 91209
USA
Telephone Number: 1-800-633-3331
Email address: privacy@aofl.com
For School Accounts:
Postal Address:
Age of Learning for Schools, Inc.
Attention: Legal Department
P.O. Box 230
Glendale, CA 91209
USA
Telephone Number: 1-866-360-9492
Email Address: privacy@aofls.com
European Representative:
We have appointed DPR Group as our Data Protection Representative in the European Union so that you can contact them directly in your home country. DPR Group has locations in each of the 28 EU countries, so that Age of Learning, Inc.’s customers can always raise the questions they want with them.
PLEASE NOTE: when mailing inquiries, it is ESSENTIAL that you mark your letters for ‘DPR Group’ and not ‘Age of Learning, Inc.’ or your inquiry may not reach us. Please refer clearly to Age of Learning, Inc. in your correspondence. On receiving your correspondence, the Company will likely request evidence of your identity, to ensure your personal data and information connected with it is not provided to anyone other than you. If you have any concerns over how DPR Group will handle the personal data they will require to undertake their services, please refer to their privacy notice at
https://www.dpr.eu.com/legal-privacy
.
DPR Postal Addresses
Country
Addresses
Austria
DPR Group, City Tower, Brückenkopfgasse 1/6. Stock, Graz, 8020, Austria
Belgium
DPR Group, Place de L’Université 16, Louvain-La-Neuve, Waals Brabant, 1348, Belgium
Bulgaria
DPR Group, 132 Mimi Balkanska Str., Sofia, 1540, Bulgaria
Croatia
DPR Group, Ground & 9th Floor, Hoto Tower, Savska cesta 32, Zagreb, 10000, Croatia
Cyprus
DPR Group, Victory House, 205 Archbishop Makarios Avenue, Limassol, 3030, Cyprus
Czech Republic
DPR Group, IQ Ostrava Ground floor, 28. rijna 3346/91, Ostrava-mesto, Moravska, Ostrava, Czech Republic
Denmark
DPR Group, Lautruphøj 1-3, Ballerup, 2750, Denmark
Estonia
DPR Group, 2nd Floor, Tornimae 5, Tallinn, 10145, Estonia
Finland
DPR Group, Luna House, 5.krs, Mannerheimintie 12 B, Helsinki, 00100, Finland
France
DPR Group, 72 rue de Lessard, Rouen, 76100, France
Germany
DPR Group, 3rd and 4th floor, Altmarkt 10 B/D, Dresden, 01067, Germany
Greece
DPR Group, 24 Lagoumitzi str, Athens, 17671, Greece
Hungary
DPR Group, EMKE Building, Rákóczi Út 42, Budapest, 1072, Hungary
Ireland
DPR Group, Phoenix House, Monahan Road, Cork, T12 H1XY, Republic of Ireland
Italy
DPR Group, BPM 335368, Via Roma 12, 10073 , Turin, Italy
Latvia
DPR Group, 4th & 5th floors, 14 Terbatas Street, Riga, LV-1011, Latvia
Lithuania
DPR Group, 44A Gedimino Avenue, 01110 Vilnius, Lithuania
Luxembourg
DPR Group, BPM 335368, Banzelt 4 A, 6921, Roodt-sur-Syre, Luxembourg
Malta
DPR Group, Tower Business Centre, 2nd floor, Tower Street, Swatar, BKR4013, Malta
Netherlands
DPR Group, Cuserstraat 93, Floor 2 and 3, Amsterdam, 1081 CN, Netherlands
Poland
DPR Group, Budynek Fronton ul Kamienna 21, Krakow, 31-403, Poland
Portugal
DPR Group, Torre de Monsanto, Rua Afonso Praça 30, 7th floor, Algès, Lisbon, 1495-061, Portugal
Romania
DPR Group, World Trade Centre, Piata Montreal no 10, Entrance F, 1st Floor, Sector 1, Bucharest, 11469, Romania
Slovakia
DPR Group, Apollo Business Centre II, Block E / 9th floor, 4D Prievozska, Bratislava, 821 09, Slovakia
Slovenia
DPR Group, Trg. Republike 3, Floor 3, Ljubljana, 1000, Slovenia
Spain
DPR Group, Puerta de las Naciones, Ribera del Loira 46, Madrid, 28042, Spain
Sweden
DPR Group, S:t Johannesgatan 2, 4th floor, Malmo, SE – 211 46, Sweden
United Kingdom
DPR Group, BPM 335368, 372 Old Street, EC1V 9AU, London, United Kingdom